(lp0
VI'm happy with these Headphones, they are everything I was expecting and would Highly recommend them.I don't think Amazon would be selling them for the last 8 years if they weren't quality product.
p1
aVThe earphones have good sound with good range.  The recharge is within a reasonable period of time.  And I can wear the phones for a couple of hours at a time without them becoming uncomfortable.  I bought two units so that my wife and I could both have a pair.  One nifty bit about it is that we can share our source of music with each other...  One of us can start streaming on a frequency, but both headphones can be tuned in.I'll be keeping the headphones, but I must admit, there are things about them I don't much care for.1) The bulky recharge station has the appearance of a 20th century left-over that looks like an old steam iron, and has a massive footprint.2) If you position the station incorrectly, you get random interference, much like not quite being able to tune a radio station, and it fades in and out; and when it fades out, there is a varying degree of hissing-static noise.3) When the sound-source goes silent, the tower appears to stop broadcasting a signal, and that makes the headphones pick up static.  This happens quite suddenly, and the transition from silence to ear-splitting hissing-static can be anything from annoying to downright painful.  The noise level is sufficiently loud enough that my ears continue to ring, even without the headphones on, for a good hour.
p2
aVA co-worker recommended this to me as she has had it and enjoys watching tv in bed, but her husband doesn't want to hear the tv.  It could not be any easier to install (less than 5 min.) and it's very user friendly (simple).  The headband has ample cushioning on both the ears but also the top of the head.  Sound is fantastic quality.  Our tv does not have a soundbar, and listening through the headphone was a higher quality than the tv.  Very glad we purchased it.
p3
aVI read the reviews and still opted to purchase these headphones.  I can't tell you how disappointed I am.  Yes, they work and they charge well.  Aside from that I would not recommend them.  They don't cover my ears completely and constantly slip off.  The sound is so basic, offering no stereo quality whatsoever.  If you pause the tv, you will receive an annoying hissing sound out of the headphones.If you want the basest of sounds from uncomfortable headphones, these are for you.
p4
aVThese work great. We wanted something to wear while on the treadmill and watching TV. Plenty loud and clear. Instructions are lousy but finally figured out where to plug them into TV/cable box.
p5
aVtalk about range, forget missing anything on a show ever again, when nature calls, hilarious how you can go to opposite side of house and listen to the T.V.(perfect) while in the can!  When orderingMAKE CERTAIN your flat screen has more than one AUDIO out connector, we use a sound bar with our Sony due to poor T.V. audio and must disconnect sound bar to make use of headsets hookup!  On a personal note buy these any time other than XMas, seller jacked price to twice what it currently listen for...unreal!
p6
aVThere is static on this model.  Sometimes I am able to lower the amount of static by changing the switch on the base unit, but it is never completely gone.  Even adjusting the switch on the headphones doesn't eliminate the static.
p7
aVpretty good headphones only 2 problems I find, every now and then they get very loud (really annoying). Also putting these on the charging is a problem they won't charge unless I put weight on top.
p8
aVThe sound is good when tuning is precisely set; it can be easily bumped off the desired location. The charging  mount position is a little skittish and this requires better placement attention than one may think. But if you pay attention to these things I found that the range and comfort both make these drawbacks worth it. I hope quality is lasting for a long product life since I like using it but have only had it about three weeks.
p9
aVBought it for my Father but he did not like it at all.. The control for volume and channel are right beside each other.  He is in his mid 80's and every time he went to adjust the volume would mix up the channel.  Ugh!  He will return it.
p10
aVI bought these for my husband for Christmas. Our TV is right outside the bedroom door and he doesn't like to watch TV at night because he's a night owl and I'm usually in bed by 10 and he doesn't want the noise to bother me. So I bought him these and they are great! I think some other reviewers mentioned a hissing noise, but there is a tuning knob on the side that you're supposed to use. If it's not tuned right you will hear hissing, just like a radio, but when you tune it correctly there's no hissing and they sound great.
p11
aVThese headphones were perfect for us.  Easy to set up and the clarity is amazing.  There is no background noise at all.  We purchased these so we could watch two TV's in adjoining rooms which we couldn't do before as the sounds conflicted.  Now my mom can watch her programs while we watch our sports!  Very comfortable to wear as well.
p12
aVThis is my third set of Sennheiser headphones.  I use them to watch TV while working in the kitchen at night after i have put my kids to bed and need to minimize noise, or any other time i'm doing something noisy in the kitchen and want to be able to hear the TV. (I don't usually get to sit down to watch TV!)  The two sets i previously owned have lasted approximately 7 years each, with about 5 hours' use per week. I have dropped them occasionally on the kitchen floor, but no other abuse. They have been very reliable and consistent. All three pairs have looked and worked exactly the same - except - i've noticed that this third pair have a slightly shorter range, even though the model seemed to be higher & more expensive than my previous pairs. If i go to the garage or upstairs, i get moderate static now, whereas with my previous 2 pairs that didn't happen. But i can live with that. They have been so reliable and easy to use that i haven't considered buying any other brand when its been time to replace them.
p13
aVI used to think these headphones were great. I admit, I used them a lot, but right after the 2-year-warranty was up, every time I put brand-new batteries in them, they work well for maybe five hours, then the volume doesn't want to work right, you can't dial them in, and then boom: You take the back off of them and check the batteries, and for whatever reason, the past three packs of batteries I've put in them have corroded.(And of course, if it would've happened a month ago, they'd still be until warranty...)Save money and buy the RCA ones. They don't fit quite as well on your head, but I bought them for my parents, and they do the job just as well for less.I used to think Sennheiser made reputable products, but perhaps they are of the ill reputation.
p14
aVIt was a gift for my husband. He is hard of hearing and I find him using it a lot. Works well and was a good thing for us. I can sit in the same room that he is watching TV and do my own thing with out TV interference. We are really happy with the headphones.
p15
aVI can't fully comment on this product for it was a gift.  I did set it up which was extremely easy and the sound when tested was phenomenal.  Since you have to tune in to get the clearest sound, I'm hoping that distortion won't come down the road.  I also cannot comment on the charging capability.  My aunt and father both loved it and now my dad wants one as well.
p16
aVFinally, a headset that is reasonable and works exceptionally well.  My 85 year old father (difficulty hearing) now doesn't have to blow us out of the house with the TV Volume.  Hallelujah for Sennheiser--peace of mind and sanity have been restored.
p17
aVPROS:(1) The technology works very well.  No-hassle, crystal clear, well balanced sound.(2) Very easy setup.(3) Excellent value relative to slightly less expensive products.CONS:(1) As others have mentioned, these are clearly designed for stationary viewing/listening.  Stability is an issue with these headphones.  They are not ideally suited for treadmill use or walking around.(2) I have an average sized head and these are slightly too large for me.CONCLUSION:While the technology, price, and setup are truly excellent, the headphone design, comfort, and fit is well below average.
p18
aVLow quality. Unit was dead on arrival. Completely dead! Couldnt even get a power light. After testing, i determined the power adapter is defective. How absolutely lazy and cheap do you have to be to not test the power adapter before packaging.Gave this as a birthday present. Happy Birthday. Now all you have to do is print a return label, repackage everything, drop off the bad unit and wait another week. Enjoy!!!!Besides the abysmal quality control, the unit feels C-H-E-A-P... The foam ear piece coverings look like they will rot and deteriorate quickly and whats up with the tuning knob? Did you know you have to TUNE the headphones to the transmitter like you did with AM radios in the 30s?News flash. Welcome to the 21st century. I expect these units to automatically digitally lock on to the correct frequency just like my cheap $10 bluetooth headphones.And if that wasnt enough. Turn the headphones on with the base station off and instead of getting complete and total silence (because there is no signal), you get your ears blown out with white noise.If you long for the "good ole days" of Jack Benny, short wave radio, swing time music, and ears throbbing from loud white noise, this unit is for you!!!
p19
aVI would like a headset that is a little less bulky, but it arrived on time and intact, easy to set up, great sound. Love that I can walk the whole way through the house and never miss a word of whatever TV show I'm watching.
p20
aVMy wife loves these to use with her non Bluetooth plasma TV.  She uses them in the morning while doing her yoga and makeup so as not to wake me.
p21
aVThese are excellent. Purchased some from brookstone and they broke after warranty was up. I loved these much better. Easier to handle. I have truly enjoyed them. I am a night owl and my husband is not, so I just put on earphones and he sleeps.
p22
aVAmazing headphones.  I like the fact that I can use the headphones and the TV speaks, I like watching TV a bit louder than my wife so this works perfect. Battery lasts a few days on 1 charge.  I bought a second one for my dad who watches TV in bed.
p23
aVBought these for a birthday present and when we opened them and set them up they didn't even turn on. What a disappointing birthday present. Did Sennheiser even see if they worked before they shipped them from their factory.  Fortunately I could return them easily with Amazon but I might just try Best Buy instead so I can actually see if they're working.
p24
aVThis is a really terrible product.  Constant low hum and every couple of minutes it just fails for about 20 seconds.  The tune dial is next to the volume making it impossible to adjust without looking.  The ear pads are scratchy and the fit adjustment is sub-par.  I can't for the life of me understand why anyone actually keeps these.  I'm sending mine back after 5 minutes.
p25
aVHeadphones do not secure well, easily fall off head. Signal drifts, the signal needs to be tuned separately. When a DVR or DVD is paused for any length of time there is loud static. Excellent sound, but pales compared to the minuses.
p26
aVJust hooked them up yesterday, but here's a preliminary review. They work perfectly as advertised. Slight complaint: headphones not very comfortable - - insufficient padding on earpieces, but not to the point where it's a deal breaker. Listened to some opera : audio quality in the satisfactory-but-not-great range, but I expected that to be the case,  so not a disappointment. The big selling point here is the fact that they're wireless,  they work and the battery recharges right on the stand.
p27
aVI got this for my dad to wear when watching TV because his hearing isn't the best.  It works very well as long as the TV's on and it's within the right distance; otherwise you'll hear nothing but static noise if the headphone's not placed on the charging unit.
p28
aVJust got it. Easy to hook up to TV and a variety of other devices as it comes with various connection pieces. Tousling digital to analog converter was not required on my digital TV (but perhaps because of the TV rather than the headphones). The headphones are a high quality item.
p29
aVThese are great for watching TV. I need a lot of volume on TV and my wife does not need a lot of volume. These make both my wife and I happy.
p30
aVI bought this for a hearing impaired family member.  It has made had huge difference in his abiltiy to be to watch tv shows.  Many times he would not watch a show because of his inability to hear the words they were saying.  He now can hear the tv and even walk into another room and still be able to hear what they are saying on a show.  He does have a cochlear implant and he is able to wear  the headphones with his implant without the headpphones hurting his ear.
p31
aVWhat's not to like?  I have tinnitus so it has to be louder for me to follow.  I'm not irritating my family or neighbors with a loud television or stereo anymore.  Thanks.
p32
aVThe sound is clear. I can walk all over the house and hear the program I'm watching.I work out in the morning  so I don't wake my husband while watching T.V..
p33
aVBought these to  watch TV without disturbing the wife.  I was drawn to the great reviews and 300' range claimed.  I was very disappointed in both the noise and distortion of the sound in the headphones.  I'm not an audiophile--I don't expect it to be perfect but this was just unusable for me.  I replaced this with a cheap-o bluetooth transmitter and a pair Sony bluetooth headphones--Bluetooth doesn't have the range of this device, but the sound quality was 1000% better.  I did attempt to "fix" this by changing the transmitter frequency, and fooling with the tuning on the head set, but nothing came close to a usable sound. I think the core of the problem is that this device uses analog radio to transmit the sound.  The device seems to be crippled by any sort of RF interference.  I would have expected there to be some sort of filtering in the device especially given the $80 price point.
p34
aVComfortable, not heavy. Like how they're lightly lined instead of plasticky as my old ones started peeling/ chaffing.  Great sound . I can watch TV late at night without bothering anyone
p35
aVEasy setup and works very well. Bonus is that you're given 2 different ways to configure this headset: send all the sound to the headset or, send sound to both TV speakers and the headset. Fidelity is very good too, I'm now hearing sounds that I hadn't noticed before. Heads-up: if you pause whatever you're watching, after several seconds the headset will revert to static. Easy to fix, right after you restart your show, move the "Tune" dial slightly to hear audio. Apparently the frequency / channel between the transmitter and the headset is only active when audio is active.
p36
aVGood value.  Quality exceeded my expectations.  Love the fact I can replace batteries when/if needed.  Very comfortable for me.  Took a little getting used to and learn where the volume on TV has to be to avoid earphones from shutting off due to low input signal.  Can hear in other rooms is a plus.
p37
aVI bought this item for my wife as a Xmas gift. She LOVES it\U0001f60d.  I "borrowed" the headphones very early in the morning to watch tv and I didn't want to wake her or my daughter. I found the sound to be remarkable and music sounds great too! Easiest of set ups and recharging stand a huge plus. I going to ask for a supplemental headset for my bday.
p38
aVFirst set arrived previously opened and DOA.  Replacement set is FANTASTIC!  I am a die hard "Bose" owner, but these wireless headphones have wonderful base, crisp trebles and crystal clear voice.Out of the box they are a pain in the rear to get them to charge on the charging stand.  Once you have worn them however they spread apart more and only have to be set on the stand and they will charge.The headphones are made with the utmost quality and comfort in mind.  I often just put them around my neck from behind and they are plenty loud enough to hear.  When placed on the head of the user correctly, others sitting in the vicinity cannot hear them at all.Great wireless headphones!  Highly recommend!!!
p39
aVThese were terrible.  I returned them.  I saw two other reviews that said they did not work at all.  Same with me.  I tried to connect them to two different TVs, and they did not work at all.  One TV was 3 years old (Sony) and one 6 months old (LG).  Connections were fine, but the thing did not transmit.
p40
aVI love these headphones. They're relatively light and comfortable. Compared to a cheap Bluetooth set I had , these work great. There's no static and the sound quality is quite good. The only "problem" I had is once when I had the headphones on but no sound output from the TV, I actually picked up a neighbor's cordless phone conversation. I couldn't find the frequency listed anywhere k but apparently it's the same as some cordless phones. Just something to keep in mind. Once I tuned the headphones and the TV sound came back, I lost the phone conversation.
p41
aVAlthough headphones looked well designed and were comfortable, I returned them to Amazon no questions asked. and provided free shipping.  Spent over $20 for optical-dig cable and a box that converts op-dig signal to RCA plugs.  Searched all over online including Sennheiser and Samsung without finding a solution.  Samsung said call Sennheiser, and Samsung said, guess what?  Nothing but white noise. My Sony sound bar works with TV fine using op-dig connection.  At least tell me I need the extra stuff before I buy.  Too bad, would have improved my marriage.
p42
aVThese are decent but you have to set your expectations correctly:1. These are not around the ear headphones, I would classify them as giant on ear headphones. The sponge surface is flat throughout.2. Because they are giant on ear headphones they may slide off when you lean forward (to pick up a sock for example)3. There is no indication when the batteries are fully charged, the red light is always on when charging.4. They are open back headphones, which means no sound isolation, you will hear outside noises and others can hear the audio coming out of them faintly. This could be a positive and negative, I like to be able to hear when my daughter is calling for help with her homework.5. The instructions say that initially you have to charge the batteries for 24 hours, so you can't use them right away.6. I would have loved to see an aux input, so I can quickly plug my phone and use them as wired headphones.7. I paid 72.99, no tax, free shipping here on amazon and I think it was a decent purchase.
p43
aVWorks well most of the time, though there are occasions where the headset loses sync with the base station, and when that happens it gives out a loud hissing sound (you have to turn on and off again). Doesn't happen often but when it you definitely notice it!Range is decent. When used in a house with lots of walls you can probably get a good 30 feet before losing connection.Sound quality is pretty good and the ear piece is comfortable for long wear (30-60 mins) despite being made of foam.
p44
aVI'm ReReviewing this product. I'm going from 2 to 4 stars. I'd make it 5 stars save for the documentation. I returned the first set because the ON light didn't seem to work. I asked for a replacement. It did the same thing. At which point I contacted Sennheiser and they promptly returned my email with a 3 page explanation and helpful hints. They refer in the doc of an auto-on feature but its very poorly described.Turns out the green ON light only comes on when the Audio hookup is detected and its working correctly. It DOES NOT come on just because the unit is plugged in?!?! I have now recharged and setup the second unit and it works great!!Another poorly documented setup item is the charging of the headphones. I thought the headphones charged wirelessly. I did not connect the metal frame with the fact that the headphones have metal contact points and must be centered in order to charge. If either of the earpieces are extended they will not sit properly in the cradle and not charge. Therefore, the earpiece extensions should be pushed back in before cradling the headphones.Once I understood the configuration, they worked great. The sound is very sharp and crisp and the phones are very comfortable.
p45
aVI bought this headset to watch in bed while my wife slept. I had them for about a month before I sent them back. Took off 2 stars for two reasons. First is that they don't have enough ear padding to feel overly comfortable. I am bald and have watched tv in bed for up to 6-8 hours at a time and my head and especially ears are very sore after that long of viewing. I have been disabled for about 4 months so I wanted something that I could lay down in bed to watch with. The sound and clarity was good and it was easy to set up and use. The deal breaker for these that led me to buy a Sony brand was that after a few minutes of my show (either a movie or Netflix usually) being paused the headset disconnects in a fashion and you are hit with an earful of loud static. These probably have slightly better sound and reception than the Sony version I am currently using. The Sony MDRRF985RK for about the same price. But I am staying with the Sony due to the extra cushion on the headset and the fact that they just go quiet after about the same amount of time rather than go static. I would prefer to go with a higher end seinnheiser but couldn't afford them at this time. Hope this helps someone looking for these at this price range.
p46
aVI bought these headphones for my grandfather because his hearing is poor and we don't want him to blow his TV speakers out, plus we want to be able to hear. He has had many different sets of headphones and all of them are collecting dust in a box somewhere. This set is different for a few reasons. First of all, they was a lot easier to plug in to his DVR then some of the others have been, of course those ones were from many years ago and technology has come a long way. The next point he liked was the charging dock and how easy it is to use since he doesn't have to plug them in or anything like that. The tuning is easy and the sound quality is fantastic. He can actually hear his TV and they aren't turned all the way up and that is really a plus for all of us. He also likes that they just sit on top of his ear because the ones that encapsulate his ears just do not fit. The only complaint that he has is that they do not have a volume adjustment for each ear individually. His right ear is worse than this left and so what is good for the right is a little to loud for the left. That is why I give this product a 4 star because that might one day be enough to get him to stop using them. However, these are currently a hit with him and that is important to me. I think they are a good product and a good purchase.
p47
aVWe have not been able to get the headphones to pick up any signal from our television. We have a 5 year old HD TV and use local television (through Antenna) and streaming services. We continue to try to pick up a signal, 8 months later: no luck.
p48
aVBoyfriend loves wearing these in bed at night while I sleep like a baby in the quiet.  Paired with Alaska Bear Two strap sleep mask for me and we are both happy.  The headphones are perfectly clear and can walk all over the apartment with them.  Great for sporting events too.  Never miss a play while in bathroom or kitchen.
p49
aVI purchased two of these (not from Amazon). Although the sound quality is excellent and very comfortable to wear, the volume control broke after a few months and in the same manner on both of them. As you move the volume up & down, the balance changes and you hear a lot of static.Don't buy is my recommendation. I really wanted to give it 5 stars for everything else that works to my liking, but the above problem is just not acceptable. I used to see it on cheap electronics in the 80's. I was not expecting that from Sennheiser!
p50
aVI brought these headphones years ago but never used them.  I finally decided to break em out and try em out.  There are a few things I like about them and a few things I dont...  Please keep in mind that I am not an expert in electronics.What I like:I like that they are wireless.I like that they are charged while stored on its little docking arm.It got a pretty good range on it once its tuned correctly. We've got an average sized house. With the base stationed in the living room, we can make out back to the garage which is at the back of our average sized backyard.What I don't like:I can only connect it to my cell, tablet and computer. It wouldn't connect to my Samsung LED TV and this is why I broke it out in the first place!Unfortunately, it doesn't have Bluetooth and I cant add it. it would be nice so I can just Bluetooth to my cell or tablet instead of unplugging and plugging in... It becomes aggravating after awhile.The headphones aren't noise cancelling.  I thought they were.  Again, the description may have stated this.. I don't remember.Ah, they are OK.... But I was really let down when I realized they were noise cancelling. I was hoping to cancel out the noise in house whenever I watch a movie, which is once in blue moon.
p51
aVunconfortable headphones old technology thought they were bluetooth old scroll swiches noice gets in the way too expensive for what they are... i would return them but i am tooo far... very dissaponinted
p52
aVGot these for my grandma who has hearing problems and now she can hear the TV perfectly. My grandpa can also continue to watch TV as he usually does as well (hearing the audio through the TV speakers).
p53
aVHeadphones keep getting some type of loose connection and then stop transmitting sound.  Headphone covers keep coming off.  I have only had them for 3 months.  I will be returning them.
p54
aVI bought this for my spouse.  His hearing is not what it used to be.  Often he needs to turn the TV up so loud it bothers me.  Especially if I want to go to sleep before him.  This was the perfect solution.  The charging base plugs into the wall and the TV (our TV has headphone jacks which is pretty common on newer flat screens, but check first).  When you use the headphones, you can take them off the charging base and they are wireless.  They are comfortable and work great.  I highly recommend them!
p55
aVI got this for my husband who already has a set.  He's had it for years, tried many others through the years, and always comes back to these.  He said they work the best when you leave the room, others fade in and out.  He can actually walk out of the house and go into our shop and still hear the TV.  So when "the" game is on and he wants a snack he can walk into the kitchen and not miss a thing.
p56
aVI purchased in September, 2009.  I've used then every night since.  They're comfortable, lightweight, and provide very good sound.  The tuning is a little touchy, so getting it dialed in just right can take a minute, but once you do, sound is great and they stay tuned.They're really only good if you stay in the room, but you don't need a direct line of sight.  I keep the charging stand behind the television. You can also get a second headset without a second transmitter.I've used it on 4 different televisions, and I've always plugged the transmitter into the tv directly.  It has never caused the tv speakers to shut off. (Philips, Samsung and Vizio models).Also, the batteries are standard AAA rechargeables.  Six years in, and they're still strong.  I've never replaced them.  But, when the kids have left the headphones turned on and they've lost charge, I can just throw in 2 AAAs and I'm fine.
p57
aVBought these as a Christmas gift for my mother in law and she loves them! She sleeps a minimal number of hours at night and needed these to watch tv without waking her husband while he sleeps. She is not the most tech savy, but uses these with ease. Would definitely buy these again if needed!
p58
aVMy husband LOVES these headphones! He can finally watch loud movies, sports, or play video games without worrying about the volume at night. His only complaint is that the volume/tuning wheels can accidentally be adjusted while lying down because they are located on the back of the earpiece. Otherwise, great!
p59
aVThese are the best.  We have had other brands that just never worked right or we couldn't get them charged, etc.  The sound is perfect and we are happy
p60
aVI have hearing problems and have to have the TV set pretty loud. With these I can hear the TV and let others control the volume. I use these most every day.
p61
aVWorks...sort of. The main problems are (1) Power connection is sketchy at best, and is very hard to get and keep connected. It is hard to understand why they choose to have a removable power connection, but hardwired audio input connection on the base unit. Makes no sense. (2) The channel selection dial on the headphones is touchy, your best bet after getting a decent connection (if you can get one without significant background hiss) is to place some tape over the dial so it doesn't move when you are wearing the headphones. (3) They are really cheaply made in general, so they are not the most comfortable things, nor the best sounding.Having bought them for my mother as a gift, I would definitely not recommend these, and would return them if I could, now that I have seen them.
p62
aVThese area  bit bulky and have a larger head profile then ones I've had before.  The sound wasn't bad, but it wasn't as good as I thought it would be. I'm not an audiophile and am not too picky about sound, but it was a bit tinny and often had a hiss that I couldn't get rid of.  I guess the price isn't bad for the quality. My two chief complaints are: Mine wouldn't sit properly on the charger unless I adjusted both sides of the headset before I put them on it.  And I'm not a big fan of the frequency dial being mere millimeters away from the volume knob.  I've mixed the two up quite a few times.  I need something a little bit more user friendly.  I'm returning my pair to upgrade to a higher model.
p63
aVUnreliable for long term use.  Product stops working and does not perform as described.  Very difficult to use, does not cup the ear, plus sound is inadequate.  Product doesn't quit until after 30 day return policy is over, so now we're stuck without being able to return or complain.
p64
aVBought these for my husband for Christmas.He wanted them to be able to watch TV at night without bothering me when I read. He loves them. The sound quality is superb. He said it's like being in the movie theater. He is also able to get up and move about and the sound doesn't break up at all. The one and only drawback is not being able to switch off and on between the headphones and the TV sound unless he turns them off at the base. Could be just our TV or we need an adaptor of some sort. Other than that minor nuisance he loves them and praises them all the time
p65
aVI live in a high rise apartment and purchased these for watching TV while I use my exercise bike in my apartment.  They are light, comfortable and the sound is excellent and so much better than listening to the TV volume setting on 20.  They come with rechargeable batteries and charge in the rack.  The only negative I can come up with is that the charger doesn't have the ability to tell you "charging is complete".
p66
aVPurchased as a gift for an older relative. She was immensely pleased with the clear sound and recharging station. This was not as easy to connect as i would have liked.  This picks up all your neighbors phone cordless/wireless phone calls. That was interesting.
p67
aVI got these almost 2 years ago, and have been using them ever since, at least 3 to 4 hours or more nearly every day.  They still perform perfectly and I have no complaints.  The small issue that they fall off if you bend over is true, but not really bothersome.  I wish there were a way for me to continue to use them with my new audio equipment, but it has no headphone jack or rca stereo output jacks.  I have tried using the optical audio out jack with an adapter to rca analog stereo jacks, but have had no luck with the results.  Is there a solution out there?  Probably, but I haven't found it yet. I still would recommend these, as they have never failed in the nearly two years that I have used them, and I will still search for a way to connect them successfully to my newer equipment.
p68
aVSound is good & clear.  Installation is easy.  Sometime the tuning can be a little tricky, even with the receiver less than 10' away (direct line of site).  The head band is a little too large, despite having what I consider a large head (even with the head band fully retracted).  I did notice that a little tuning time spent & you can amplify the sound quite a bit.Overall, pleased.
p69
aVI returned this Christmas gift I ordered for my husband. He and I were very disappointed in the static, noise and bad reception .  It did not offer what we had hoped.
p70
aVwe tried so many times to get this to work, couldn't get it to work, had a professional installer come in and still the same, no luck, Now we are stuck with a brand new "Sennheiser RS120 On-Ear Wireless RF Headphones". So disappointed,.
p71
aVThis headset works great, but you need to make sure you change the volume setting on your television to "constant". if volume is set to "variable" the headset will not function.
p72
aVBought this for my 83-year-old dad to use whilst watching TV.  The sound is great, as is battery life and charging convenience.  But why - oh, why! - did they make the frequency tunable?!  These days, it's pretty standard to have everything on a PLL or crystal control and have the frequencies dead-on.  Sometimes, Dad turns the wrong knob, and I have to go over and re-tune it.Still, there's nothing else in this quality range that sounds this good that isn't bluetooth (yes, folks - I did NOT want to have to deal with pairing and lip-synch issues with a TV!)
p73
aVI was nervous as the last brand i used was not good quality. These feel great on my head. I had no problems connecting to the tv. I love that they are rechargeable. I love the stand. Sounds is perfect. The price is well worth it. I dont see why you would need a more expensive pair or why you would settle for a cheaper product.
p74
aVThe "hiss" everyone is talking about is there when no sound is coming through. I constantly need to adjust the freq dial to get a crisp sound, without static. This hiss doesn't happen to my Sony headset. Once I am listening to music or spoken word it is very good. Also, somebody mentioned "and don't bend over" very true, they seem to fall off easily. Would not order again.
p75
aVI like these and they've probably saved my marriage. The sound is good and they have a long range. The cons are that they can feel warm on your head and they certainly aren't feather weight. The other problem that could have been easily avoided is the fine tuning wheel being directly under the volume wheel, it's so easy to hit the wrong wheel and have to retune the whole thing. It happens so often that I'm thinking of getting it exactly where I want it and than taping it. It would have been better to have the fine tuning on the side with the on and off switch.
p76
aVGot these for my husband who likes to watch TV in bed while keeping me up.  He loves these.  They are so good he can actually wear them outside while listening to the TV in the bedroom.  The sound quality is great and I don't hear much when he wears them.
p77
aVThese have been fantastic ! My husband uses these daily and has for a few years!  (Just bought a 2nd set for another TV.)  The sound quality is great and the charge lasts a long time!
p78
aVSo my wife bought this for me for Christmas here from Amazon. I record and stream a lot so having a wireless headset with decent sound is nice. Wires always get in the way as I move around.So the sound on these things are pretty darn good. Not as good as some high end headphones, but excellent for wireless.The range is very good.  The wife put them on and walked from my office at one end of the house to the other, and said everything was crystal clear.I will say that after long sessions I have had a few moments where I got a brief bit of interference or something, but it was minor and not too big an issue. Not sure if I am too close to the base station. So I will be playing with location for it.Another issue which is minor, is that the tuning nob is right next to the volume. So it is very easy to accidentally hit the tuning nob and lose audio completely when you are looking at using the volume nob.A bigger issue is that at times it seems like the device likes to adjust the audio levels on the fly. I don't know if it thinks something is too loud, but at times when I am playing a game I will lower the in game audio to get things how I like and then the headset audio changes later.  It is annoying and doesn't happen all the time, but I am trying to isolate the cause here.My biggest gripe and it is VERY annoying. If there is no audio for 3-5 minutes the base station shuts off. When this happens the headset just starts blasting static white noise. It can be loud and very annoying. If all you do is listen to music, or play a game with constant sound/music you will be fine. But I guarantee at some point it will shut off because of lack of audio and then you will be blasted with white noise.  As soon as more audio goes to it, it turns back on. Would love a way to disable this "feature". Or at least it should disable the headset audio so you don't hear white noise.What I ended up doing was writing a little program that every 170 seconds (little less than three minutes) it plays a 12KHz audio file out the speakers. This is inaudible to humans but registers with the headset so I never have the issue with the base station powering down.  Although I really shouldn't have to do this.It is a good headset and comfortable. I would give it 5 stars if they fixed all the above issues.  4 stars if they at least fixed the timeout.As long as you are aware of these issues, and they don't bug you, or you work around the one like I did..  This is a good headset.
p79
aVGreat set of wireless headphones..  Have the base behind the flat screen and can get perfect reception about 20 feet away in bed..  No cut outs, no delays or out of synch..
p80
aVTuning this is like tuning a radio that keeps on changing stations involuntarily. In front of the "charging dock" aka the "white base thing" there is a white switch keep in the middle and have the headphones tuned towards the middle to have the best quality sound (I found through trial an error). If you move a lot or if you are earting I often hear static that really pulled me from my movie, I'm also 5 feet tops from the "charging dock device". When tuned don't mess with it, but you often do have to since you still hear slight static that is extremely bothersome. Their not that comfortable either especially if you are a glasses user. If you want the best wireless experience while watching a bluray/netflix and don't mind spending the extra buck buy yourself a console and look at headsets for that device (TurtleBeach etc..). Now the Installation... It's simple but the instructions over complicate it, the cable with the yellow end goes on the bottom of the "charging dock" keep in that mind. The headphones are also quite loud, as in if you have them on they still make considerable sound around you. In the end once you have them tuned and if they don't act up they do fit their advertised purpose. Hope this helps.
p81
aVI bought these headphones for my father for Xmas.  He watches tv late at night while my mom sleeps and is a little hard of hearing.  He just called to thank me as he can now hear ALL the the tv audio he "watches" (probably a good 20 hours in a week).  i'm not tech savy.  After watching an instruction video referenced in the instructions, i was able to install the headphones in less than ten minutes (i charged the headset in advance of gifting).  The item came with all necessary equipment for installation (his tv is only 2 years old).  So far, so great.
p82
aVVery disappointing.  I have had these less than a month and they no longer work.  The audio started cutting in and out and a tap to headphones would sometimes bring the sound back.  Now, nothing will work and they do not charge (red light doesn't light up).  The headphones are a bit uncomfortable and clunky and stiff, but I was willing to deal with that in order to have wireless sound in the bedroom for when my wife went to sleep.  I have been a loyal Sennheiser consumer for over 35 years, but now I am very unhappy.  I no longer have the box so I don't know if it can possibly be returned.  In summery,  I cannot recommend this product.
p83
aVThis product does not live up to the Sennheiser name. Between weak signals, mediocre sound quality, and a completely analog tuning system, these headphones are more like a $20 off-brand than a pair of Sennheisers. Additionally, the level threshold for the auto shutoff is way too high, resulting in loud, jarring white noise after a few moments of quiet, such as when scrolling through Netflix looking for a movie to watch. Sennheiser should have made the tuning mechanism digital to silence the white noise. I highly recommend NOT purchasing these headphones, at least not for the $70 price that I paid.
p84
aVI got this for my parents as they would have arguments on the TV volume. My mom can watch it at sound volume 20 on the TV while my dad blast it on his headphones. He walks around the house and is still able to use the headphones to listen to the TV. Note that you should tune the headphones before adjusting the volume level. I didn't like the material used on the ear part of the headphones since I have a Sennhesier HD 598.
p85
aVThere is a "tune" adjustment that is very sensitive and you will be lucky if it does not move.  The frequency does not "lock" automatically so every time you need to use these you better have a steady hand and try to tune to the frequency of the transmitter.  The power plug is very difficult to insert.  Almost impossible for my 76 year old mother...Also the head set is bulky.  I would expect better quality from a German manufacturer: these are the worst headphones I ever had.Most important: Left channel stopped working after 42 days.  I don't even have the packaging to return so I guess I just burned $75...
p86
aVI had bought these headphones for my husband as a gift and wasn't able to get them to work from the minute we opened them. There was so much static that we couldn't get a clear signal and barely could hear the little bit of sound we could get from the television. I would not recommend them. I was very sad they didn't work, my gift was a flop.
p87
aVSo far, perfect. My wife has some hearing loss and we've hooked them to the TV, running in parallel with our sound system. She's able to boost the sound an is happy with their performance. The wireless makes it all work well. I'm a little surprised by the tuning wheel, reminiscent of analog radio systems.
p88
aVThis sennheiser has a dock with audio cables and a jack to plug it in the laptop audio\u2026. Then, on the headphone, tune the frequency from the headphone to hear the sound. There is distortion, once the frequency matches, you hear the sound. The tuned point where there is no distortion, has VERY LOW sound. The moment you try to fine tune it again to increase the volume, loud distortion hurts the ears.Disappointed and embarrassed as this was gift to my brother and i have to return it to Amazon......Not worth it...... Don't buy.....
p89
aVA.  Great product.B.  Sound transmission excellent and focused.C.  I use without hearing aids but can be used with hearing aids.D.  Too bad hearing aids quality does not deliver the same quality these headphones produce.E.  Would recommend that anyone needing hearing aids listen through these headphones to be able to compare with hearing aid quality sounds for decision making in what is the best product to buy.F.  Very nice to be able to turn TV speaker sound down to zero(0) to not disturb anyone else and can adjust sound level in the headphones to personat al needs.G.  Have used the headphones outside in the yard and across the street at neighbor's houses(estimate 200 feet) without any noticeable loss of sound quality.
p90
aVThis is a great device for being able to listen to television late at night when everyone else is asleep.  The sound is great with little to no interference in most cases.  The only issue I had with this unit was when we used it in an apartment building where it was picking up radio waves from other apartments.  In our home, however, once tuned in there is virtually no interference.  This particular unit has the advantage of being rechargeable while on its stand (which is also the transmitter).  I find that the transmitter can even be hidden behind the tv set and still work without a hitch.
p91
aVThese wireless headphones are easy to setup and have great sound.  I did call an their customer service was excellent; the representative was knowledgeable.  I purchased these about 4 years ago and use them 4 to 5 days a week and have not changed the rechargeable batteries yet.
p92
aVI purchased these for my son who plays xbox and we are all sick of telling him to turn it down.  We do have a wireless tv so I wasn't sure if it was going to connect easily...it did and we are all happy
p93
aVIf you have severe hearing loss like I do, I recommend you buy this unit. Bought another RS120 to replace my existing unit purchased in 2011. I damaged the headset in the existing unit and needed a replacement. I wrote a review of my experience with RS180 and RS195 units, so feel free to look those up. Bottom line, neither of those units will match the RS120's ability to crank up the volume so that I can enjoy watching TV w/out my hearing aids in. The qualilty and depth of the sound captured by the RS120 is why I bought another one. I had so hoped to be able to upgrade my experience with the RS195, but alas, it was not to be. The headset on the RS120 is snug and your ears will get a bit warm, but the tradeoff for me is worth it. There is minimal noise escape to bother anyone near me, even with the volume at the mid point on a full charge. This allows my daughter and I to enjoy watching TV together without having the TV blasting. I hope Sennheiser continues to make this product (would be nice to have a slimmer base like the the RS180 and RS195, but the unmatched volume control of the RS120 keeps me coming back.
p94
aVI bought these for my wife so she could watch TV while I'm trying to sleep, and they seem to work just fine.The set-up was very simple with my Sony flatscreen TV and VZIO soundbar. I have it all set up so the TV sound is muted and the volume is controlled by the soundbar. When the headphones were plugged into the TV it all just worked. Turn off the soundbar - headphones working and TV muted.The phones themselves just required a set of AAA batteries (supplied) be installed and the base station be plugged into a power supply and the TV headphone output terminal.The RCA plugs were a bit of a surprise, but the phones came with a mini-jack converter. I guess that the standard is RCA plugs for headphones in Germany, or maybe they envisaged them being used on the AUX OUT terminals of a receiver. I dunno.Eventually I'll have to replace the plug-type adaptor with a cable-style one as the fat plug needed to accommodate two RCA plugs blocks off the last remaining HDMI input for my TV, but that won't be a problem.The phones worked out of the box but my wife managed to knock them out of tune by fiddling with the controls at random instead of looking for an on/off switch. I showed her how to tune them back in. Once I'd explained it was like tuning an old transistor radio she got the knack.
p95
aVI purchased this with high hopes. One  critical point for Sennheiser to disclose up front - I wanted to use this with an LG television set.  I tried for a very long time to get a audio signal and couldn't.  It made no sense. I called LG customer support ( I couldn't find a Sennheiser telephone technical support number) and found out that LG television sets cannot connect to any wireless transmitters. First off,  Sennheiser needs to let people know - as a disclaimer, what mainstream brands or models that this product will not work with.  And I'm pretty disappointed with LG as well, that they couldnt even put in a headphone jack since they have made it impossible to use  any wireless hearing assisted devices with their TVs. Pretty cheap.  So, this review is not specifically about the model, which is probably fine with compatible audio devices \u2013 the problem here is with the companies involved.  So I would make sure the tv or device you have is compatible with wireless assisted hearing transmitters - before you purchase it.
p96
aVThese are probably more like 3.5 stars, with the only negative being my level of comfort. I have corded, over-the-ears mid-priced Phillips headphones that comfortable for music and guitar playing, and that I use for the TV on occasion, but I wanted something wireless specifically for the TV. I explored several options and landed on these mainly because I wanted an all-in-one solution. Bluetooth headphones would have required a separate Bluetooth transmitter, and the other affordable Sennheiser set would have required frequent battery changes or at least the purchase of a rechargeable AAA battery pack. I wanted the ability to easily recharge my headphones, so these are what I got. They work and sound great, but I find the on-ear design a bit uncomfortable for extended TV listening. If you're concerned that may be the case for you, you might want to try them on somewhere before you buy them on Amazon.
p97
aVThe reason for this 1 star review, is that these have zero ability to be functionally used as a PC headset. After about 5 minutes of low/no signal (which can happen often during gaming, watching youtube, etc), the transmitter shuts off, and you are greeted with mega-decibel ear destroying static in place of the silence.  It's awful.For dedicated music or TV use, probably ok, but if you want these for a PC, stay FAR, FAR AWAY!
p98
aVhave been using these for years and they still work great! best things for us bc when one of us wants to sleep and the other wants to lay in bed and watch tv, we use these...or if he wants to play video games and i dont want to hear it LOL hell use these.
p99
aVThis product was so disappointing I had to return it. Though it's easy to set up, the maximum volume level of the headphones is too low. I wanted the wireless headphones so that I can raise the volume of the TV without making the volume uncomfortable for my wife. She would be able to keep the volume low, while I could turn it up, using the headphones. I was surprised to discover that the maximum volume possible was not particularly loud.In addition, the earpieces of the headphones do not fit well over the ears. There is no depressions to allow the ears to fit comfortably. The headphones tended to slip down, requiring repeated readjustments.For the price being charged, I expected a product of high quality. My requirements, I think, were quite reasonable: easy set-up, adequate volume control, comfortable headphones. After setting up the headphones according to instructions and listening to a few different TV channels with the volume switch at maximum. I was still struggling to hear clearly. I returned the headphones the next day.
p100
aVI had to return this. I would be watching TV or using my desktop and suddenly a very loud hiss would startle the heck out of me. It (the hiss/static) was really loud even though I would have the volume low. It just couldn't be trusted. Also there was a slight hiss all the time.
p101
aVI do love the fact that it charges, is wireless, and doesn't have much static. The thing I don't like is that the part that touches your head is flat felt. You'd think that after all these years they would make some improvement. I can only watch one sports game or one movie before my head starts to hurt, but at least I can watch that, so it's enough for me. I got what I paid for, and I like it.The one thing that bugs me a tad, is that I can't get awesome, move quality sound to play. It really just doesn't sound that awesome. But I can use it when my family is watching something else so I can do my own thing, so it's still useful and worth every penny.
p102
aVThe first pair was DOA. The second pair lasted 10 minutes. They were great when they worked. The problem seems to be in the power connection or the wall wart itself. I found them difficult to connect. They had a picture of the installation, which means that they know of the problem. Just bad design and probably changes in OEM supplier of the power plugs. I didn't bother to check with a VOM, I just sent them back and picked another brand. Also, the charger didn't work unless you pressed on the headphone. Too bad, my wife really enjoyed the 10 minutes when they worked.
p103
aVI have been using these for about a year now.  My office is in the loft and my wife usually wants to watch TV in the living room which is right below my office.  Before I got these, it was hard for either of us to hear what we were watching.  These headphones plug right into the TV and now i can hear my TV without disturbing my wife.The headphones charge very quickly so anytime I need them they are fully charged and the foam is very comfortable. I also really like the charging stand, it looks nice and is also very functional.The only thing that I do not like about them is they tend to slide off my head easily if I am moving around a lot but usually I am just working on the computer while I am watching a baseball or basketball game so it really does not bother me that much.
p104
aVWorks great except the headphones fall off while moving around.  Headphones would be better if they were more adjustable; falls off both our heads (man & woman's head) so not because one head is smaller than another. Does work from one room to another so range is great & convenient if needing to keep the volume off for others; sound quality is also very good. Would have rated 5 stars if the fit was more adjustable.
p105
aVAfter buying atleast half a dozen Sennheiser products I am convinced that the company does not know how to manufacture a bad product. Even if they tried, they will end up making a very good product at the least . This is my second TV headphones and I couldn't not buy them after seeing how many people bought this product on Amazon and gave them such a high rating.When I first unboxed it and connected it to my TV, it took me around 3 minutes from the second I opened the box until the device was fully functioning. I cannot believe how easy it is to use this product. I read some 1 or 2 star reviews and my only explanation is that 1. you received a defective product. 2. you are incompetent when it comes to technology. I am so happy I bought this product by Sennheiser and there products will always be first choice from now on cause the Germans know a thing or two about making an excellent product!Will all the praise I give this product there, nothing is perfect so I will list next the pros and cons of these headphonesPros:- headphone base doubles up as charger as well as holder, just make sure you buy rechargeable batteries (main reason I bought this product)- they fit very snug on your ear- excellent sound- batteries will never run out unless you use them for 24 hours non stopCons:- placements of tuner and volume dial in very bad location. Tuning can easily change if you are laying back on a pillow and move around alittle.- you will start feeling discomfort after an hour of wearing those headphones- static starts to appear when  you are using headphones while using your phoneIn conclusion I highly recommend these headphones for anyone looking for something affordable. You will not be satisfied if you buy a cheaper product. I did that and I wasted 50 bucks. If you have a much higher budget then go for the higher models.
p106
aVChanel 1 was noisy, tried 2 and 3 with no more luck. Switched it back to 1 and retuned the headset, and suddenly it sounded much better. Dirty contacts on the switch? But there continued to be distortion during some music passages. Retuning the headset cleared this up. Tuning requires turning a thumbwheel, similar to tuning an old style radio or TV. I find this too old school, and likely to get bumped off center. Trying the RS 175 instead.
p107
aVBalance switch too much static. Distance is great. Works perfect for someone who has lost hearing somewhat in one ear. Now the TV can be a normal volume  Great sound.
p108
aVVery disappointing head grip. You cannot look down while wearing the headset. Will fall off. I am on the tightest adjustment and even with a big head, still falls off. Anticlimax. Was so looking fwd to enjoying it.
p109
aVDelivery was sooner than expected and pleasant shopping experience, although I did find these a little less after ordering. Have to pay sales tax now in this state with Amazon. Purchased these as a replacement for "TV Ears". No comparison. This is a awesome set of headphones. Quality build and sound. I could not be any happier with my purchase. Great bass and treble, range is wonderful as I can go to the restroom or kitchen and not miss any of the audio. No static what so ever. If you are looking for a inexpensive set of earphones to listen to your tv and movies, buy these you will not be disappointed. Easy to set up & hook up. Shiennheiser hits a home run with this one as far as I am concerned.
p110
aVPurchased these a year ago! Husband uses them every day for 4 to 6 hours, more on the weekends for watching TV. He can't hear so he turns it up,, so I got these. I don't have to listen to all the action packed movies and endless football games any more! Thank You!
p111
aVWe like these headphones so much we ordered a second pair for our upstairs TV.  They are perfect if one  person prefers a low volume and the other higher.
p112
aVI just gave these to my husband for Christmas. They were easy the hook up to our Vizio Smart TV. I am using them right now. They fit great and sound good. I may not let him use them. I haven't walked around to test the range, but we are using them to watch TV, so we will stay close anyway.
p113
aVThe headphones are easy to set up, and they sound decent. The only thing wrong with them is that the volume and tuning knobs are directly next to each other, making it easy to accidentally switch to the wrong frequency and get static when going for the volume or simply adjusting the headphones. This wouldn't be such an issue, but we bought these for my grandpa, who isn't the most dexterous person. He'll get the hang of it eventually, but they would be much better if the knobs weren't so close together.
p114
aVThis product may have saved our marriage! With a new baby on the way, I wanted to make sure my husband did not keep us up at night with the noise of the television. These have worked like a charm. He is happy, I am happy and the baby can sleep in peace!
p115
aVThese are great, but they do not fit Sony Smart TV.  Sony has a lot of problems with their audio out.  Be sure you check out your TV.  I bought 2 sets of headphones, the second, work wonderful on that TV.  Best Buy brand tv.
p116
aVI bought these as a gift for my father. They have lasted well over a year, and though we needed an adapter when he recently purchased a new smart TV, they sound great and still work perfect.
p117
aVI have no idea why these are rated 4 stars. I received them as a gift 2 days ago and am returning them. The audio is atrocious and the earpads are uncomfortably itchy. An hour of setup resulted in nothing but frustration and a constant hiss in the background. I'm not an audiophile, but have set up an entire home theater with 5.1 channel and multiple inputs, so this review isn't based on a lack of technical expertise.
p118
aVSetup was easy.  Tuning them easy as well.  Overall, a very well-constructed set of headphones.  I use them often when my daughter is playing piano in a nearby room so I can watch my favorite shows on TV.  And for the price level, they can't be beat.  I highly recommend this set of headphones.  They sit nicely on my ears and I haven't noticed any issues with them watching an entire football game.  If you're looking for good quality at an affordable price for wireless headphones, you won't find a better set than this one.
p119
aVThese are the best headphones I have ever purchased for TV viewing.  My last pair finally broke after numerous drops by the kiddos...this pair has rechargeable batteries which are even better than having to put in new!!  Highly recommend to anyone looking for great quality sound to watch TV...you can walk from room to room and never lose the signal.
p120
aVThese are about the best you can get for the money. I buy my spouse a new pair about every five years. He has them on almost constantly so they get plenty of use. Very good range. He can hear his beloved news with these on even when walking across the street to check the mail. Wouldn't want to miss a minute of the news in case WW3 were to start, he says.
p121
aVThis head set is a wonderful item for me to be able to watch TV, or DVD's, as I have a serious hearing loss.  I can hear clearly, and adjust the volume as needed.  The head set lasts about a year, as I use it quite a lot.  The freedom to wander while wearing the headset is a big advantage for me as I don't usually "just sit" while watching, or listening to TV.  I'd highly recommend this headset to others, as it isn't only helpful to a person with a hearing loss.  It blocks out outside interference.  And it allows one to listen to a show, and not disturb others close by.  I'm so grateful to have found such a wonderful product.
p122
aVI've only had these a few days so cannot judge how they hold up in the long run but I can tell you I think they are wonderful! I spent considerable time in a session reviewing wireless headphones. I trust Amazon reviews at least ninety seven percent, I know that there are people who are overly critical about almost everything, those that are brand loyal and aim to please and those that fall between the two. I do not ignore that three percent. I believe there is pertinent information there. Back to the Senheiser Headphones,....Even though they were cheaper than some other good brands and ! had never heard of them I decided to take a chance. Sooo glad I did! I have the Bose Solo system and worried they would not be compatible.... not to worry, My Bose does not even have to be on in order to use these or it can be on with the volume turned down for people with normal hearing. unbelievable stereo effect from these! with a channel tuner instead of a switch on the headphones and a switch on the cradle. they use AAA NiMh rechargeable batteries that are charged just by being placed on the cradle! No plugging in! Thank you Amazon reviewers that steered me towards these. I am completely happy and Thank you Amazon for delivering them on time and safely and expertly packaged.
p123
aVVery good purchase, only one bad comment is that the adjustment for the width is lacking. It is made to fit all size of heads and it sure does, but after a couple of hours, my ears hurt (Probably because of the size of my head)
p124
aVThese are awful - like an antique AM radio, tons of static, I've had two other Sennheiser wireless headphones, one was pretty good (and was stolen) the other was really impressive.  This one is awful, I got snippets of voices, lots of hissing and general noise and not one bit of what I was actually trying to hear.  I did hear an advertisement for Time Warner Cable from who knows where(!?!?!?).  I don't use TWC.Maybe these are defective but I've never seen wireless headphones with a tuning knob before(!?!?!) and that tells me manual intervention is needed to make them work.MAYBE if you live in a desert somewhere they'd work but in a city, no.I'm going to spend the money and buy a good one from Sennheiser, I haven't given up on the company, just these phones.
p125
aVGot this to watch movies at night so as to not disturb the family.  It is not bluetooth and it connects to my Sony flat screen using the RC jacks, pretty easy install.  The sound quality is very crisp once it is "tuned in", very impressed with the sound when I walk away from the base, no static or drops in connection.  Love the rechargeable batteries.
p126
aVThese headphones work great! Typically, most wireless headphones tend to interfere with wifi whether it's bluetooth or RF.But I have yet to encounter such a problem.It has great quality but there is a minor hiss noise but you never notice it unless your T.V is completely silent.
p127
aVThere is a "tuning" knob on this thing, like an old style radio where you had to fiddle with the thing to get it to lock onto the alleged "channel" for the incoming sound.  I was always trying to ride a very fine line between the sound being audible and the sound being riddled with static.Half the time, I was picking up radio stations or some other local sound source I was not able to identify, even though I was within a couple feet of the transmitter.
p128
aVthese headphones have revolutionized my home life  My husband can watch the tv without disturbing anyone  He says he can hear sounds with the headphones that he cannot hear w/o them  We are both delighted with the sound quality, ease of use and the price
p129
aVProduct was purchased for my wife. She wears hearing aids and was having trouble hearing even with special soundbar. We did have to hook the charging unit to the TV rather than the soundbar. This turned out to be just fine. She is VERY pleased with these headphones. They were recommended by her audiologist. Several people in his office use them and are happy.
p130
aVOne major issue with my headphones-------very poor battery life.  Never lasted more than 3 hours without recharging.  Tried other rechargeable batteries---same problem so I do not know if the charger does not charge properly or if the unit just consumes too much energy.  Sad because other than this issue, the sound was great as well as the range and very comfortable.  Maybe just unlucky and got a lemon.
p131
aVthis is my second time buy one,, it does have some static..and I have 2 in the house and if I turn my head one way I hear my tv and turn another I hear the downstairs tv
p132
aVI bought this instead of a pricey set. I planned on locating the base on wall near my wireless WiFi extender.I did this as other sets use a higher frequency and might interfere with my in room wifi..I all ready own the same headphones and love them. I can listen while walking throughout my house and never miss anything.Now that I have two I can share a set. I keep the base units on different switch settings having plugged into different TV outputs.If watching the same Tv you just adjust the headset to receive the TV your watching.Oh and the price is very nice for these well made on ear headphones.
p133
aVI purchased these wireless headphones over a year ago and they work great. The sound quality is fantastic, the volume is adjustable and they still hold their charge for more than 10 hrs. Thank you Sennheiser - it's nice to be able to watch TV together with my wife. Also, I can walk outside the house into the garage and still receive good reception.
p134
aVHave twoo earphones one for wife and I. We use simultaneously and turn sound to room off. Perfect for a home with echos.The unit works perfectly. No hitch setting it up.
p135
aVWorks, but poorly.  Have to hold your head perfectly still cause if you move you get a frequency shift.  Dead air (gap between songs) you hear a hiss.  Headphones slide around easily and nearly fall off ones head.
p136
aVWOW!  These sound better than the TV speakers. To me they have a great stereo quality. These head phones were recommended to me buy a friend that has a pair. The best thing I can say about them is they are perfect for my husband who is hard of hearing. He can mute the "loud" volume on the TV and hear a better quality of sound.  He loves them.We are both happy now and no longer have "dueling TV's" in my house. The fit is really comfortable. We also ordered the charger and have had no problems with it. We have ordered a second pair for myself for the bedroom so either of us can watch TV without disturbing the sleeping other.
p137
aVSo I have used this for a while now and I have to say I am very disappointed with them. First of all, because you have to manually scan the channel of your music playing, you often get that old-radio-style white noise in the background, so sometimes the quality can be pour. Overall, the sound is OK but for the price range, you can get way better.Also, the Auto turn-off feature is not a feature, it's an issue: if you don't play audio for about 5 minutes, the transmitter will turn off which results in your headphones rushing you with full volume white noise! You can't turn this feature off.You are better off buying bluetooth/wired headphones. This type of headphone will probably not satisfy you at all. I do not recommend.If I didn't persuade you, this review certainly will: http://www.tassile.com/2011/02/01/bad-design/
p138
aVIf you google these, you'll see they have a serious and consistent problem where the volume control knobs cause a popping interference sound that is unsolvable without warranty service. I am pretty handy and took mine apart using instructions I found on various forums, but the problem persisted. The technology in these just isn't reliable enough to justify the $80 purchase, and mine are unusable now after a year of owning them and treating them very gently. I'm attempting a return and suggest you look elsewhere for your wireless headphone needs.
p139
aVInitially I really enjoyed these headphones. I purchased back in 2012 and used them pretty much every day. The main use was for playing games on my computer. Functionally they are (or were, i'll get to that in a second) excellent. Around a year ago, i noticed a crack forming above the left headphone, I quickly applied some pretty good epoxy to it and all was well for about 2 months, when they eventually cracked completely. I applied epoxy again, and they survived up until around a month ago, when in addition to cracking, there was a buzz I could here with all audio. I knew at this point, there was no saving my beloved headphones.If i could order these again, I'm not sure i would. I really wish that the headphones themselves could be purchased for a far reduced rate than the phones plus the base. It seems cost prohibitive to buy just the phone in my case, as i'd be left with an extra base of which i have no use for.In short, I wont buy these again. The issue i've had with these headphones are a result of (in my belief) poor design. While i'm sure the reason for making the extension part of the headphone out of plastic is to save some cost versus making them out of metal, the result is a product that does not last as long as it should. This is especially true of you have a gigantic head such as mine, where these are stressed more than normal.During the life of this product, i'd give it 4 starsBecause it broke on me within an unreasonable timeframe, -2 stars
p140
aVBought these to watch TV at night without bothering the wife. They do exactly what I need them to do. Lightweight, comfortable fit, excellent sound with plenty of volume, good range (wore them in the kitchen and bedroom of the apartment with no problems) and rechargeable, good (so the manual says and it seems to be accurate) for 4 hours on an 18 hour charge. The two pilots lights are helpful--green when there's audio, red when it's charging the phones. Recommend highly.
p141
aVWe purchased a different pair and they only worked for 2 days and felt really cheap. I returned them and ordered the Sennheiser Headphones. Very easy to install and they didn't feel so cheap. We purchased these for my father who is hard of hearing. He was unable to watch tv without shaking our walls. Now, we are all happy. They charged  quickly and are loud and clear enough for him to enjoy watching his favorite shows. The only problem we had was not realizing you need to close the adjustable headband before putting on the charger, otherwise there is not enough weigh to charge the headphones. That was our fault. I do wish that the charger light would go out when the headphones are fully charged. You have no idea how charged they are at any time.
p142
aVI had bought a pair of Sennheiser RS 160 and had to send them back as they were to difficult to use. So I bought  these Sennheiser RS120 and had to send them back as they had to be tuned whenever I used them, and still got hiss sometimes. I have them hooked to my tv and if there is no sound  for about a minute the transmitter turns off and they make a loud hiss. I took them off and set them down on the table. When I came back in a couple of hours the battery was dead. I had a five year old set of Sony headphones that had broken and I need to replace them but they never gave me this much trouble. I will never buy another  Sennheiser product again.
p143
aVThis item has decent sound and works fine through the headphone jack on my stereo.The main thing I do not like about them is the fit.I have a small head and I keep my hair cut really short and these headphones will fall off if I stand up and tilt my head forward.They fit my head very loosely.This also makes the sound somewhat not right in your ear,kind of distant.Would really like them more if they fit tighter.
p144
aVHeadphones are nice, though tuning them can be a little finicky.Clear sound, was able to go throughout my home without any sound quality lost.Was a quick set up and the batteries charged rather quickly for first time use.CONS: I wish the headphone would hug your head more, they slip off easily. The bass is lacking.SIDENOTE: the 3.5 (M) to RCA(F) would cut out the sound input after a while. It doesnt seem to like my visio, thankfully I had another adapter to use and it works perfectly.
p145
aVGreat product!  We\u2019ve been using Sennheiser wireless headphones for many years.  We have sets in the bedroom, the living room, the kitchen, the office, \u2026..what\u2019s that?  Four sets?  They\u2019ve all functioned perfectly until the last set we bought about a year ago.  This headset started to suffer frequency drift and became directional to the point that if I moved my head left or right, the signal varied.I contacted Sennheiser and reported the problem.  Sennheiser said \u201csend them to us with a description of the problem\u201d.  Did that!  Two weeks later (today), and much to my surprise, I received a package from Sennheiser with NEW headphones.  Now that\u2019s a company standing behind its product.We\u2019ll stick with Sennheiser.
p146
aVTuning these headphones can be compared to sending out a radio signal into outer space and expecting some sort of intelligent alien civilization to contact you back, and then be promptly disappointed as to the incessant hissing, mediocre sound quality, and the fact that it interferes with your once-amazing cell phone reception.If your computer doesn't play some kind of sound for maybe 5 or 10 minutes while these headphones are turned on, it will lose its connection and you have to turn it off and on again, re-tune it and then maybe-- just maybe-- you can watch that 7-second clip of a cat jumping from couch to couch. Once you establish a connection, make sure to replicate the precision of a Navy Seal veteran because if you're not careful, instead of changing the volume, you'll tune the thing out. A simple convenient fix would have been to just put the tuner on one side and the volume on another. Maybe even just change the texture of one of the knobs if keeping them separate is too blasphemous.I have to be missing something here. I'm not technologically inept. I've had these headphones for about a week, and it's a struggle. Maybe I'm ignorant, or maybe I'm in denial by admitting I'm ignorant, but why couldn't these headphones have just been USB connectable? Is it expensive to produce? Am I wrong or does a contact-charging wireless radio-transmitting headphone booth sound like more of an expense, more of a hassle?
p147
aVBought these on advise of a physician based on brand name...never occurred to me that a name brand would be an inferior product.  I have never had a set of headphones that would not stay on your head when you made the slightest tip forward (or backward, for that matter).  As long as you sit perfectly still these work okay.
p148
aVThese were purchased for my husband to save our marriage!!!  He is somewhat hard of hearing and his television was always on blast".  We have had other sets of headphones, but he finds these very comfortable and the sound is great!
p149
aVThe problem is finding out how to connect with you @ Amazon.  I am having a problem getting the unit to charge the rechargable batteries. furnished with the unit.  Followed directions.  Worked for a while.  Recharged batteries. worked for a while.  now the bateries are down and the unit is not charging at all.
p150
aVI bought these for my father in 2011 and he's still loving them! Absolutely no problems with the product yet. He loves it because he can turn the volume way up for himself and my mom doesn't complain. My mom uses them while he's at work so she can go do dishes or laundry during commercials and she knows when the show comes back on.
p151
aVWe needed a solution to allow my husband to watch sports/ESPN late night in the bed while I go to sleep. We go to bed together but he wants to watch a little TV first. This solved our issue. He can also walk around the house while wearing these and not miss the calls.
p152
aVAlmost sent these back, was on the verge. Could not get them to work with my Sony TV in the living room. Put them on the TV in the den and they work perfectly. Still don't know why they wouldn't work on the living room TV.  So that is why I have iffy in the headline
p153
aVThe worst set of wireless headphones ever. Most of the time more static than sound from TV. The next bad thing is the extremely loud "Snaps" of static. Very uncomfortable to use. If all of Sennheiser products are of the same quality, definitely don't buy.
p154
aVBought it for my husband who has a significant hearing loss and he loves it and so do we. He hates his hearing aides so the volume on tv used to be deafening. Now he can watch movies without any outside interference and actually knows what is going on. He does the dishes or goes to the garage and never loses on contest. Very happy with the purchase.
p155
aVI sent back the first one I received- it seemed to have a connection problem.  The second one is a dream.  The replacement set came quickly.  The sound is clear and the set-up was easy.
p156
aVEasy to set up after charging the batteries. Sound is clear without any distortion or background noise. I have good reception all over the house including the garage and basement. The headset fits a little on the loose side but not enough to be a huge problem. I'm very happy with this purchase.
p157
aVI never have gotten it to work. All I get is static have had other people try and they only got static.Figures I was out of luck in getting it to work. Can't understand why no instructions came with the head phones.
p158
aVThere is a slow hum in the background which is more noticeable when the voice level is lower and in a quiet environment. Also it has a rather big base which needs to be connected to the sound source. So you can't go completely wireless.
p159
aVThese headphones have been a real help for me. I have some hearing deficit, and this brings the TV sound right into my ears! (I have a really nice flat screen TV, but the sound on new TV's isn't very good...). My only complaint is that I actually bought two of these, and one headset is really good, but the other is wider and would fall off my head if I looked down... I don't see any way to adjust the width on the head...
p160
aVGood Headphones they work well sometimes I will get interference. It takes sometime to dial in the frequency. Comfortable fit good sound quality. Can walk around house and still hear TV fine. Good battery life.
p161
aVThey work great with the TV.  Have had for several years and haven't had any issues.  Very convenient when you are watching TV but need to be quiet because someone is sleeping or studying.  They also keep the charge for a long time without being placed back on the dock.
p162
aVI didn't have to adjust the channels (3) or fine tune. It worked perfectly out of the box. If you haven't listened to tv with quality headphones like these, you're missing out. The stereo and quality of sound is exceptional.
p163
aVI got these as a gift for my dad. He loves them. They have good very good range, are comfortable, and have good volume. I have some turtle beach headphones that I currently use myself and while the volume and comfort are OK, the range is not good at all. I would easily grab these when mine no longer work. I guess there is a reason why they are the #1 best seller on Amazon.
p164
aVI've had this for 4 years now and so far it's the best headset for the price. My headset was damaged due to the battery age and I had to replace the set with another. Now before anyone starts thinking negative about the product let me just say this is the best headset sound wise. When my 1st pair were damaged I went out and bought a SONY brand headset that ranges at $109.99 and the sound from it was horrible. It sounded so deep as the bass was up to the highest but there was no option to change the sound of it. Compared to these Sennheiser, the sound on this is so much clearer and nice.
p165
aVI love these headphones, I use them with the adapter to plug into the head phone jack on my TV and they work great.I work second shift and get home around 11 pm at night and stay up watching TV  until early in the morning and with theses I don't disturb my Wife while she is sleeping. I have been using corded head phones but will not being doing that any more.
p166
aVBought the Headphones for my wife.  It helps her hear whats on TV.  She walks around the house wearing the Headphones and doesn't miss what's going on TV.  It also provides me privacy when I am busy working/reading on our computer, tablet  or  reading.
p167
aVlove love love these things.  I have given so many as gifts.  We have ours hooked up to the TV so when someone is on the phone, or kids yapping, I can still hear the TV.  Also great when spouse is sleeping opposite shifts due to shift work.....I don't worry about waking him.
p168
aVI'm using it right now!  I use this to watch movies and shows while my baby is sleeping. They are very comfortable on my ears and the sound quality is excellent. Already purchased another set of headphones for my husband as well!
p169
aVThese work great as long as you are 2 feet from the base station with the volume on your device nearly maxed out.They pick up every kind of interference I can think of, even out in the middle of nowhere, at random times. Often need retuned to set the station perfectly and in the environment I am in, I should have ordered the closed back type.However, when everything is meshing, these headphones do sound amazing. I can actually hear lyrics I didn't know were audiable. And the range is pretty good. The only issue Ive had was that a hair of mine had jammed itself in the diaphragm.I would not buy these again for my applications. These can be good headphones.
p170
aVBought these for my dad who sometimes has trouble sleeping, and wants to watch tv without waking up the whole house! These are honestly the best thing I've bought him, ever! The sound quality is amazing and he can wear them all over the house, even around the pool, and still hear the game, music, etc.Really great product - Sennheiser arguably make the best headphone you can buy - and the wireless aspect is more enjoyable than we expected!
p171
aVI love the freedome you have with these and there is no forgetting to charge them because the place you put them to rest so they are out of the way and not in use is the charger ... that is a fantastic idea and they are so very clear ... I love them
p172
aVThe sound is very clear.  The unit very easy to hook up.  WhatI am not really happy with is the lack of comfort of the headphones. They don't have any noticeable cushioning at all, straight, flat against your ears.  Also, the dials for "tone" (tuning to the TV) and "volume" are on the back of the headphones that are on your ears.  Since I only use these while lying in bed, the back often hits my pillow and can change the settings easily.If I were to buy another set, I would look around for more comfortable and economically designed headphones.
p173
aVThe quality and performance are fine and audio sounds great.  The only reason for not giving it 5 stars is because the tuning dial is too close to the volume dial.When you are wearing the headphones and try to adjust the volume, it is way too easy to run your finger by the tuning wheel which is identical in form and shape to the volume dial and right under the volume dial.  This causes the headphones to disconnect from the base and you have to readjust the tuning wheel to reconnect.  If Sennheiser engineers every look at this post, I would recommend they put the tuning dial in a different location or better yet, put a cover over it so that after you tune it, you close the cover and you don't need to worry about it again!Other that the tuning wheel, everything works great.
p174
aVSo far no downside to these.  I bought an optical DAC to use the output from my TV instead of running the analog signals from my set top box. The range and quality of audio are excellent.  Pretty comfortable to wear.  It's a good idea to put a little tape over the tuning knob so you don't accidentally move it when putting headphones on and taking them off.
p175
aVDidnt work out of the box. I ordered them for a theater project at my house. The project went longer then expected so by the time i opened them and plugged them in the warranty was up on it. Not cool.
p176
aVI bought these headphones to use with my Samsung UN50J5500 50-Inch 1080p Smart LED TV (2015 Model) TV. I received them today on time and the package was undamaged. I unpacked the box, put the batteries in the headphones, plugged the yellow cord into the back of the grey stand which plugs into the wall or power cord, plugged the black and red cords from the grey box into the output on the back of the TV and they worked just fine. You may have to adjust the volume or tune them in from the headset itself. Simple to use. Just put your TV on mute and you don't have to worry about bothering others while listening to the TV. The sound quality is pretty good for the price. I'm happy with them.
p177
aVA bit snug on my big head.  Sound quality is good enough for my use.  Hissed a bit at first, but turning up the volume at the source and down at the headphones drastically reduced the hiss.Depending on your use, they auto shutoff implementation is the worst part of these.  I tend to put them on to watch a video, then leave them on with no sound.  After a minute or so the base shuts off. This part is apparently a mandatory US regulation, but instead of the headphones going silent they pick up loud static.  We had squelch on almost every 70's CB radio, seems like that technology could be implemented here.
p178
aVI think the sound is fine and the range is great.  I can walk out to the garage or upstairs without losing sound or picking up extra noise.  I do hear three "clicks" periodically, but it doesn't bother me.  The tuning is a little sensitive to get it dialed in, but then it's clear.  My main complaint is the the headphones are loose on my head.  If I bend over at all they shift or fall off.  Very annoying.
p179
aVThese are wonderful!  Very simple to operate and the sound is great.  This is a replacement of the same model that served us well for several years.  I tell my husband (and others) that these are saving us from divorce court!
p180
aVOpen concept homes are terrific unless you have to cook dinner while someone is watching a program you are not interested in or the horrors of the evening news. These headphones are a terrific way of allowing my husband to watch what he wants when I want to tune out. The sound is clear. I also use them while walking on the treadmill. I can watch TV and exercise at the same time without the noise of the treadmill interfering with the sound from the TV. I researched various brands of headphones before I purchased the Sennheiser headphones. They came highly recommended, and my husband and I have been pleased with them.
p181
aVI've looked for one of these for quite a while that you could lay on.  It's very soft and comfortable.  Has different massage areas and heat as well.  I keep it in my guest bedroom on the bed ready for use.  I plug it in and release the tensions of the day.  Very pleased with this.
p182
aVThese are wonderful for people who are hard of hearing as you can adjust the volume to suit each person.  I don't even use my hearing aids with it and can hear dogs barking in the background and leaves rustling on the ground.  Noises I haven't heard in years!  Perfect for a couple with different hearing abilities if you buy two.  Also, the TV is muted so someone can sleep without the noise of a TV in the background or just read while the other watches TV.
p183
aVGreat buy for the money...in fact I own two pair.  My use them in the living room and bedroom for privacy.  Clear and clean sound. Well worth the money.  I enjoy them with music and video.  The distance is incredible.  I can go anywhere in and around (outside) my house and still get good reception.
p184
aVI would leave less than 1 star if I could. What a waste of $75! Totally don't work from the get go. No matter what I do and no matter how I adjust, all I get is static. No sound whatsoever. Shame on me that I let myself get taken. I shop Amazon a lot but may not again for electronics. Flushing $75 down the ****** hurts.
p185
aVBest gift ever for my hearing impaired husband and the house hold that is not!I first became aware of Sennheiser from a singer friend whose wireless mic never failed.  When these easily rechargeable headphones came across my screen it was easy to make a quick decision.  No difficult instructions or hook-ups.  The unly suggestion i can make when charging....make sure you see the red light to confirm you have the earphones charging on the tower.  Quality of sound exceptional.
p186
aVI've been using my headset for a few months now and I love it more everyday.  It was easy to hook-up and the sound is clear and crisp and so easy to adjust.  This is my first review of an Amazon purchase but I wanted others to know how my purchase turned out. If you are looking for cordless listening, check out these headphones and hopefully you are as happy as I've been.
p187
aVAfter asking if these would work with my Samsung 40 inch TV and getting all positive responses, I quickly charged the headphones for 24 hours as instructed, and they were a breeze to install, absolutely no problem at all.  I had previously purchased RCA wireless headphones and had to return them because they just would not work no matter what I did.  So I was delighted with these.  The sound is great and it is simple and easy to use, the charging stand is straightforward, don't have to place the headphones one way or the other, just put them on the stand. I also have a Unistar, which is also excellent for TV, but the band broke so the headset would not sit on my head,  kept falling down.  The Sennheiser is almost double the cost of the other headphones, but they seem to work well from any angle, meaning, I don't have to be right in front of the receiver.  I only just bought and tried these headphones, but I give them 5 stars because they sound great, crystal clear and easy to use, and very comfortable.
p188
aVBought for my hubby who doesn't hear as well as I.  He would have the volume up so loud on the tv that it drove me crazy.  He has a couple friends that have headphones, and wife's say it saved their marriage.  I did some research and reading of reviews, and decided on these. I am not sorry at all, they are remarkable.  My hubby LOVES them, and would surely buy again.  He didn't have one bit of problem setting up, and using right off the bat.  I HIGHLY recommend.
p189
aVPurchased July 25, 2015, Died November 29, 2015.  I was listening to them today, and the base suddenly stopped functioning.  The  step-down transformer at the plug is still working, although it is supplying 10.5 volts DC, instead of the recommended 8.5 to 9.5 volts, so something internal in the base must have worn out.  I have always had the charger/base plugged into the battery backup/uninterruptable power supply I have my computer is plugged into, and the base was never dropped or jostled in any way.  I would have bet on the headphones quitting first, because they have slipped off my head numerous times and crashed to the floor, but they are still functioning normally.  I liked these headphones when they were working.  The headphones themselves are light, feel cheap, but the sound is ok.  Great for doing household chores while listening to the television or whatever.  This is the second set of Sennheiser headphones that have disappointed me, the first were a wired set of "gaming" headphones that had a cheap plastic headstrap connecting the speakers...which snapped like a turkey wishbone when I was putting them on my head, (both sides at the same time, just above the speakers), after only a year of use.  The company's good German engineering is wasted by outsourcing the manufacturing to China.  This will be the last Sennheiser product I purchase.
p190
aVI don't really review products usually, but I've had these for over a year now and just have to say how great they are.  Let's keep it simple.  These have been dropped, kicked around, thrown, and there's barely a scratch.  Very sturdy, great quality sound, soft on the ears (most over-ear headphones hurt my ears after a while, these don't), the charger still works perfect, transmission still great  Only con would be the loud static from the automatic shut-off but at least it tries to save battery!
p191
aVI bought these wireless headphones so I can watch TV at night while my wife sleeps. There is a lot of static no matter how much I adjust the tuning setting. It reminds me of a transistor AM radio.
p192
aVThese work great for television viewing if you don't want to disturb others and also for home exercise such as treadmill, elliptical, stationary bike.  The sound quality is acceptable. If your workout is going to be really active these might slip off, so keep that in mind.  Had a similar pair for some ten years until they started acting up. For what they are and what they do, they are a good product.
p193
aVWe have gone through many cordless TV headphones throughout the past ten years. This is by far the best. The florescent lights in our kitchen do not short the TV reception and turning them on brings up the TV sound without the continued clicking of the units receiver buttons. The volume control could have a wider range, as it goes from soft to high volume too quickly. I plan to order a second unit.
p194
aVI bought these headphones a couple years ago and used them for watching TV just before going to sleep while trying not to bother my wife. Comments: 1) There is a lot of sound that leaks from these headphones...they are 'on ear' so beware of the real difference in sound leakage between on ear or 'over ear' - it is substantial 2) They are not comfortable, don't fit well and if you get up and bend over will literally fall off your head. I tried every adjustment to get them to fit with no luck - was always annoying 3) After two and a bit years they stopped taking a charge. I replaced the batteries but no go. I have just replaced the headphones. So, overall not good marks for the RS 120's from my experience....you get what you pay for and in this case do some homework....upgrade to Sennheiser 165 or above, or, for real value for less money I strongly recommend looking at the Sony MDRRF985RK, which are cheaper, far more comfortable and sound (in my opinion) equally as good as the RS 120's.
p195
aVI've been using these for a year and a half now.  As far as the quality of sound aside from interference, it stands up decently well against studio monitors.  The sound is excellent.  The batteries have behaved well too, they can hold a charge for a good 8 hours for me (and I don't leave them on the transmitter/charger after they charge, it's not good for batteries).  The durability of the parts is great too--I've dropped these a good number of times and the most that's happened is one of the pads has come off (and I just lock it back in place).The reason I know about the durability though is one of the unit's many drawbacks, most of which are design failures that would likely embarrass any engineers with a sense of pride (ie. most).  It comes across like Sennheiser focused more on speaker quality than most other aspects, and while the speakers are great the ergonomics of these headphones for example are awful.  I've had to basically 'train' them by bending them repeatedly to fit my head adequately (by default they squeeze my ears enough to ache after about 20 mins of listening, which is unacceptable).  I have a pretty average-sized head by the way, at least according to hat fittings.  The overhead portion of these should have been built to be adjustable/bendable, and they are not: there are only notch-based length adjustments near the earpieces.  They also slip off most of the time if I tilt my head forward, and they have always done this (before and despite any of my adjustments).  The result is usually hitting tile after dropping from head level, and usually one of the pads flies off.  All it would have taken would have been some time spent wearing these to realize the flaws here.The other issue I have--and it actually makes me avoid using these a lot of the times--is a design feature that comes across once again like it was never tested.  The transmitter/charger is designed so that if there's a sustained period of sufficiently low amplitude/volume in the signal (2 minutes) the transmitter *stops transmitting*.  The logic behind this decision still baffles me, because it doesn't serve any purpose like saving battery life because the headphones stay on.  What's worse by far though is the result--I'll put together a playlist at my system, start it up, put the headphones on, and go about my business (usually chores around the house that music makes more tolerable).  If I remember to keep from pointing my head down and dropping them then all is well until the volume of the music drops below ~15% (at the end of the set, on some songs that have low output for portions of them, or if I have to pause for some reason).  What happens is that after two minutes of silence the transmitter stops and I get full volume static in my ears.  You can imagine the jolt that gives someone at least, it prevents me from ever putting volume above 40% for any length of time, I can't play some low-output music I own with these, and all the time I have them on I'm fearful in the back of my mind of the signal dropping below 15%.  This design flaw is *inexcusable*, especially at this price point.  All it would have taken is some measurable amount of testing.The last issue I have is because of yet another lack of testing--transmission/reception.  The frequency band of adjustability at the headset seems fine, but the transmitter's band is far too narrow, so the signal is more susceptible to interference in an average environment than it should be.  The power output of the transmitter is too low as well, so even close to the transmitter there's audible (very low but still audible) static, and if I wander more than a room away from it the static starts getting in the way of the music.These types of flaws are not acceptable to me.  It's not hard at all to design reasonably according to use, and Sennheiser puts this unit at a price point where there is absolutely zero excuse not to.  The result is unnecessarily overpriced, sub-par functionality.
p196
aVThese Headphones have a much greater range than my RCA WHP RF headphones. The sound is also great. The batteries last a long time before needing a rechargeMy big complaint is the ear pads on the headphones are smooth and they go flying off my head all the time. Other headphones have that ring of padding with a hole in the center to help it to catch on my ear and keep them on my head. If you are like me and rarely just sit in front of your TV or Stereo, you may want to get headphones with different ear pads. I've had mine hit the floor and knock the ear pads right off. I'm afraid one of these days they will hit the floor and stop working.
p197
aVHad a 2007 version of these head phones that last until just last month Oct. 2015 ....these are a cheap knock off....cheaply made...sound quality poor....battery life very short....static noises most of the time.......if you need wireless headphones.....spend the money and get a good pair.....sad that Sennheiser could actually make such junk.
p198
aVvery good quality wireless headphones. the charge lasts more than any amount of nighttime tv that I watch. only reason I don't give this a full five stars is that, when the volume is turned up fairly high on the headset, my lady says she can hear it laying next to me.
p199
aVIt's OK. Maybe somewhat overpriced for what it is. The sound quality is decent for me (not an audiophile), but sometimes there's a buzzing in the background. As others have mentioned, it dynamically adjusts the volume over time, which is sometimes annoying. When playing video games, I usually have to adjust the volume a few times before it stabilizes to some reasonable level. The charger works well. Comfort-wise, it's probably as good as any on-ear headphone I've tried, though as with all on-ear headphones, I find that it becomes uncomfortable after a few hours. I don't have any interference problems.If I could go back, I might try rigging up some sort of 3.5mm -> bluetooth -> bluetooth -> 3.5mm setup instead of this.
p200
aVI like the clarity once you get it tuned in.  That and it eats batteries.  I threw away the ones that came with it and used my own rechargeable batteries.  Sure keeps out noise
p201
aVThe sound is fine, but these earphones are just huge. I have to stay motionless while watching TV, or they'll just slide off my head. I can make them bigger, but there is way to make them smaller, and adjust them to fit better.
p202
aVlove this, I so enjoy them, thinking about getting another set dec.  love them and are perfect for my ears.  so cool I am going to buy another set when price comes back down.  I love these.  so cool  and perfect for my ears,
p203
aVI have a Visio TV model UM_M3D651SV 65\u201d. It has two different ports on the back for audio out but neither work with my RS120. I do have a sound bar attached using an optical connection on the TV. The only way the RS120 works is when I used the ports on the cable box (Uverse).  This is not good because anytime I am using streaming or the DVD the RS120 does not work.  Also I noticed an echo from the TV's sound bar when listening to my headset.  I have check the TV\u2019s audio menu to see if I can turn the ports off or on but did not find anything. Any suggestions?
p204
aVI wish I had time to share more information about the quality and positive results from this product. You won't go wrong by purchasing this and other products from this company. I purchased three (3) sets. The only drawback I have is that I cannot run two separate sets too close together in different rooms because the voice signal cannot be dialed in on the second set. It wants to pick up the set in the other room. All I get is mumbled static in the second set. One set at a time is Super!  Stan - West Columbia, Texas
p205
aVGreat product, if you can keep it working. The charging base, which is plugged into outlet and connected to the TV with supplied audio jack and adapter, randomly loses power and the resulting static is deafening!!! Can't figure out why it does this, but it's very frustrating for my mother.
p206
aVThe first set I sent back because they dropped out continuously. I have the replacement set and they seem to be working okay. time will tell. I will say that when they work they are great.
p207
aVThese Head phones are a big improvement from my Sony Head phones.  No static so just sounds. The best thing though was the seller, Outstanding job as one item was missing  and they sent it out as soon as possible. I did not really know that shipping was a large cost to them  The Headphone is well padded but it does slip off of head
p208
aVPurchased these for my father-in-law after he came to live with us. An honorably-discharged Korean-era USAF veteran and retired factory worker, his hearing has seen better days. For the sake of domestic tranquility, I shopped around for a reasonably-priced, lightweight and easy-to-use pair of wireless headphones for him to use while watching television. Among several candidates, the Sennheiser RS-120's jumped off the page. The price was right, and thousands of positive reviews couldn't be wrong. Without question, for the price, these are simply outstanding. I ditched the no-name AAA rechargeable batteries that came in the box and replaced them with four higher-endurance batts. Rather than replace the phones on the charger stand each night, I keep a fresh pair in a wall outlet charger and swap them out every couple days. The batts are super easy to change (no tools required; just a simple twist-off of one of the ear pads). Bottom line: This is the best money I've ever spent for any electronic product EVER.
p209
aVShouldn't even have a star.  stopped working in less than two months, but too late to return.  No warranty information in product literature, so I guess that should have been a warning.  Amazon shouldn't sell crap like this.
p210
aVThe sound is really good for these, but as a few others have said it's not great that if there is no sound coming through for a few minutes it blasts static into your ears. Sometimes I fall asleep watching a show or movie on our media server and it's not ideal to be woken up like that.
p211
aVI'm undecided on this..worked great at first, but recently it's started to cut out and broadcast a lot of static-type noise when it does so - not fun when you're listening keenly to something.A return may be in it's future.....
p212
aVI am about to purchase my second pair of Sennheiser wireless headphones. If you are hearing impaired and often miss out on words or phrases that take away from the joy of a good movie or program, I highly recommend these headphones. I previously had to turn the volume up so loud that it deafened everyone else in the house. The only static I encounter is when there is no transmission of sound (as at the end of a movie). My second purchase is for use with another device in another area of my home. Since purchasing these headphones, I am thoroughly enjoying my hobby....a lover of movies! And, I no longer miss a word!!!I have recommended these to family members who have purchased multiples also.For the price, there is no better deal.
p213
aVI bought these headphones for my husband...he says they are comfortable, and that he is able to hear all the dialog easily. I had a little trouble hooking them up to our TV, but trial and error paid off.
p214
aVThese seemed to work well the first five weeks, but I didn't really have time to use them much then..ALWAYS constant static interference hissing sound. Speaker goes in and out when you turn your head.The on-hook charging is picky
p215
aVI bought these when I was buying my others I will tell u these are great and won't break the bank , to some they my seem heavy but I don't  know there on I have worn them for hours on end , and they are good sounding and u get good reception I say 100 + feet outside with no interference ,
p216
aVWorks awesome. My wife is a dental student and I can walk over our entire apartment with no interruptions and not disturb her while watching my favorite shows. Great sound quality!
p217
aVFor the cost of the headphones the biggest fault I find is that they are uncomfortable to wear for much more than an hour. The sound quality is good and they are easy to mount on the charging rack.
p218
aVGreat pair of headphones. Charged overnight, installed into a Vizio Smart TV. Installed the connectors into the R & L port, tuned the headset, all good. Tried on an older Magnavox,  found I would need a 2$ adaptor that does not come in the factory box.Overall, happy with the quality of the headset. Comfortable to fit on my brain pan, I also like that the ear phones are not a donut style which would make my ears sweat after a while. These press against your ear very well without being uncomfortable. After using them for a long period of time my ears did not feel squished. Some people have noticed a slight " hiss" to these. I have heard a small amout, never bothered me as it was faint. Remember this is a radio frequency headset, not Bluetooth digital. You want to spend BIG bucks, get a BT capable tv and BT headset just so you doent hear a slight hiss, worth it... your choice.When finished I just laid them back into its charging cradle. Nice design,  good finish, and good sound. A fair price for this product, IMO.
p219
aVI bought these headphones based on tons of positive reviews.  My spouse is hard of hearing and the TV was blasting out the rest of the family.  We got it hooked up easily and it worked beautifully - for one month.  Two days past the one month return period, the unit stopped working.  We double checked all connections and anything we could think of that would stop the unit from performing.  Nope.  Soooo we paid $80 for only one month of relief.  Very unhappy customer.
p220
aVSet these up right out of the box in moments. Works on my TV with the adapter, I have a new Samsung 4k and there is a little "Audio out" plug, looks like what you'd plug earbuds into. Works with the TV volume on or muted.  My only beef is that they are a little big for my small girl head, but if they were tight I suppose they would hurt after a while. Got them to listen to my music without bugging my neighbors and I think for that purpose these are going to work really well. I also walked into another room and they worked great, no static, could still hear my show. I think if you have a big house you'd lose the strength depending on how far you walk away from the receiver, but ultimately that is just common sense and would happen with any wireless headphone.  I am extremely happy with these headphones.
p221
aVI don't want to give a negative review.I returned the product because instructions were not clear. I bought another one from another company. You have to charge headphones completely,after they are charged,the transmitter turn on the green light and then you can hear the audio from the tv. Enjoy.
p222
aVThese wireless headphones look like the ideal solution for private listening to T.V. or music without using wires which could prove to be a tripping hazard.  However they did not work, ( no wireless signal), so I returned them.  Too bad the concept seems sound.
p223
aVI could not get the Sennheiser RS120 wireless headphones to work with my Samsung TV, so had to return them. It is a simple setup, so I don't think it was a problem resulting from my lack of electronics savvy. One other recent reviewer had the same problem.  Gave it only one star because it did not work for me, but want to note that other reviewers were happy with them.
p224
aVGenerally, I am happy with my purchase.  The sound quality seems quite high, and it has allowed my girlfriend and I to live in peace in a one bedroom condo despite our different work schedules.I initially bought these to use at my computer believing that they were over-ear cups -- perhaps the result of a too hasty purchase.  Unfortunately, these do not work to drown out outside noise because they are "over ear", but the inside is a flat foam pad rather than a cup.  However, I hooked them up to the TV and it achieves essentially the same end.Pros:  - Headphones and cradle have clean, uncluttered, and unobtrusive look despite being only a few inches from the TV.  - Easy to charge  - Fairly comfortableCons:  - Tuning seems to drift while watching TV over the course of an hour or two.  It is simple enough to correct.  I don't know if this is a hardware issue, or if there are minor vibrations from the headphones that slowly turn the knob. - I don't particularly care that the foam presses against my ear.  I prefer cups that press against the skull rather than ear-cartilage.
p225
aVI went through several pairs of wireless headphones. The first pair broke after about six weeks. Second pair never work. Amazon as always was great about the returns but those were in the $25-$30 range my neighbor has had these particular headphones for years swears by them recommended them to me. Couldn't be happier. Especially with the rechargeable batteries.
p226
aVSorry - I hate and don't trust those reviews where the person complains about the item.  I always think I'll just try it myself (unless many many people say it's not worth it).  But - - I did not like this item from the start.  I SHOULD have sent it back. Originally only one ear piece worked and it is hard to find the exact tuning in which it does work.  Then I stopped using it for a month or so and now I can't get it to work at all.  I will likely post it on Craig's list for free.  Really not a good product.  I'm going to still look for something else that does work reliably.
p227
aVThese work well.  My husband cannot hear very well & turns up the TV too loud.  He uses these for quiet movies or when I go to sleep earlier than him & this product works.  It was a bit of a pain to set them up though.
p228
aVI bought the headphones to use it for my smart TV located in the living room . To check the sound transmission and sound quality I went far about 100 ft into my garage.  I am happy to get a good quality sound with no interferences.  I am looking to buy another set soon.
p229
aVI bought these for my father who couldn't hear certain sounds when watching television. I hated turning up the volume to a near deafening level so I thought I would give these a try. Other brands had poor ratings but this one had excellent reviews...and I agree 100%  My father wears these when watching television and can now enjoy a program because he can hear every detail!  Better yet, I can leave the set at a level I like. Best feature, if you hook it up right, when the phone rings I can mute the main set but the sound still carries through the headset so my dad can keep watching/listening to the program.
p230
aVI was a little disappointed in these.  Audio is not balanced.  Left headphone is so much stronger than the right.  Not very comfortable.  Awkward power adapter port location.I kind of expected more from Sennheiser.
p231
aVLet me say right away, that these are some good headphones. But if you looking for bass, then these are not what you were looking for. Other than that, these headphones are very nice
p232
aVFabulous head phones. Now my wife can listen to the TV at a lower volume level. It takes a little adjusting to get the frequency right but that's worth the effort.
p233
aVOrdered these for my boyfriend so he can watch football without disturbing me at night. He hooked it up to tv with a breeze. They give out great sound and receive a good signal. He is able to walk around the house and still hear the game.
p234
aVTrouble with static. Volume level has to be too loud for me before TV can be heard.  My son loves it.  He can watch shows while people in household are sleeping.
p235
aVHi, this perspective is not a put-down, this item does what it is suppose to do, no more or less. My view is that it could be better. No instructions of quality comes with it explaining the buttons specifically, it should have bullet points and pictures of those buttons. Also finding a strong signal and hanging on to that signal is weak. For people who listen to serious documentaries it does not work. Sometimes this item signals goes in and out, missing important points. For people who just watch TV it may work for you
p236
aVSound is clean with zero audio to video sync issues. The only time we had any problem was when the power flickered from a storm in our area and it wouldn't turn on. If that happens just unplug it, wait a couple seconds then plug it in again. That's all I did and it's been fine since. It also has a pretty long range, I have gone clear across the yard with no loss in reception.
p237
aVThese headphones exceeded my expectations.  As I have gotten older, I find that I cannot understand all the words that are spoken on TV and consequently have the TV volume very high!  When I walk on my treadmill early in the morning, I had to turn the volume up even more which disturbed my family and even the neighbors when the windows are open.  With these headphone, I can understand every word and don't disturb others.  It is a joy being able to hear clearly!  I highly recommend this product.
p238
aVThey are great, the only drawback is that my elderly mother kept hitting the tune button when putting them on and off. It should be located away from the edge that people use to hold them. I recommend covering that dial once they have been tuned to your TV.
p239
aVWe had the battery version of these before, and they were pretty good. Not perfect - still occasional static and a little hiss when nothing is happening, but overall they work great and LOVE the rechargeable.  The old pair was always dead right when you needed them.  Not these!
p240
aVBought these for my elderly aunt who still lives in "Bedrock" - even though she has the most technologically up-to-date TV, she wanted these speakers.  She is delighted with the sound quality and finds them comfortable.  So, we are both pleased.
p241
aVI have enjoyed the Sennheiser RS120 for 8 years.  My old system still works a little but not to my liking.  I bought this new RS120 and it is working perfedtly.  I am very hard of hearing so this syssem allows me to watch and hear TV without driving my wife out of the house.
p242
aVVery disappointed !! This headphone create massive noise ( i understand that any RF headphones create some level of noise, but in this headphone its bit high ). It create loud noise if TV is paused/stopped for 2 mins. ( Not even 2 mins, this is the most annoying feature of this product ). It doesn't fit well on head, it might be uncomfortable after an hour or so. But definitely, uncomfortable in certain way. Its okay product if you have no other choice for this price. Sennheiser has really great products in RF headphones if you have budget for that.
p243
aVWorks ok. Have interference on all channels that I can not locate. May be from ear set. Since ear piece does not fit over your ear, they slip off easily when moving around while listening to tv. Charging station is easy to use and battery life is good.
p244
aVLove this unit.  Although it is little bulky, the sound quality is pretty good and the distance it covers is phenomenal.  It covers 2nd floor corner room all the way to 1st floor kitchen which is diagonally opposite location.  I was very surprised.  For its price it is very nice unit.  I would definitely recommend this product to those who wants wireless head set.
p245
aVShould get a commission as friends have tried and ordered.  Voices so much more clear. The non hearing deficit person can run the volumn control at normal levels. Heads phones can slip off.
p246
aVI bought two sets of these headphones eight years ago so that my wife and I could watch tv at night without waking up our toddler.  They have worked perfectly for eight years now, and are used daily.After eight  years of daily use, they have begun to develop some problems.  One set is beginning to cut in and out and the other has lost sound in one side.  But we got eight years of use out of them, something I don't expect from an electronic device that's used every day.I'm really glad that they are still available because I'm buying two more sets to replace our old ones.  I hope they will do as good a job as our original ones.
p247
aVThe sound quality is good, but the analog tuning is poor. You can find several settings where the phones work, but some work better than others. The tuning should be set to one or two switch selectable channels at the factory.This is easily done with today's technology. Also, if you wear the phones while sitting in a sofa with metal framework, the phones stop working until you move your head a few inches. Very annoying.
p248
aVElectronically it works quite well.  Controls are easy to use.  I don't like the on-ear muffs.  Can get a bit painful after using for an hour or so.  I do prefer the whole ear cups.  Maybe I will get used to it or find a way to reduce the pressure on the ears.
p249
aVThis is my second set, at my summer address. He first one was not working when we got it so we sent it back. The new one Amazon sent works great. Thank you
p250
aVI just returned them. They simply don't work. I charged them 24 hours as instructed but when I use them, I sit on the coach and watch TV. They disconnect after 10-15min of use. Unfortunately, I tried other models as well, same issue. I have yet to find a headset that really work.
p251
aVEarlier I wrote a review about this unit not working. I want to say that the people at Amazon made it so easy for me to return & even immediately put a new unit in the mail which I received 2 days later. The unit was easy to install after watching the video. On the video they said to set audio to "fixed." I missed that instruction the first time around & now I wonder if that caused my problems. Anyway, my husband & I are thrilled with these headphones!
p252
aVPretty much saved my marriage!! :)  My hubby is hard of hearing, so in bed he's got the TV really loud and stays up late. When he's got these on, I can get my z's and he really likes the quality.
p253
aVI previously owned Sony wireless headphones which broke and were discontinued.  The installation of this set was easy. It lays on the charging cradle easy without any adjustments to charge unlike the Sony. I have a small head, not sure if it will charge so easily if the headphones are set for a larger head. The sound is great better than the Sony pair but they lay flat on your ears not cupped around so outside sound is noticeable unlike the Sony.  I use them for watching TV and sit about 12 feet from the TV. No static or interference so far. My largest complaint is the headphones loose signal once or twice an hour for no apparent reason. It is not from walking around or even movement since I am sitting in the same position. So when this happens you must turn the fine tuner knob on the headphone slightly to re-tune the signal which is not the biggest deal just kind of a nuisance. The headphones do shut down when there is silence for a minute or two which happens when I pause a show to do something else, when this happens you here static in the ear and must switch the headphones off and on again which is also kind of a nuisance too.
p254
aVOriginally tried it with an older flat screen TV, and it did not work.  It was mentioned that it might not sync up with some older sets so you might want to verify before buying.  Since attaching it to a newer TV, it has worked perfectly.  The sound quality is good, and the headphones allow me to move throughout my entire home.
p255
aVThis works very well to help hear the TV whether in a group or in private.  The sound does not bother others and I hear more clearly, what is being said.
p256
aVAttributes: the range on these things is great. I have the base station on the floor of the master. And, I can go outside and still hear the headphones. They are oriented for the left and right ears. But, that's kind of a fault, too.Faults: there is a rotational dial for volume and frequency (so it can sense what radio waves the base station is broadcasting on). What I dislike about these dials is that I put these headphones on in bed so that my wife doesn't have to listen to the TV late at night (plus, I don't have to turn it down super low). Why is this a fault? The dials should be on the front or side of the headphones because the pillows can rub against them. Turn the headphone around, you say? Yes, but then they fit weird because they are oriented for the shape of the standard human head, which happens to have ears on it. I say to the manufacturer: fix this and the headphones will receive higher ratings.
p257
aVPretty good product, my wife has to be in bed early so I have to keep the volume down so I don't wake here, but sometimes I just couldn't hear what was being said on the program.  I purchased this and now I can have full volume so I can hear, but doesn't disturb my wife with the loud music typical in movies between dialogue.  This is really a good set and I like that it recharges on its own.  The only drawback is you have to play with the wheel a little to tune in exactly to the sound, but once you got it perfected, the sound quality is great.  Finding the perfect wheel setting is a bit tricky because if you don't get it right, you get the in and out interference, so you have to dial it in just right.  Otherwise, great product for the money and better than several I tried and took back to the store.
p258
aVI just received this product and was very excited and eager to try it. Then, the DISAPPOINTMENT. I tried to plug the adapter in and it does not turn on.  I should say this is the worst design I have ever seen in any electronics. I don't know what the designer was thinking when he made it. Perhaps, he wanted to hurt the company!. I will never ever buy any Sennheiser product. I would give it zero star (even I did not really have the chance to try it properly).  I spent 90 min trying to insert the adapter into its plugin in the docking base...So stupid design!
p259
aVDue to the RF transmission, you're going to get some interference in any busy city area, but I am always able to adjust my personal electronics that are near the transmitter and tune it in to avoid this. The sound for the price and it being RF is actually of very good quality, and for the price this rocks. I had a friend buy some for his TV watching, and I had a pair of these that I wore out with years of use previous to this set. So, as you can tell, I find them very suitable. I also own a pair of wired Sennheiser PC 363D high performance surround sound that I switch out with these depending upon my computing needs. Such as using these while laying in bed to watch videos on my very large computer screen. Works great! Sennheiser is highly recommended by me. Also, because the batteries are simply rechargeable, you can replace them after a year's use in order to get a longer charge if you've used the first pair of batteries a LOT over the year, like I do.
p260
aVOnly problem I have with the headphones is that the volume and channel dials shift as you move your head during use.  This occurs even with minor head movements.  However,this is a small price to pay if your tired of cords both yanking your headphones off your head and are tired of headphones being ruined by cord eating chairs.
p261
aVBought the wireless headphone for my mom.  She absolutley loves it. Worth every bit of the investment.  The sound quality is great which my mom loves. Enjoy the high quality with no interference.  Have been using it for the past three years. No hitches at all!!
p262
aVAbsolutely the best.  Excellent sound & clarity.  Finally, I can listen to TV without the entire neighborhood knowing what I'm watching.  I have only charged the headset twice in the three weeks I've had them.  I cut them off when not in use and save the batteries.  Do not put them on the charger every time you finish.  Run the batteries flat if possible for best results.  Also, if like me you have a dumb TV, plug into your cable box, not the TV.  The TV mute will not work for the headset so I just take them off.  They are a little tight anyway so it gives my  head a rest during commercials.  Top notch equipment.  Definitely highly recommend for anyone.
p263
aVThis is the second set I have owned.  The first worked fine, but broke within warranty period.  Sennheiser repaired . I'll see about the reliability of these.Th think the sound is very good with these, but I use them to mostly listen to TV.  For the Price they are a good set of cordless headphones that using radio was tech as opposed to infra red.  The infrared ones (various makes etc.) are cheaper and some I have had work very well, the sound is not as rich.
p264
aVWe purchased this product to reduce background noise in a small house while using the TV.  It is very easy to set up and charge the headphones.  They are also very comfortable and easy to use.  The sides are marked with an L (Left)  or R (Right) so you do not wear the headphones backwards (which I did - however, they are much more comfortable wearing the correct way).  We set the volume of the TV to zero (no volume) and they still work.  Controls are easy.  On-Off switch on the left ear.  Signal adjuster and volume on the right ear.  The signal adjuster is used to tune in the signal from the unit.  If you hear static, just move the adjuster until you can hear the sound, and then fine adjust to make sure the sound is clear.  The sound is very crisp and clear - much better then I would have expected.  You can turn them up very loud as well so you do not hear any background noise.  I can walk into the kitchen (next room) and still hear the program.  When done, turn the headphones off and just hang back on the charging unit.  Overall, I am very pleased with the product and would recommend them.  Reviewed by G. Swanson
p265
aVThey have very good sound and good range, since they are RF you don't have to see the transmitter, you can walk into the next room and still listen to your program.
p266
aVMy husband has moderate to severe hearing loss and these headphones work fantastic!! I now can have the TV volume at a normal rate for  myself while he wears these very comfortable headphones and is able to hear also! Before we received these headphones I was always saying " turn the TV down". My only regret is that we didn't have them sooner. My husband wears them for hours and notes they fit great and are very comfortable. We highly recommend!!!
p267
aVthis product is beyond awful, it is disgusting.  It worked for a few weeks with horrible sound quality at best, then it slowly declined to being a pile of useless junk.
p268
aVMy tv is a bit off to the side re: my couch. So lying on the couch, the sound bounces a bit and sounds funny. This system allows me to lay down and get good sound....love it .I do recommend actually looking at the directions as going without the directions slowed up my installation process....sigh.
p269
aVThese are very nice headphones.  We had them set up in just a few minutes and they work great.  We did let them charge fully before using.  My husband has hearing aides and these are as much for me as they are for him.  I can now have the TV at a sound level that is comfortable for me.  We did plug this into our DVR so we could still have sound on our TV.  Our TV didn't have a switch so we could have sound coming from both at the same time.  When we want to watch a movie he just unplugs from the back of the DVR and plugs them into the back of our blue ray player and they work great.  They have really nice sound too.
p270
aVThe Sennheiser headphones were easy to set up and sound great.  I love that they recharge by setting them on the cradle.  The sound quality is excellent.  Some reviews have complained about a hissing sound, but I haven't had any problems.  The headphones are comfortable to wear and are adjustable.  I like them so much that I'm planning to buy another set.
p271
aVJust received mine today.  Five minute hookup to my TV's audio out and works perfectly.  Now I should be able to hear those mumbling Brit actors without turning up the volume on the wretched rear facing TV speakers!  It makes a world of difference.  No hiss whatsoever.  I will be ordering a second pair for my wife.If I had an improvement suggestion, it would be for a built-in mute button for commercials.  I just take them off now.
p272
aVIn the beginning it's all good. You can put these on without disturbing those around you. After about a year, the volume dial would cause one or both sides to go silent or at uneven levels. You have to start moving the dial in a certain way to get both sides to even out. This is going to take some practice because it happens every time you turn on the headphone.
p273
aVOutstanding for our TV viewing. Have it plugged into a Denon AV Receiver headphone jack and it works great. My wife and I have our own headphones and they both work very well through the one transmitter/charger.
p274
aVThis was purchased for our 98 year old mother who is hard of hearing. The sound is clear and what a joy it now is that she can hear the TV without blasting us out with the sound. She now enjoys watching TV again now that she can understand what is being said. The setup was easy and was used as soon as the headset was charged. These have a good range thru the house but we have not tried taking them outdoors. We purchased this set as the batteries in the headset can be replaced easily unlike the Sony set. We use these approximately 9 hours a day without recharging. We put them on the charger overnight and they are ready to go the next day.
p275
aVThis is a fantastic product. I use it all the time. The ability to hook it up to anything allows me to listen to older medias I cannot bluetooth too. I have lots of old audiobook on tape and I can attach this to an old walkman and not have to carry it around/wear it. Great for when you have on athletic shorts that can be pulled down by weight and have no pockets. The charging method is very nice and it has never gone dead on me and I have used it for hours at a time before.The range was more than enough for me I have had it probably 150 feet away outside with the base inside going through one wall. Make sure the volume on the source is turned up or it will not "hear" it and you will get cut outs followed by static. The tuner has 3 channels and I can always get a good signal, however, the middle default almost always works. I highly suggest these if you want something you can hook to a TV, vinyl player, tape deck, computer tower for a source.The sound quality is very good from what i can tell. I have only listen to music with them once, like I said I mostly use them to listen to audio books when I'm working on my guns or hot rod. The bass wasn't like what you might expect from a $300 dollar set of studio headphones, but the overall clarity was very high. Strong highs and mids. I also have no buzzing or static undertones like some of the people have said to experienced. I only get that when I am over maybe 200 feet from the unit. I have it near a window so that may help with the range I am seeing, but once you get to the range limit you will know. You will begin to loose volume and pick up static.The seem average in the durability section, however, I have had them in my shop with all kinds of high speed machines and tools and they do not pick up anything or buzz when near a highspeed tool such as a highspeed belt sander, bench grinder, or Dremel which is something I did not expect I thought all headphones did that. I do not worry about them though. They have gotten very dusty in that environment and I just blow them off with compressed air and they keep right on trucking. I have not dropped them though but I am sure at some point I will.My only real concern I have is the cord at the base of the unit. I worry about that. It does not seem very durable.
p276
aVI don't like writing a bad review but this is only place I can find to complain ... the product worked great the 4-5 times I used it but all of a sudden stopped working and now I am past the 30 day return policy. So if anyway I can return or replace this I hope someone lets me know.
p277
aVThis was a purchase for my husband who doesn't hear everything when there are other conversations or noises in the same room. We are very pleased these headphones have solved that problem. He can also listen and mute the tv if no one else is watching. Wish we had done this years ago!
p278
aVThis is our third purchase for these headphones. Better ones can not be purchased. My husband has connected them to each TV in the various rooms. He could not hear his favorite programs without them. Thank you for carry such a great product.
p279
aVGreat product!  The sound is far better with the headphones than without.  I had TV ears, but the batteries were expensive and difficult  to repace, much less, trying to install it.  Excellent pricing for a fabulous product!  I am more than satisfied with this product and the service of delivery from this company.
p280
aVUsed primarily for TV media. Audio and technical performance is excellent. A little heavier than IR models, but very acceptable for late night viewing without disturbing your honey. One minor  glitch, user issue is that the tuning and volume thumbwheels are basically identical and within an inch or so on the back of the right ear cup. This make them easy to confuse and throw the tuning off instead of adjusting the volume (which can happen more if you're laying on your back, head on pillows). So then, you have to retune of course - easy, but a little annoying. Minutia number two is the auto-off 'feature' - "If the headphone output level is too low, the transmitter automatically switches off." Sounds great, right? However, the headphone RF auto-tune starts to sweep up and down looking for a signal to lock on to - all with a static filled roar with a kind of a beep which I assume is a result of the sweep resetting itself. So, if you're just drifting off and the media source shuts down from end of program or auto shut-off (sleep timer etc.) be prepared for the wake up call.
p281
aVPros:- works like average headphones when connected to a computerCons:- would not purchase- does not work with HDTVs- picks up interference- staticI purchased these headphones to listen to recorded lectures on our tv while my wife slept but I quickly found out these do not work with HDTVs. I connected it to my computer and it works okay. There is interference with my neighbors' phone and some static. I am not very happy with my purchase.
p282
aVSounds good once you tune them in.  Only complaint is if the sound  source temporarily muted, after a minute, the transmitter turns off but the headphones do not sending static blasting into your ears.
p283
aVI am hard of hearing, especially in noisy environments.  I wear hearing aids away from home.  It is often noisy at home, and I like to watch movies late at night when others are sleeping.  This Sennheiser provides excellent audio whether TV sound is turned up or not (separate feed for headphones).  Tried TV Ears brand, but batteries do not last and the device is not durable. Highly recommend this one.
p284
aVThese headphones are great! Good sound quality, no interference and comfortable for long periods. I just plugged the audio cable into the headphone jack of my Yamaha A/V receiver and the power cord into a 110 volt outlet and I was ready to go. I originally thought I would only use these phones when watching TV late at night or when watching noisy programs like auto racing. ( Which my wife doesn't like!) But. I found that I wear them often now for regular programming when I don't want to disturb others with my choice of programs.
p285
aVThese headphones exceeded my expectations. The sound quality is crystal clear.  I can go from room to room and the sound remains the same. The headphones  are comfortable on my ears.  I like the design and the power and volume are easy to control. These are the perfect headphones for watching  tv or listening to music....
p286
aVArrived quickly and as described. I bought these headphones more for me than my husband. Our bedroom connects with the living room and I couldn't sleep if my husband wanted to stay up and watch tv. They work great! Only problem is they don't work when we use our Fire Stick.
p287
aVDecent quality and range, and reasonably comfortable.  These are not by any means noise cancelling, and are not going to be satisfactory for any real audiophiles -- but they aren't meant to be either.The main disadvantage for these headphones is that they use an analog frequency adjustment which isn't always perfectly reliable.  Walking around an upstairs room for example it will sometimes jump from normal, to super loud, to soft, to static depending on the signal strength.  Fine-tuning the 'channel' often helps, but such is the nature of this device.The headphones supposedly operate on an FM 900mHz frequency, so in theory the base station can also be used to transmit audio to other FM receivers in the house, though I have yet to attempt such.
p288
aVWhen there is no audio signal, this headphone produce very loud, deafening, scary sound. I have to remember to turn it off when I pause a video. It is really annoying.Not recommending to any one. I am returning it.
p289
aVWork great, no problems.  Wife can go to bed and I put these on and she can't hear any sound from the tv.  Really clear sound, easy to set up.
p290
aVSennheiser RS120 On-Ear Wireless RF HeadphoneI returned this item three times. I was unable to make it work. I was referred to the manufacturer by an Amazon specialist. I was not able to follow up at the time. I will try again.
p291
aVI've had these headphones for over a year and love them! Our daughter and SIL needed wireless headphones too so I bought the same set again as a gift - they love them!! Easy to set up, even for the non-technical. Great to be able to watch TV and not disturb someone else in the room. Sound quality is exceptional and the wireless distance is very good, even through walls.
p292
aVI purchased these headphones as a birthday gift for my husband and he absolutely lives them! He came go all over the house including upstairs and still hear the tv with great sound. I love them too because now he can watch his favorite programs without disturbing me\U0001f60a
p293
aVTotally worth the price. Great quality, easy to set up. Fun to use. My wife freaked out when watching "The Walking Dead" while using this system for the first time. She was able to hear subtle creepy things with the headset (comfortable) that she never was able to hear with our very sophisticated theater sound system.You will love this. You can watch TV and the house can remain virtually soundless for others.
p294
aVThese work great. Now I can be in the same room as my hubby, and not have to hear the TV turned to full volume so he can hear, Just wish it had a MUTE button so he could mute the commercials.
p295
aVSaved my in-laws marriage. Just kidding...But really, this along with two other purchases (Insten Digital Optical Coaxial Toslink to Analog RCA audio converter and a Digital Optical Audio cable) allowed my father in-law to watch his shows at night without waking up my mother in-law. The new TV we bought for them only had a Digital Optical audio out.
p296
aVLove the fact that these headphones are not line of sight.  Can go anywhere in the house or out to the mail box and not miss a beat. Far superior to the TV EARS I used before
p297
aVThis product certainly met my expectations! My husband & I frequently want to watch different programs & even though the tv's are in different rooms the sound transfers. With him using the headset we can both have a pleasant viewing experience.
p298
aVIt came ahead of the scheduled time so that was very nice.  It was a breeze to set up and it has been working perfectly.  The old tv ears I had became unusable when the battery door broke.  The Sennheiser has fantastic sound, deep rich bass and clear highs.  I can wear them anywhere in the house (two story 1750 square foot condo) and get perfect reception.  The old tv ears would drop reception if I moved my head quickly or stepped out of the den and they would retune to another station if there was a loud noise on the program I was watching.
p299
aVSound is great from the headphones. While watching TV, I get more out of the program because I am hearing more through the headphones. I do wish they gripped my head a little better but it's really not a big deal. As far as the slight "white noise" sound I have seen others comment on....I don't hear it! Great for watching football at night while the wife tries to sleep!
p300
aVHallelujah! Best thing I have ever bought my husband. I can now watch the TV with out yelling "TURN IT DOWN!!!!!"  Whew do I feel so much better. Happy wife, happy life!
p301
aVThese headphones are going back as they are pretty much unusable. No amount of tuning seems to get rid of the constant hiss, and when you think you've tuned it to a minimal hiss, you move around a little bit and suddenly you get extremely loud interference.The design is poor as well, as the tune wheel is directly next to the volume wheel. Even if you think you've found the sweet spot tuning wise, you go to adjust the volume and it's super easy to adjust the tune.
p302
aVI've had these headphones for about 13 months now.  For the most part these work very well.  The complaints about the hissing sound when there isn't a radio signal is normal.  Those folks are probably too young to remember when TV stations went off the air overnight and all you got was static snow on your TV.  As long as everything is turned on they sound fine.  Working the volume and tuning knobs took a little time to get used to but it's not a huge deal. The complaints about them being too big and falling off are valid.  I wear a size 8 hat and these things flopped around quite a bit.  I hooked on some over the ear pads from an old set of hearing protection muffs and they stay on fine now.  These aren't studio quality headphones that will satisfy the audiophile snobs, but they work great for TV watching.  They work in stereo and they separate out the sound on the TV show.  You can hear a car pass you by or a door close behind you.  Pretty cool.  I just wish they fit a little better.
p303
aVThese seem excellent. The set up was easy. The product is well-made and looks great. The reception is very good.I just love them! It is a great addition to my tv watching!If there was any room to improve them, my suggestion is to make the volume control larger, and easier to locate, since it is right next to the tuning control. The problem is that the volume control is used a lot, but the tuning is only rarely used. These two controls should not be identical, and so closely located.
p304
aVWe have had this unit for about two weeks and it will be returned shortly. The unit works sporadcally. Nothing we can do will have it work through an entire t.v. program. We called Comcast to see if it was out t.v. that was the cause and they told us we were not alone in this complaint and that it was the Sennheiser and not our set. I would not recommend this to anyone.
p305
aVI've owned these for almost ten years now and have been using them almost daily. They still look like new but the on/off contact switch is starting to give out. They required no maintenance whatsoever.PROS:+ Great sound. There's plenty of volume with a nice range throughout.+ Comfortable & lightweight. I can wear them for hours on end without any sweat or ear pain.+ Good range. It's after 30 feet where I would start getting some signal loss.+ Did I mention durability? In my experience it's not often that an electronic product lasts that long with daily use.CONS:- Some slight hissing. It's noticeable when the music stops but otherwise imperceptible.Color me impressed. These turned me into a Sennheiser fan.
p306
aVThis is best buy ever for me. I like to listen to my movies real loud. Wife always used to complain.This wireless headphone is a life save :)Easy to setup.Comes with a rechargeable battery. Headphone will rest on the stand, which also acts a charger.Audio is pretty good. Gives you a complete movie feel
p307
aVClarity and range are very good. The weight of the phones is very light.  One caveat regards the tuning and volume dials.  One problem is the difficulty in finding them on the right earpiece while using them.  They need greater separation.  The tuning dial is very sensitive.
p308
aVThe reason I do not like it is because when I tip my head forward, the headphones topple off of my head, and I cannot seem to find a way to remedy.  It actually does not seem to fit my head at all. That is my only complaint about it.  It does have good sound.  It is just that it will not stay on my head.
p309
aVAfter reading reviews on a bunch of headphones, I chose these Sennheiser RS 120 & am extremely happy with them.  At first it was great. Then after a while the sound was really low. I soon realized I needed to adjust the "tune" button & BOOM, it was even louder & in surround. So if anyone has problems, just adjust the tune button & it will work great!!  When I first plugged the cables in my TV the sound was off on the TV & only on the headphones. After re-reading the reviews I found if I plugged them into my cable box, as someone suggested, the sound was through the tv & the headphones! The sound is absolutely amazing!!I really love these headphones!!! Some of my TV channels seem to be lower in volume. With these,  I hear without having to turn the volume all the way up. I feel like I am in a theater.  I hear things I normally wouldn't  & much clearer with these headphones!!!  I highly recommend these!!!
p310
aVWas looking for wireless headphones that my husband could use while we are both watching tv. They work fine when its just him, but there is NO volume what so ever for me if we both watch. Disappointed.
p311
aVThis set works great, but you have to pay attention to the directions. When I set it up all I could hear was static. I did not realize you had to play with the tuning dial  to get it to work. Once I figured that out it works great. The only bad thing is you have to play with the headphones to sit properly on the holder to get it to charge correctly. That's why I  only gave it four stars. They had phones are good but not wonderful they work great for me
p312
aVPretty good sound and easy to setup, however headphones do not stay on your head. Considering the price, brand could have done better job at designing headphones that can allow user some sort of movement before falling off the head
p313
aVThese were for my wife's benefit. I wear 'em; she's happy. Seriously, they work quite well, and the sound quality is pretty good. Not quite up to the comfort standards of the best headphones, though. I like not having to replace batteries, but how long the rechargeables will last is unknown.
p314
aVAfter visiting with my dad for two days and yelling over the tv, I decided to look for headphones. My dad has had the tv so freaking loud for at least 4 yrs. This past visit almost put me over the edge. I researched/Google cordless headphones and decided on these. FANTASTIC choice!!! It is so quiet watching any program now. NO fights, yelling, screaming, headaches, words under my breath, etc...Its actually a very pleasant experience watching tv with my dad anymore.  He is soooo happy AND so is everyone in the house and on the block! It took literally 2 minutes or less for me to hook them up and get them working perfectly. It took longer to open the box. My dad walks around like king chit from room to room not missing a word. You can adjust the volume on the headset to your preference.  The tv itself can be on low, high, or mute and he can still hear it according to his headset volume. My mom wishes someone/anyone would have purchased these yrs ago. It would have saved a lot of headaches and nights of fustration! He is taking them to my house when he comes down to visit. They are THAT easy to install. This is in the top 5 products I have purchased on amazon.  UPDATE as of 11/30/15...The product is STILL fantastic!  My problem is the price dropped $10 in less than a month which does not make me happy!!
p315
aVI really enjoyed these headphones.  I use mostly for late at night when little ones are in bed and you don't want to wake them.  Also helps with movies that are very conversation driven, but for some unknown reason everyone speaks extremely softly or is whispering.  They don't have a lot of powerful bass output, so they may not be preferable to certain types of music, but on the upside, explosions and loud bangs in movies won't blow out your eardrums either.  Charging is as simple as putting them back on the stand.The only reason I didn't give 5 stars is the long term comfort.  After a two or three hours, you will feel the need to take them off for a few minutes.
p316
aVThe best purchase I ever made. I've worn hearing aids for years but could not understand half the shows on tv. Most times because of the overly loud background music drowning out the conversation. I guit watching certain shows because of this. With these I hear every word.
p317
aVMakes for an extremely pleasant existence. This is my travel set and keeps the family happy when we visit. I do not miss anything and my wife is extremely happy. A++
p318
aVThe sound quality was excellent.Once I figured out how to adjust the set.The headphones work well even when I'm 30 to 50 feet away.I haven't left the room more than once or twice but it's always received excellent no matter where in the house I was.I highly recommend these headphones.
p319
aVThis is the second Sennheiser product I have purchased and I am totally thrilled. Their products are far superior to what I was using before. Very well engineered, excellent quality workmanship, and at a price that is remarkably modest.
p320
aVI heard wonderful things about these headphones but I'm disappointed.  They're too big, and I can't make them smaller.  When I look down, they start to fall off.When I turn off my audio source for a couple minutes, I hear an awful loud buzz blast my ears.  The noise catches me off guard and  scares the heck out of me.They aren't any better than my $19.99 Radio Shack earphones.
p321
aVVery nice to use with computer and tv. Comfortable to wear and good sound. Only issue is there is significant background noise especially for quiet passages in music. For the money it has been a good pair for me.
p322
aVThe tutorial is annoying and really not necessary, man that guy likes to hear himself talk! Once installed and using them I was amazed. I never realized how much I was missing. Being a huge Cowboys football fan I could hear them in the huddle making calls! All I can say is that you don't know what you are missing if you have trouble hearing or the family gets annoyed at how loud the volume is when you watch TV. The quality is fantastic it's like being in a movie theater.
p323
aVSound is ok if you sit still near your smart TV. But the range is poor and connection drops out when you move around the house. (And we have a small house, less then 1500 sq. ft.) Headset becomes uncomfortable after a 1/2 hour of use. Volume and tuning controls are awkward to use because of there small size.
p324
aVI got these for my 86 year old mother, did a lot of looking around and reading reviews and these always came up as some of the best wireless ear phone as simple and well made.  My mom loves them, has stopped her needing to turn the volume up too loud when we visit her. I'm almost jealous sometimes, may have to order a pair for myself at some point.
p325
aVI bought these along with a supplemental set to hook up to my TV so I could turn the volume up loud without bother my neighbors.Setting it up was easy, and figuring out how to use them was simple, so I have no complaints there.The sound quality seems very good in general. However there is a whole lot of background hissing. There is a tuning dial that allows you to tweak the connection to the base, but no matter how carefully I tuned it I couldn't eliminate the hissing as well as some crackling and popping. If you're watching something that has constant noise above a certain level, you probably won't notice it. But if you're using it to play video games, or during conversation scenes, you'll definitely hear it. It gets worse when you move around or even turn your head in certain ways sometimes, I guess because the connection to the base is pretty fragile. I was able to still listen to things from the next room over, but it was hit-and-miss. Sometimes it would be fine, sometimes I'd get a lot of crackling.Also, they aren't very comfortable to wear for more than half an hour at a time.I'll be returning these shortly.
p326
aVWhen they did work, they worked well. The transmission distance is great around the house. I actually don't get much interference normally. But when a song cuts off and I haven't hurriedly switched off the headsets, POW right in the ear with that insanely loud static. I'm just like OK. it's not getting a signal but Jeez, you'd think the manufacturer would know that this is probably unworkable for some people. I'm sending these back because now, I can't get audio at all just that hissing noise.
p327
aVHi, It took a little time to get it adjusted so as to get the best reception. The key is to reade the instructions Completely! I currently use it for my TV, and the sound is quite good.
p328
aVThe Good: Great Sound, Long Range, Wireless ChargeThe Bad: Auto Shut-off, A Little BulkyI have never reviewed anything before, but these headphones are definitely worth a few words. They have some great features and some unfortunate ones, but overall, they do exactly what they are designed to do, if you set them up right and understand how to use them properly.The base station is lightweight and sleek, and acts as a wireless charger for the actual headphones. This is a great feature, and really well designed. The two metal contact points on the headphones sit gently on the metal rest of the base station. Nothing plugs into the headphones, ever, and they never need batteries replaced. All you need to do to charge them is put them back where they go. A red light on the front of the base station lets you know that they're charging.The base station itself connects to a traditional power source via a small adaptor that, nevertheless, takes up two slots on a standard surge protector. If you have a lot of devices, you'll need to put it at the end ;) The audio runs via a male rca cable, from the base station to your audio source. That is extremely convenient, since it is the standard for most consumer audio products. With an rca to stereo mini adaptor, you can use these cans for pretty much anything.I purchased them as a gift for my grandmother, who is elderly and hard of hearing. I wanted her to be able to enjoy movies and television again without having to crank the volume or risk missing out on things. When I was there to set everything up for her, they worked like a charm.I have to admit, I was shocked myself at how clear the audio signal was. The bass is full and heavy, mids are solid, and the highs are crisp and clear. They work equally well for music, movies, and live television. They get LOUD. Louder than I expected. Loud enough for my grandmother. There is a frequency and volume control on the right side ear of the headphones, so you can make adjustments on the fly. On the left ear is a power switch. Simple, convenient, and user friendly.These are not Bluetooth. The base station broadcasts the signal from your audio device via radio transmission, directly to the receiver on the headphones. You can select a channel from a switch on the front of the base station. As long as the headphones are properly tuned into the broadcast from the base station, and within the very generous range (300ft), the sound is surprisingly good.  Get a snack, go to the bathroom, get the mail...you won't miss a beat. Keep the base station away from lights, power cables, and speakers, and there is very little interference at normal volume levels.I was able to use the output from my parents' television and set it up so that the headphones received an audio signal, even if the volume on the tv itself was turned all the way down. Eureka! Nana could watch a movie with the rest of the family or on her own without disturbing anyone else. I also thought they'd be great for watching tv while on the treadmill, but, alas, they're a little too bulky, and slip off soon after you start running.The biggest drawback of the Sennheiser RS120's is their Auto-Shut off feature. It is a confusing and frustrating experience if you are not well-informed about how it works. THIS IS IMPORTANT, and may be a deal breaker for a lot of people: if the headphones don't detect an audio signal after just a few minutes, they will stop sending a broadcast signal, and you will be greeted by a rush of loud static in both ears. It's an unpleasant surprise, but something that can be avoided altogether with minimal effort.After my mother called to complain that the headphones were no longer working, I took them home to see what was was happening. I hooked them up to my guitar amp to test them out. At first it was amazing. I could practice at night without waking my wife and son. I was able to play anywhere in the room, free from another tether to the amp! After a short break in playing, though, I lost contact with the base station and got the static full force.It was obnoxious and baffling to think that such a stupid feature would be included in something so well-designed in every other aspect. Why? WHY?? From what I've read in other reviews and online forums, it is for compliance with FCC broadcast regulations. Well, ok, then. Moving on...Other reviewers have offered up suggestions for dealing with the issue, and I want to make it clear that it has nothing to do with where it is plugged in or how it is powered. It is just designed this this way. One reviewer's suggestion for dealing with the problem was to crank the source audio, effectively tricking the base station into thinking it is receiving signal when nothing is actually playing. It works, but is not always practical for every situation, and it forces you to listen to the extra gain under your sound track.For me, the auto-shut off is not a deal breaker. Everything else works so well that I've learned to deal with it. A green light glows on the base station when you are broadcasting sound. When it is off, you'll get only static through the headphones. If you know this, you can proceed accordingly. When you pause your movie to go to the bathroom, you simply switch off the headphones before you lose the signal. When you come back, press play, and wait for the green light before switching them back on. After using them regularly, you'll do it automatically.It was the Auto-Shutoff that compelled me to write a review of this product to begin with. It makes them too complicated for my parents (let alone my grandmother) to use, unassisted. I get a lot of use out of them myself, and when we know that Nana is coming over, I'll bring them and set them up for her. In the meantime, I'm happy to finally be able to watch movies late at night when I get home from work. I'm thrilled to be able to play guitar at night without having to hunch in the corner like a troll.Unfortunately, now I owe my grandmother a new gift. She's so difficult to shop for.
p329
aVPerfect match of high quality and tolerable price.I have absolutely no complaints on this product.  Works throughout my apartment (even in through a couple walls) cannot say for multiple floors as I do not have multi-stories.  I have used them for 4-5 hours straight and only then did they start to irritate my ears/head but to be fair I have a really big head.  The battery has never been a problem even after that 4-5 hour stretch.Sound quality is probably around 8-8.5/10 even though the price is way less than how much you can spend on sennheiser headphones.This is based on a scale where I cannot imagine any headphone unit could achieve more than 9.5/10 considering the bass limitations of being laid upon your skull.My aunt has a pair of 2 year old sennheisers that, at the time she bought them, cost more than my laptop itself, and they didn't seem any better than these.
p330
aVI bought these to watch TV in bed at night to avoid keeping the wife up. They work decent for this purpose. Frustrated that when sitting 20 feet from the base unit I get background static. Have tried all the channels and tuning options. Disappointed in them but not bad enough for me to send back. Sound quality is fine for what I need them for.
p331
aVI own this item and use it while watching my favorite shows. Instead of turning the volume up to hear the dialog I place my tv on mute and use the headset. I am pleased with this item and have recommended it to several friends. As a matter of fact I purchased this set as a birthday gift for a friend.
p332
aVPros: It works. It's RF so it works through walls. It uses replaceable rechargeable batteries.Cons: You have to tune it. I have never heard of this before. It should tune itself. To make matters worse, the tuning knob is large and just below the volume knob. It is very easy to accidentally turn the tuning dial when reaching up to change the volume. Then you have to tune it all over again. My preference would be to not have to tune it but if they must have it, they should have made it smaller and located it away from the volume control.
p333
aVPretty nice headphones.  Was easy to connect to my Samsung TV.  However, every once in a while I hear a loud popping sound.  Not sure what is up with that...otherwise it a great wireless headphone.
p334
aVThese were for my mother in an assisted living facility. She did not like turning up her television so loudas to bother her neighbors and these headphones work perfectly. She can also hear the phone ringor someone knocking on the door while wearing them which is a huge plus.
p335
aVI love these.  They allow me to listen to loud TV when the kids are sleeping.  I also like that they sound good around the house.The only drawback is that the tuning to the various channels is manual and near the volume, so I find myself adjusting the tuning instead of the volume.  Also wish there was an option to stop broadcasting when the unit is on the base.
p336
aVMy husband uses these on our main tv on the first floor and likes them. They are not sound canceling but for us that's ok. I have a tv in our open loft and we just had dueling tv volume levels. This way we can both listen to our own tv in comfort. Only criticism he has is that when he gets ip from the couch or bends his head down they have a tendency to slip off out of position. Not a big issue for him.
p337
aVMuch more comfortable than the TV-Ears I am replacing.  Great quality.  Only issue is a scratchy ticking noise when there is quiet, i.e., no audio.  Fit is comfortable, setup is a no-brainer.  Great product and price.
p338
aVWorks fine. However had problems at first. I found the trick is to adjust the volume on the TV to near maximum BEFORE using the headset controls. Then use the volume control on the headset to reduce the volume. If you have the TV volume set too low, and try to raise the volume with the headset control, you will get only static. The headset needs the TV volume set high in order to provide a strong enough signal for the headset to function.
p339
aVthe noise drives my crazy.but i knew i would face problem like this before purchasing  it!still i recommend it if you are person who likes to watch TV so often and not longer than 2 hours.
p340
aVMy husband is happy with them.  Wished both ear phones volume could be adjusted as he is hard of hearing in one ear but not the other.  We thought there was a problem with them - but it was operator error!  Would buy again!!
p341
aVI have a hearing loss and have used wireless headphones to watch TV for the last 14 years.  I now have hearing aides but find I like watching TV much more with the earphones.  My last set gave out and I decided to choose the Sennheiser RS 120.  The set up was very easy.  The quality of sound is very adequate for watching TV and movies.  The earphones are very comfortable.  I have been using the earphones for about a month so I have no review on the longevity of the earphones.
p342
aVI bought these headphones for my grandpa, mainly because he wanted to listen to his music channels on the TV louder than my grandmother wanted to listen to them.  For their application, these headphones seemed to be a good option.  After getting the headphones connected to the TV, plugged in, and ready to go (which was relatively easy), we tuned in the frequency of the unit and my grandpa was listening to his mellow, sleep-inducing instrumental music as loud as he wanted.  You do not have to worry about volume issues, as they can be turned up very loud.It should be clearly stated that these headphones are not made to emulate surround sound, but rather just provide stereo sound of whatever source you have them hooked up to.  While the distance was good (anywhere within his apartment he could use them) and the setup pretty easy, there are a few shortcomings with this product.  The contacts that keep the headphones charged on the base are just big enough to go on the metal rods.  If they're not placed on the base unit properly, they will lose connection and not charge.  In addition, the frequency dial on the headphones is a little too accessible and can be fumbled with on accident from time to time.  Neither of these issues are cause for alarm, but should be noted.Pros:+ Good wireless distance+ Powerful enough to provide good volume+ Comfortable to wear for extended listening sessionsCons:- A bit pricey- Charging contacts can be finicky- Frequency of headphones can be changed on accident at timesWhile I personally would've tried to purchase a pair of headphones that have some additional features, for what my grandpa needed (to listen to his TV), these were a good option.  After an easy setup, they work very well, are reliable, and provide good volume.  In addition, they are comfortable enough to wear for a prolonged amount of time.
p343
aVVery portable!  I love these headphones.  Once you've tuned them to the frequency of your receiver, the sound quality is great.  I've been able to walk as far away as my mailbox (at least 70 feet), and I've not lost any sound quality.
p344
aVI have had the headphones for over 6 years and use them dailey 4 to 5 hours, same batteries , product still working GREAT would HIGHLY recommend, can't beet for late at night and sports events.
p345
aVTo bulky, if I look at my feet they will fall off. Lots of static and interference. The transmitter is about 10 feet away. They sit on a cradle when charging and when they form to your head when you do go to charge them they may or may not charge or charge intermeditly due to the poor charging design. I would not recommend these to friends or family. For the price you can find better quality and ones that fit, charge and sound better with much less interference and static. I read mixed reviews and was hoping most of the negative ones where from picky people but that wasn't the case.
p346
aVNice to be able to watch TV without disturbing my husband. My only concern is that the on/off light does not stay or come on when watching, therefore not allowing me to listen. I have to unplug all connectors to TV and unit to reset it to initial settings. It then works for a few days then I have to repeat the reset procedure. This doesn't seem right. When the headset is working as designed it is wonderful.
p347
aVThese are great sounding, lightweight headphones. They are plagued by an intermittent issue, however, that is very frustrating. Despite there being ample signal from the TV, the transmitter will, without warning and very irritatingly, lose power causing the headphones to blare static. Then, anywhere from 30 seconds to a few minutes later, the green power light on the base will come back on and one is able to hear the broadcast again.
p348
aVWanted to like them, but kept running into the same problems as others. The auto off feature is ridiculous and only half implemented. The idea to turn the transmitter off after "idle" time is not necessarily bad, but it should send a signal to turn the headphones off first or they should auto off by the same conditions. Otherwise you are met with loud static directed at your ears when your device is quiet for a few minutes.The reception adjuster knob is not the best, can't quite get the sweet spot. Either the set had a nice volume but a low hiss during quite times, or the volume doesn't get high enough and you get crystal clear audio. You kinda get to choose what works best for you, I guess it's nice they give you choices.In the end, I'm keeping them, mostly because I got them for free. I like the charging/transmitter base idea and it looks good holding them up on my desk. The sound can be great, and they are fairly comfortable.
p349
aVThis is a good device to use,so other do not get disturbed when you are watching TV  at night.It has been very comfortable and convenient. To use. I use it every day and night.
p350
aVOnly fair, they're cheap plastic covered and make squeaky noises unless you hold absolutely still -so annoying in bed when trying to be quiet and it detracts from the audio. Bulky when trying to lay on a pillow, not that comfortable, controls are tiny, if volume set really low it'll drop the signal connection and scare the crap out of you with loud static suddenly. not something I'd recommend....pluses? -charges relatively fast and convenient to drop onto the stand.
p351
aVMy husband is hearing challenged, and this helps him immensely.  It has also helped us avoid divorce, because he can listen to a TV show and I can read sitting next to him.  It's well made from a company with a reputation for making quality products.  Many cuts above a similar product by a different manufacturer which turned out to be cheaply produced, but with a hefty price tag.  Totally recommend it.
p352
aVWe bought two sets and are very pleased, I more so than my wife. We have one plugged in to the DVR on channel 1 for watching TV. The downside was that it wouldn't get sound for our Roku when watching Netflix or Amazon. The only audio out on my TV was a digital optical so we bought a digital to analog converter, an Orei DA34 recommended by Sennheiser and that solved the problem. Now the audio comes from the TV rather than the DVR so it doesn't matter if we are watching regular TV or streaming content with the Roku.
p353
aVUse these all the time.  I bought them because I couldn't understand Sherlock on "Elementary" due to his quiet voice.  Works for anything I want to concentrate on....good sound, good battery life and good range.
p354
aVThe charging station is great and when the battery gets "memory", you can easily find a replaceable AA rechargeable battery. Great headphones for hard hearing people at a great price. I wish I purchased this first before buying the "TV ears".
p355
aVWell, a slight overstatement never hurt.  I've got three of these hooked up to the tv, radio, and computer.  I can listen without disturbing anyone else.  I don't use the base unit charger, as it's pretty slow.  I just swap out charged Eneloops.The range is amazing.  The sound is clear through both floors of our home, and over the entire lot while cutting grass.  The only problem I've had with distance or hiss, is when the batteries get weak.  Otherwise, the sound is great, although I'm no audiophile, and mainly listen to talk.
p356
aVGreat headphones, I bought them to watch TV while my wife was reading. I can turn the sound all the way down on the TV and adjust the sound on the headphones.
p357
aVI have to admit, I was skeptical when I ordered two of these.  I have had wireless headphones before and could always here static or they faded out after an hour or so.  I moved into a huge loft apartment, and using my huge surround sound was just a way to piss off my neighbors, so after some intense research, Sennheiser was quoted as the best many times over, and I wholeheartedly agree!!!  WOW, was I surprised at how easy these were to set up and use.  And the clarity and perfect surround sound is amazing.  I can now watch a movie at MY volume level, never have to worry about my neighbors again.  I bought two transmitters, one for my 3D t.v. in one room and one for my theater t.v. in my main room.  The headsets move from one to the other perfectly.  Being able to just set them on the transmitter to charge up is wonderful.  I have used them for up to 8 hours at a shot without recharge, didn't get uncomfortable, very soft on the ears/head, and the battery was still going strong.  I now use them for digital music and have wondered to every edge of my 2600 sq foot place and NEVER EVER got a single sound of static.  If you want GREAT sound, GREAT comfort, GREAT price, etc, etc, etc,  BUY THESE or one of Sennheiser's other models.....worth every penny!!!!Sennheiser RS120 On-Ear Wireless RF Headphones with Charging Dock
p358
aVExcellent headphones! Deep bass, crisp high notes. Comfortable feel, especially like the fact that it uses standard rechargeable AA batteries. The stand doubling as a charger is also a very, very nice touch. This sits at my desk at work, and compared to my old wired headphones, these give me much more mobility and freedom to move around. Highly recommended!To those who may take issue with some "hissing", I think I have figured out why. As you tune the radio frequency, you'll come into some frequency bands that have a high volume but has hissing accompanying it. Tune it further, and the volume goes down (a bit or quite a lot, it depends on the headphone), but the hissing goes away. If at this point your volume settings are not at max, you can tune the volume up and get fully rich sound without the hissing. Try it, it's awesome :).
p359
aVI had bought a different set of wireless headphones before I mad this purchase and they quit working within the first 3 months, butthese have held up well with great sound and volume.
p360
aVI really like them.  I am hard of hearing so I need them to hear and to keep from blasting everyone out of the room because I need so much help hearing.  They have good tone quality and they are comfortable.
p361
aVGreat headphones. I use them with my tv at night to listen wirelessly. The quality is very good compared to other headphones at this price range. Very good product for a great price. Highly recommend.
p362
aVLove these headphones!  Easy to hook up ... worked perfectly .... sounds great!  They will come in handy when our "hard of hearing" friends come over to watch TV, or when anyone wants to watch TV after others go to bed.  So happy with our purchase!
p363
aVI am well pleased. This is my second set. The first set came in dead on arrival from another seller who promptly refunded my money in order for me to buy these. The tones (base and treble) are wonderful and the sound level is exceptional. I am able to listen to my computer and T.V. (with the help of a splitter) while everyone else is sleeping. Great product.
p364
aVI've had these now for a couple of months. Their good and fit well. And they charge while docked. My hearing is extremely poor and I could have used headphones with more volume. When the voices are soft and low it's quite difficult for me to hear them. I wanted to test wireless headphones at an audio store but could not find one. Best Buy and Radio Shack are not set up for testing. If anyone knows how I can find a headset with loud volume please let me know. Also, what would one look for under product description to find out how loud they go?
p365
aVThe quality of sound was very good but for me personally they were uncomfortable being on the ears instead of over the ears.  I wear glasses and after a short period of time my ears were aching.  After much more research and two pairs of headphones later I think I have finally found the best all around ones for me.  Though I've only had them for one day of usage the Sennheiser RS 175 over the ear has comfort, excellent sound and additional features to enhance bass or surround sound for movie watching.  They were a little pricier than I intended to spend but the quality has eased my sticker shock.
p366
aVI received these three weeks ago.  They worked very well, but in less than three weeks it does not work at all, not even static.  I replaced the batteries, let it charge for 24 hours and it's still deader dead.  VERY DISAPPOINTED.
p367
aVThese headphones are great!  Good sound, easy setup, and work for quite a distance.  (I can even wear them as I take the trash to the garbage room down the hall in my apartment building and still hear what I am watching on TV even through the closed door and the distance!)
p368
aVThese are made cheaply  have horribly sound.  I bought them because of the higher reviews on here, so yes I am disappointed.  I guess you get what you pay for. Now after a month they dont work.  All i get is static.  Too late to return them.  I am pissed off at all the people who gave great reviews.  Do not buy these!
p369
aVI love it! Just what I wanted. I'm an early riser and wanted to watch TV but not disturb anyone. I had bought some  Cheap ones(Wireless Headphones) in the past and if I'd move from the room I'd lose the TV and pick up radio stations. It was REALLY frustrating. These aren't top of the line but they are comfortable and worth the money.
p370
aVNever knew my hearing was that bad, not only was it hard to understand some dialog on tv at times but using the RS120, I am able to hear background sounds and dialog that I never new were there. Clear reception, no hissing. Don't know why I waited so long. Plan on taking them along when we take the RV out that way I won't bother the wife while she watches a show in the bedroom and I'm in the front area. Well worth the money. After a full charge they work for nearly 18 hours continual use.
p371
aVI don't know what everyone is raving about!I have had these headphones for years now, and the only reason I kept them was to use them for audiobooks and podcasts. There is a massive amount of background noise and if you are a fan of music, the sound quality will drive you crazy. TONS and TONS of static.I you truly are into music and care about sound quality, these headphones are not right for you.
p372
aVThis product cost a little more than expensive than a cheaper product I got at Wal-Mart. The one from Wal-Mart had static all the time and I always had to fiddle with it so we took it back. The Sennheiser RS120 was many times better quality for just a small amount more.
p373
aVThe range and clarity of this product went way beyond my expectations.  No need for clear line of sight and the signal penetrates through walls and doors. I literally can walk around the entire house and listen to music from my entertainment system. Lightweight and comfortable. Job well done, Sennheiser!
p374
aVOne of the best purchases I've ever made! My husband (with headphones) and I can now sit comfortably in the same room. He likes the volume loud, and I can have complete silence while reading a book. They recharge while not in use, so no worry about running down batteries.
p375
aVVERY EASY to install.  Simple plug and play on my Samsung LED TV.  These things work far better than I expected.  The sound quality is great.  It's actually kind of crazy the details you can pick up as opposed to our current sound bar.  I bought these primarily as a way to watch tv without disturbing my wife at night.  Now I want to use them all the time!!!
p376
aVThe headphones I received were tilted forward about 20 degrees, so they slid off my ears every time I leaned forward.  The headband is tough plastic, and would not bend straight.  I like them otherwise, but I bought them for my treadmill, and there is no way I can use them for that.  They would be fine for listing to music in a reclined position, but that is not why I bought mine.  I'm forced to return them.I still have an old pair of over-the-ear Sennheiser headphones I bought circa 1970, and those are great.  I've replaced the earpads many times, and the cord once.  I was hoping Sennheiser still had the magic, but I guess not.
p377
aVEnded up returning it. The transmission between base station and headphones are analog RF - and very susceptible to jamming. I work in an engineering lab and it's quite RF noisy. I could not get any channels to work cleanly.In addition there was something wrong in the phono plug adapter and it kept dropping the connection - which manifests as screaming loud static in my ear randomly. I'd be jamming along with my scratchy / noisy dance music and SCREEECCHHHHHHHHHH that would try to blow my ear drums out. Couldn't get it to work right. I've changed to bluetooth headphones and those are great if I'm in range.
p378
aVReally excellent headphones, great sound and fit.  I've had no trouble with tuning or static and the sound quality is superb. It also has great support videos and directions. (If you're plugged into a headphone source turn up the volume to 90%, better to use a line out port if you have one.  An adaptor is needed for digital optical.)
p379
aVI'm generally pleased with these headphones in every respect except that, being an on-the-ear type, I find that after an hour or so my ears become uncomfortable and I have to take a break.  I bought these for use with my television, so that I could increase the volume to compensate for my slow loss in hearing without having to make it annoyingly loud for other people in the room.  I works great for this and the price is very reasonable for a product of this quality.
p380
aVShould have bought this years ago .excellent sound , I do not bother my wife by repeating "what did they say ". .best thing we bought in a long time . She can read in silence while I watch my TV programs and do not disturb her
p381
aVFairly good unit, and meets most of my need.  It certainly works well, though I don't use it at any serious distance away from the wireless reciever, so that part has not been tested to any limit.
p382
aVOnly because I have a very complex audio/video/tv setup, I needed professional assistance with the Sennheiser RS 120 setup. It is now performing flawlessly just as I and my wife had hoped.
p383
aVClear sound, even as I walk room to room. Easy to set up, and easy-to-reach telephone support help if needed. Very happy to be able to hear my favorite loud shows and music without disturbing my neighbors!
p384
aVTook a while to figure out how to tune these...you need to go really slow to find the tuning section, but once it is tuned they work great. Now I don't have to hear the tv on late at night when I am sleeping and he is up! I can still slightly hear them from his headphones when he is wearing them, but not enough for it to bother me...it is quiet....
p385
aVWorked great for just over 2 years of very minimal use, then just stopped working inexplicably less than 1 month past the 2 year warranty.  Worked fine the few times I used it, maybe 100 hours of use max.  Pretty disappointing.
p386
aVThe headset generally meets my expectations.  However, there is a three-channel variable frequency control on the headset that can lose the signal from the TV transmitter if it is accidentally touched, or moved when one places the phones on their head.  You then have to retune the frequency knob to find the signal.  This is much like a sensitive radio dial on a transistor radio..
p387
aVFar from German Quality. The headphones had some interference sound while on. While they are "on" and there is nothing playing they will start to sound like an old TV while it is displaying snowfall. They are extremely uncomfortable! There is no place for your ears which means that they are squished. The charging base feels super cheap and really light. While picking up the headphones from the base the small magnets on the charging plates are able to pick up the base. Price is $80 but they are not worth any more than $20.
p388
aVThe only downside I have for these is that they are hard to relax in and if you have cartilage or new piercings they may hurt them if you lean on something too much. The ear pieces are not well padded at all. But Everything else about them is pretty nice.
p389
aVI have been struggling for the past (3) weeks without much success. The 'green' light comes ON initially, then goes OFF within 3-4 mins.No success in trying to increase the audio signal to transmitter as recommended by Tech Rep, Carlos Z.Want to return merchandise for full credit. Please advise - HOW TO procedure!
p390
aVPerfect, Makes hearing the tv much easier for my husband.  The TV can be normal volume for the room and he can turn up the headphones to suit him.  Perfect for hard of hearing people.
p391
aVI purchased this for my mother who is hard of hearing. This product did not work from the moment we connected it. We attempted to contact seller and have not heard back.This is now in a box, on a shelf in my closet.Guess I'll use it as a paper weight.
p392
aVI have never submitted a review before but I can't pass this up.  I am in no sense an audiophile, just an older guy with diminished hearing.  I was losing most if the dialogue in movies so I tried everything from higher quality speakers to ear buds to headphones.  I had quality problems with the ear bud system and the first headphones did not have rechargeable batteries.  The RS 120 successfully addresses all the problems and reproduces sound with a fidelity quite acceptable to me.  I also purchased an auxiliary headset which I alternate on the charger and it works just fine.  Set up is easy and quick and, all in all, I am completely satisfied.Bill T - Bend, OR
p393
aVI don't like to provide negative feedback but feel compelled to provide some caution.  While the audio quality reproduced ( when clear ) is very good and the range of the RS120 is excellent.  Unfortunately I must concur with other reviewers regarding the failure of the unit to allow the operator to fully tune out the Wifi, Cellular, and general radio frequency noise they pick up is a show stopper for me. There is obviously some lack of filtering, shielding or other engineering design issue allowing the unwanted signals to get into the audio inputs. I would suggest one could live with the background hiss once an audio source is playing, however the large static crashes and RFI picked up make them unusable and I give them an overall 1 star.  I will experiment with some clamp on ferrite cores on the various power and audio cables in hopes I can keep the stray signals out of the unit but given the amplitude I am hearing from the RFI and static crashes, it is doubtful that will work. I promise to return and post an altering review if that proves successful. I will say though this headset is almost there, just not quite for a price approaching $100bucks.
p394
aVSecond Sennheiser product yet disappointed again.Cons:- The static noise is too noticeable to enjoy music, especially ones that are relatively slow paced and quiet.- Sometimes slight movement of my head causes the volume to go up and down, causes sudden burst of static.- If I temporarily stop my music, the transmitter turns off and I get hit with a loud static noise.Pros:- Cheap.- The charging/transmitter is very convenient.- Light and somewhat comfortable to wear.Replacing it very soon and will probably never buy Sennheiser again.
p395
aVWorks well. Much more defined sound vs the TV speakers. Less TV noise that my wife appreciates. Holds a charge for hours of use. If I had a complaint it would be that the ear piece sits flat on the ear and not cupped to go over the ear. Good value for the price.
p396
aVI waited to write a review after I had a chance to fully test my new Sennheiser wireless headphones. After several weeks of using them, I must say, I am extremely happy with all aspects of this product! I mainly use them at night, after my fiance goes to bed, so I don't wake her when I watch a movie or play a video game. I am using the headphone adapter to plug the base into the headphone jack of my stereo receiver, which is where I have all audio routed to (TV, CD, PS3, Record Player, Computer, etc...).First off, the headphones sound GREAT, in my opinion! The audio is very clear, and it has a good balance of bass and treble. Neither are overpowering, much like a decent pair of studio headphones...pretty even across the spectrum. I do not notice any "hiss" or feedback when there is audio present, but there is a little hiss when your audio source is silent (like during loading screens for games, or dvd menus). This goes away once audio is playing. I watched a couple of action movies the other night, and the balance between the music, dialog and sound effects was perfect. Also, when playing games, the audio was crisp and balanced. In fact, I could hear a lot of background sounds in the movies/games that I wouldn't have noticed when listening to them without the headphones on.The headphones have a power switch on them, as well as a volume control and a channel tuner. The channel tuner is used for "tuning-in" the reception from the base, in case you are getting static (not for tuning in radio stations, etc...). The volume control works great, and can be used even if the volume on your audio source is turned down low. I have read a few reviews from people who mentioned the volume being adjusted accidentally, when they would lay down on a pillow or something. I have not had this happen yet, but also have not totally tried wearing them while lying down...I have only rested my head against a pillow while on the couch, and have not had any issues like that. The only negative mark I could give it would be that after a couple of hours or more of having them on, the headphones do start to become uncomfortable on your ear. There isn't a lot of padding on them, and they do not fit over the entire ear. But, it isn't so bad for me that I would deduct a star from the review.The range of the signal seems to be very good, and works great for my situation. My front room is fairly large, and I have been able to walk around in it, and into the kitchen without any issues. I would say it is at least 30 feet away from where the base is located, and even when the signal would be passing through a wall. So far, so good. Occasionally, I will get a quick "hit" in the signal when I turn my head a certain way, but it goes away almost instantly. This has happened when I was sitting 5 feet from the base as well, so I'm not sure if it is quick interference from another device, or actually coming from the base. It is definitely not something that is horrible, though, and shouldn't worry anyone thinking about purchasing it, in my opinion.Ultimately, I couldn't be happier with this purchase! The price is definitely right for what you get, especially when compared to other similar products. Plus, being in the video production industry, I have always relied on Sennheiser to deliver quality audio products, and this is no exception. Good clean and balanced audio, high volume, great range, and easy charging make this a great buy.
p397
aVUPDATE AFTER SEVERAL MONTHS OF ATTEMPTED USE: This strikes me as a cheap analog tuning design from the mid-Twentieth Century.  Does not even have a old time "squelch" circuit to protect ears from loud hash when user is tuning but signal is not yet locked (and seems to require retuning each time turned on).Although it sometimes has excellent sound quality when "locked", it usually has an annoying "pulsing" noise during quiet audio and often has to be reset by unplugging power.I would never buy again.
p398
aVOverall, I like these earphones.  I can hear the TV without my wife telling to turn the volume down! They are comfortable and get the job done. In fact, she asked me to buy her a pair... made a great birthday gift. I do have a couple cons:  1) the Tuning knob is difficult to use because you have to turn it such a small amount to go from scratchy, bad noise to good sound.  It is easy to bump or turn by mistake.  2) They tend to slide off my head when I bend over the least little bit.  I think that if they had over -the-ear pads on them they would stay on better.
p399
aVMight be returning this. We are going to give it about a week and see if we can get the sound to come in evenly on both ears, it seems one side continually comes in stronger than the other.
p400
aVMy wife thinks this is the best thing since sliced bread !  With my hearing loss I have to turn up the volume on the TV very loud to hear.  Since using this the wife is delighted that the TV is at a "reasonable"sound level !
p401
aVThis headset works great. I am amazed at the clarity of the television audio, things that I haven't heard in a very long time: distant car horns, ice tinkling in glasses, children laughing in the distance, etc. My only reason for giving 4 stars instead of 5 stars is that the headset gets a bit uncomfortable during a full night of TV viewing. It's just a little tight. But that's not enough to not buy one for anyone. I'd purchase this unit again!
p402
aVI Purchased a Sennheiser On-Ear Wireless Headphone several years ago. This RS120 apeares to be exactly like it except for the new model No. change. I was able to use the head phones on the old sending ad charging dock,which I have saved as a back up in case the old one fails. Had I known that they were compatible I could have saved a few dollars by just ordering the headphone without the docking unit. Still very satisfied with my purchase.
p403
aVBought this for my dad and he loves it, he originally had it plugged into the amp but I plugged it straight into the DTV box and he said it sounded better.
p404
aVWe bought the headphones because my wife and I live in a one bedroom apartment and it's nice to be able to do two different things without disturbing one another. The headphones have great sound but I don't love that the radio dial is not digital and that it's on the same side of the headset as the volume. Sometimes I want to turn the volume up and I hit the radio dial which changes the station and the noise is not pleasant. They are comfortable to wear but if worn for the length of an entire movie my ears feel really hot like I have ear muff's on in the summer.On the plus side it was very easy to set up once we realized we needed to plug them into the computer and not the surround sound or tv. Daily access is so convenient because you don't have to unplug them from anything in order to use them. They just sit there, charging right on the metal stand, until you are ready to use them. I am  happy with the product overall but I look forward to updated models.
p405
aVThere is something basically wrong with these headphones.  As the green light which is supposed to come on when it's connected to a power source just never showed, no matter how much I tried.  After charging for 24 + hours, and connecting to the TV, it doesn't work at all.
p406
aVMy system:LG TVDenon AV recieverATT UverseRokuGoogle chromecastStatic noise is the issue.Worked beautifully when ATT Uverse channel selected.When Roku or chromecast selected the static noise was intolerable.Also, if there is no transmitted sound for almost exactly 3 minutes (maybe you have paused the program) the static noise BLASTS you out of your chair.------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------Update: 9/8/2015The main reasons we wanted headsets were:1. We wanted separate volume controls.2. We wanted headsets when we found that, despite our expensive Bose surround sound system, when watching, as an example, movies with British accents, we had to turn on subtitles. But with good headsets that problem pretty much disappears.After trying these headsets (and one other cordless type), there was just too much fooling around. We didn't particularly like the two controls (volume/tune) on one side since it is too easy to accidentally tweak the tuner. And as mentioned above, there was way too much static noise when we selected Roku or Chromecast.Also, we found that we preferred the 'on ear' type since they are more comfortable and noise attenuation is not important when you are in your own TV room.So I did some more research and came up with a near perfect solution (for us). Enter the BEHRINGER MICROAMP HA400 ($25) and a coupla Bose on-ear (wired) headsets (about $100 each) . Its a simple little amplified box that is placed near your favorite TV watching chairs. I ran a cable under the carpet from the A/V receiver to HA400. Both head sets then plug into the HA400. Its so much nicer to reach over and turn 'your' volume control on the HA400 than fooling around with the wheel on the headset. Of course, it doesn't matter now if we select Uverse or Roku or Chromecast we get a clean static free transmission. (With both wireless sets we tried we would even get some Ham transmissions from time to time). Obviously we had to give up the freedom of the cordless sets but that is the only downside.Constant clean sound reproduction, zero static, no headset charging, no remembering to turn off the headsets.
p407
aVI am hearing impaired and I have been using Sennheiser Head Sets for years and I love them.  I have recommended them to four or five of my friends and they have all called to thank me for telling them about this product.
p408
aVDidn't realize they were hooked up to a base.  Bought them so I could listen to music on my bicycle,  didn't work.  I actually bought a record player and I use them for that.  My wife doesn't have to listen to my horrible music.  Win,  win,  won.
p409
aVSo far it has been working great. But you never know sometimes in three wks. Ends up in garbage. Look at my ratings for 2 or 3 I believe we purchased. 1 star on 2  and the two other brands  I purchased started with a 5 but all of a sudde
p410
aVI have a DVR that goes to my AV receiver then to the TV.  If you hook it to the AV Receiver jphone jack plug it shuts off the speakers, and My wife wasn't happy with that, so I hooked it into the TV itself in the Audio out plug,  That works great.  I take my haring aids out when I use the earphones as the pressure on the ears with the aids behind them is uncomfortable after a few hours.  From a sound standpoint, this is the clearest sound I've had in years!  I hear things in programs that I have never heard before and the voices are so clear that I never miss a word like I did with only my hearing aids.LOVE THEM!
p411
aVI'm easy. If a product meets my needs I rate it highly and this product does that, but, this is a replacement unit sent to replace one that failed after three weeks of use. I still give a four rating because the replacement came quickly with no fuss and the replacement unit is performing flawlessly. Time will tell.
p412
aVExcellent headphone.  I've roamed around my house and yard while listening with this headset and always have excellent  signal reception.  The rechargeable battery lasts for a good amount of time; I've used the headset for 6-7 hours straight when fully charged and the audio signal was loud and clear.  I'm very satisfied with this item.  .  .  .  :^)
p413
aVQuality of the headphones is good with pretty decent range but sound quality and ergonomic is not good at all.  Don't try to pick up something while you wearing these because they just gonna slide off your head.  Sennheiser can do better
p414
aVMy own fault for not jumping right on the return wagon, but really thought it was my lack of knowledge in hooking them up. Which seemed relatively easy. I should've known when I first plugged them in and tried to rest the earphones on the charging dock and the red charging light did not illuminate properly that something was wrong, but again doubted myself. Then plugging them into the tv, reading all the instructions on how to connect through Visio audio, still they do not work. The audio connect light oddly lights up briefly when the tv turns on, but no audio is heard through the headphones at any time. Eventually the green audio connect light just shuts off and I'm left with static.I'm very unhappy that I only had 30 days to decide how to work these things.
p415
aVKeep falling off my head. I wish I had gotten the Over Ear version.  Reception is good and clear, even through walls! RF Transmitter failed after a power outage making the unit worthless.
p416
aVVery pleased! Sound is noise free and is just as true as the TV that the cable box I have the headphones connected to. Range is at least as advertised. I went outside the house and never did get out of range. It is comfortable to wear. What else can I say. I am very please with the purchase.One improvement that I would recommend that would make a great product even better would be to make the ear pieces able to rotate. That would make the already good fit even better as they would make perfect contact with the users head.
p417
aVThe headphones did not have good reception unless I stayed in the same position ?  I also did not like how they fit me.  I was using an older model that  fit well.  Overall I was disappointed and returned the  product.
p418
aVDoes not work directly into  digital TV.  Had to plug it into TV satellite receiver for it to function.Figured that out myself after several TV salesmen told me no way will it work with my TV.
p419
aVMy Dad loves this, only issue is charging, it does not make proper connection and he has to place something on headphones so they charge. I don't think this should be correct
p420
aVI would not have paid the original price for these (about $200) because they are basically plastic and a little bit flimsy. I'm really not certain how durable they are.(one star off for that)...but at this lower price I'd say they are worth it.They worked right out of the box and as described and are still working fine.
p421
aVAfter a few months review. it is so hard to tune them to the right freq and it's always noisy... will never buy again RF headphone and anything this company also.
p422
aVi bought these headphones to be able to watch TV shows in the same room as my husband, when he's working and can be distracted by the TV sound. Our TV is outdoors, and gets signal from a cable box inside the house using wireless HDMI - about 30ft away from where we sit, and through the exterior cement wall of the house. After reading some other reviews, I was worried the sound quality would be poor and that I'd have to return them, but the sound quality is great and the lip/voice sync is better than with the wireless HDMI hookup. The setup of the headphones was very easy - less than 5 minutes to get the batteries in and connect the base to the cable box indoors. Overall, I'm very happy with them!
p423
aVI bought these for my mother, who was turning the volume on the TV so High, no one wanted to watch with her.  Now she can here and we can all enjoy our favorite shows to gether again.  Thanks
p424
aVPoorly designed? Why the transmitter receives signal when plugged directly into a cable or satellite box and not directly into the television.  Unable to use when viewing blue ray movies as well.
p425
aVThese are akward to wear.  I bought them so I could listen while working around the house - cooking, cleaning, riding the exercycle, etc.  Due to the design if I even bend over slightly they fall off and there is no way to adjust them.  Sound quality and ease of use is acceptable.
p426
aVBought these for y husband several years ago and they still work perfectly.  Read all the reviews on head phones, and this one rated high, and did not disappoint. He watches TV is front room and I watch in family room, Works for us and I cannot hear his TV.
p427
aVThe power plug from the wall unit would not mate properly with the receptacle on the rear of the transmitter unit.The plug would not fully seat down in the receptacle. A gap between the plug and receptacle was clearly evident. The power light on the transmitter would not come on no matter how firmly we pressed on the yellow plug. We tried twisting the plug while turning but it would not fully seat. I am very disappointed in this product and its manufacturer as it appears that a quality check may  not have been made before the unit was shipped. I have already shipped a previous similar item back because it was listed on a page with wireless items and it was not.
p428
aVI am giving this 3 stars with the hopes that people may actually read what i got to say. Do NOT buy this headphone set! I used for a day and packed it for a return with the speed of light. I am a musician. My ear is trained to sounds. The white noise you are about to experience with these headphones is going to drive you crazy. No matter what the frequency you set the dock at - that noise will be there, lower, or louder, it is there and does not go away. Another thing i absolutely hate about these headphones is all the wires that they take in order to function. When think wireless you don't expect a ton of wires. The dock needs to be plugged into an outlet. It is retarded. One would think the dock would charge and then function without being plugged in at all times. Think about this- wanting to use these headphones on your laptop- you have to tie down your laptop to the dock, which is wired to the wall making your laptop stuck at a very rigid position. Cant do much. Defies its purpose. And even if you lets say hold your laptop sitting right next to an outlet- there are wires all over you. The padding on the headphones feels cheap like an 80s walkman. These headphones also do not seal very well. Everyone within 3 feet radius will hear exactly what you are doing. And there is no bass. God, if you listen to anything with a deep bass, these headphones sound like they are about to fall apart. And of course, just like everyone else, i found the tuner nob right next to the volume absolutely impractical. Lets say you laid down on your couch listening to an audio book, if you moved a little too much, chances are, you'd hit that tuner and the clarity of the connection goes to hell. Last but not least, they are unreasonably stupid expensive for what you get. I paid an extra 10 $ and got a pair of studio AKGs that come with a 3 meter cable instead. Best decision ever. Just like these were the worst decision ever. Sennheiser have another pair thats like 29$ and that pair is not wireless but it is miles better more durable and sound efficient than these disgusting waste of money headphones.
p429
aVhttp://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B0001FTVEK?redirect=true&ref;_=cm_cr_ryp_prd_ttl_sol_0Good sound for sure.However, the cord from the base to plug-in has totally disintegrated.  Little pieces of cheap plastic all the way down the cord to bare wire. To repair they need to be rewired.  I called Sennheiser and there is no recourse.  You must pay to send to them. Pay them to repair cord pay then for return shipping.  They do not stand behind their product very disappointing and expensive!Would never buy their product again.
p430
aVThese were definitely my favorite style/model of headphone by SkullCandy. Sad to see that they have been discontinued :( I had my last pair for a good 4 years before my son snapped an earpiece. The one thing I might upgrade in regards to this product is wireless capability. I would still purchase this pair over a newer wireless pair though. Thanks for such high quality products, SkullCandy!
p431
aVI ordered these as a gift for my brother because he produces music and is a huge miami heat fan. I figured what a great way to combine both of the things that he loves sports and music. He used them when producing beats. My brother indicated that he loved thie sound quality of them, however he didn't use them that often as he obtained so better quality studio headphones. Overall I would say due to my brother liking them I will give them four stars. They are a decent set of headphones, not high quality though. I would recommend them to anyone looking for headphones on a budget or just something temporarily.
p432
aVI purchased this as a gift for Christmas. My cousin loved it! Great price for a great product. We tested it out and it worked great. It is cushiony and comfortable to wear. He uses it all the time! I also like the color compared to the others (easy to match with outfits). It doesn't look or feel cheap. Great for the price. I would definitely recommend!
p433
aVI bought these as a gift but they looked pretty well built and substantial. The item felt fairly heavy in the packaging so I'm not sure how comfortable it would be to wear it for longer periods of time.
p434
aVMy teen son likes these headphones.  Sound is good and the discontinued price was great.  Good for a child or someone on a budget.  Padded headband was comfortable.
p435
aVI remember when I use to have a pair like this five years ago, but I don't remember them shattering within a week. The extensions for the headphones broke after 1 week of usage.
p436
aVThese amare knicks headphones have a quality build and feel but for actual use disappointed me quite a bit. For one the sound was ok not amazing and I found my self having ear pain in just 10-15 minutes of use. I am a 6 foot 3 230 pound male with a large head the headphones barely cut it for my head size and large ear size.
p437
aVThese headphones are great.  The cuff over the ear blocks out the noise and keeps the music in nicely.  The color and style are as pictured.  These work great and the cord is sturdy when taking it in and out.  Great product.  I gave it a 4 of 5 because there was an older rasta style I was looking for that they no longer carry.
p438
aVgreat for the price! bought under used item saved some $. the only thing is it does not have a volume control. But otherwise pleased with my headsets by Jay-Z. Great on the bass very cushioned on the ears really comfy love it. I am from New York and we all know the knicks is nothing to brag about but New York City sure is!!!
p439
aVThe sound that the skullcandy's produce is fine, but the production quality is very poor. Between myself and 3 boys we have owned several pair of skullcandy headphones and they have all broken. Stick with sennheiser the quality is much better.
p440
aVThis product lasted for about a year before the sound went out in one side. Im keeping 5 stars because skullcandy willingly replaced these headphones with another set. Great sound quality. Would purchase again.
p441
aVLove them they sound really great, and I have them since 2012 and they still sound as good as the first day, this is one of the best purchases I have ever done :)
p442
aVThese are decent quality headphones that are affordable. They are not noise cancelling. The plastic head adjustment broke after a 18 months, and the ear pads are pealing near the outer crimp.
p443
aVThese headphones lasted me such a long time! it was sad when the wire messed up one of the speakers in the ear and one side was out. It has been 3 years since ive had these and nothing happened! the sound is loud and covers the full ear. play option on the line itself also.
p444
aVi liked these a lot when i first got them. then a little on down the road, they started breaking around the extension piece from putting them on my head. theyre cheap and flimsy feeling, and not durable at all, like most of candy's stuff, but they do look cool. theyre not comfortable to wear from an extensive amount of time. (after 15 minutes, your ears start to get sore) they came in perfect condition from the seller, so its not their fault that these broke like they did.
p445
aVI have owned these headphones for nearly a year now and thought I could finally put my opinion on them for the public. My initial impression of these headphones was "these headphones have way less bass response than say, my pair of beats" - which I no longer own. They do, and if subwoofer range bass is your cup of tea, then a pair of overpriced beats may be the headphones for you. These headphones are very balanced in their approach. Discerning ears may be able to hear or notice that they may have too much treble response, which can sometimes be slightly shrill, but in this price range - there is some legitimate give and take as to what you get. These headphones are extremely durable - my dog got ahold of them one day and pulled the ear piece off the headphone itself and it slipped right back on a lot easier than I expected. I travel with them quite often and they are in my suitcase and they have held up to the test of time. I took a full star off due to the treble being slightly shrill at times and the fact that if you are a warm blooded person they can heat up your ears and cause some uncomfortable experiences. As I said, I sold my beats headphones after finding these. I am sure there are better headphones out there (Sennheisers, etc) - but as far as performance, stylish design and everyday wear and tear - these are practically unbeatable in this price range.
p446
aVPlease save your money. The sound quality is good on the headphones,however they are poorly made. This is the second pair of Skullcandy Hesh Headphones I had purchased that cracked. The adjustable headset is poorly made. I promise you will only get 6 months out of these headphones, which is a bad investment.
p447
aVReally recommend these headphones. Durable, noise cancelling and straight out badass.The only problem I have with it is after a while the small ear muffs hurt your ears, and also that is has a non-removoble cord so if its shot, the headphones are done.
p448
aVGreat headphones, fantastic sound and they cover your entire ear so they block out most other sounds (i use them when i mow the lawn.) Plus they're comfortable and stylish, i would go with these as opposed to the ridiculously overpriced beats.
p449
aVThis is probably the best head phones for the money that u can get, stylish, durable and with an incredible sound and bass, I had these since 2012 and they have been through a lot, countless 8 mile runs, a 9 month deployment in Afghanistan,I throw them every where, I sit on them some times n they r still  sounding like new. Although they don't look like new anymore but that is because I basically beat them up. If u r a looking for a great pare of headphones that are durable, good looking, sound amazing at a reasonable price well these are it.
p450
aVi bout this item new first time i used dint work only one side work  to bad that the police for exchanged to short i wish there were i consideration for the seller n exchang the item i dont want the money just one that work.
p451
aVI had these for about a year now. They broke not that long ago. Maybe like 3 months ago. I was really sad that they broke. My dog kinda broke them. Nut they were really great. They were just really good headphones and I really loved them. The price is worth it. If I had the money, I would have bought it right now. I unfortunately wasted all my money at the strip club and I'm broke. But you should buy it! Aye buy me one while ur at it bro
p452
aVSo I've had these for a little over a year and they are great, next best thing to actually buying noise canceling. One word of advice though... Check out some place like Ross or Marshalls first, as I got this exact pair for $12 in a discount bin. They are great headphone, just do a little looking and don't spend $150 on them.
p453
aVThe sound quality, The microphone, The comfortable fit. & The design. It's a great buy for the price it is. The value in the qaulity out weighs the price you spend.
p454
aVIt just hurts your ears like anything. The sound quality is decent to well below average. Poor noise cancellation. When I'm riding the bus, the whole of bus listens to what I'm hearing to. The material is sturdy, though.
p455
aVI love Dwayne Wade, but this is just degrading regardless of the representation as a headphone. What it says isnt all true about the thing, bit it does at least transfer the song
p456
aVI bought these mostly based on price and the microphone and somewhat on reviews.  They seem to work OK, but I find the round over-the-ear design doesn't fit my ears very well (they're more oval ;) and the clamping force is pretty high, although not terribly so.  I only gave them 2 stars because from the very first they sounded "muddy" to me.  They play plenty loud and have plenty of bass, but the sound is just muffled, or something.  I have other inexpensive headphones that sound better to me, so I wouldn't go with these again.  I should note that I have mostly used them with an adapter cable to plug them into my computer(s), so it's possible that the adapter could be causing the bad sound, but I did plug them directly into an Android tablet with similar results, so I don't think it is the adapter.
p457
aVgreat quality headphone's.  my 6 and 8 year grandson's loved them.  easy to adjust.  they used them on the computer, and there tablets.  he loves monkey and he's a bit devilish.  i loved how the headphones state on top "be good tomorrow"  the only thing i would change is make the cable on the headphones 2 foot longer.
p458
aVWas a pretty good purchase. Although, it didn't have much bass. Part of this is my phone, but not all of it. In other words not the best bass but sounds great otherwise.
p459
aVOur son is a huge NBA fan and he loves these headphones!  He uses them all the time in the car to listen to movies he likes on the DVD players we purchased as well.
p460
aVHead phones look just like the picture, but they do not last. I used them frequently while traveling and it slowly started coming apart. the foam over the ears and where they connect with the plastic comes out easily. Was okay while they lasted.
p461
aVI bought these for my teen and he hasn't complained yet. They do not have the wireless effect that other do so the cord does not detach. I wish I would have known since the others have a detachable cord with a mic for your phone.
p462
aVI went through two pairs of these in one year because they both got shorts in the cord. they also both broke right above the earpad, but I could still use them after duct taping them. (they both broke within a month of owning them, not because I stepped on them or anything. I had to adjust them so they wouldn't hurt my head, and they broke from that, which is kind of ridiculous. they really shouldn't have been that easy to break.) Basically, they're really painful to wear for more than half an hour.the sound quality is decent, but it doesn't make up for everything else.I think the only positive thing I can say about them is that they're pretty, and the name is amusing.
p463
aVI bought these for my son after seeing a lot of guidance about hearing impairment with ear buds. From the sixteen-year-old: "Awesome sound quality, cool design, a thousand times better than earbuds."
p464
aVThe headphone is made for small ears or small heads.  It sits on part of the ear and hurts after 30 minutes to one hour.  However, it does produce a decent sound.
p465
aVHaven't heard this rich full sound in over 20 years on huge headphones!  Truly incredible.  We paid under $30 for a pair without a box, but worth so much more.  Just incredible.
p466
aVI got this in March. I didn't like it at first because it wasn't very comfortable and it rested on my jaw hinges, but I kind of got used to it. The sound quality is good, but nothing to boast about. After a road trip, I fond the right ear of the headphone detached and now pretty much unusable. I'm not sure how this happened, but I'm sure not buying this again.
p467
aVthey are nice headphones but however the more u adjust the size for you head the side of the headphones start to crack my son had thease less then a year and they broke off the head band
p468
aVAfter three weeks my Skull headphones broke off in my IPOD. Best Buy refuses to do anything about it and they are so stuck the Apple Store could not do anything about it. So a pair of $40 headphones is now costing me a brand new 250 iPod. Never again will I purchase!!!!!!
p469
aVMy son keeps saying how great his tunes sound with these headphones, and he loves the fit and thinks they are comfortable.  And of course the Thunder theme makes them awesome!
p470
aVThe third set I've bought, but only because my son stole my first pair and my second pair got torn apart in a move.  I am allergic to Latex and cannot use ear buds and I also have a hearing problem, so my needs are different than most people.  Depending on my work schedule, I have been known to wear these for 8hrs while entering data and experience little to no discomfort.  I also do not have to turn up the volume very loud anymore, saving my already damaged hearing. I can also hear for the first time minute details in movies (ghost noises in my paranormal shows!) and the sweetest notes of Vivaldi's concertos. Pure bliss! And let's not forget how AWESOME they look!!  Everybody giggles and comments on the devil monkey and "Be Good Tomorrow" stitched along the top.  Totally me!!If you are looking at more expensive headphones, I would seriously consider these or any other Skullcandy cans first.  The quality and customer service (Lifetime replacement) cannot be beat!
p471
aVFound these when just browsing for headphones. They are a great buy and love them.  I love the sound quality and cancellation of background noise. Plus the price was excellent for what these headphones actually retail normally.
p472
aVIf you have gauges, these will hurt your ears. If your ears stick out even a little bit, these will hurt your ears :'( i have 16mm gauges and cannot use these for long periods of time otherwise my ears start throbbing. It feels like they're squishing my ears into my skull. At this point, I prefer Apple's crappy earbuds and if I cant find those, I'll wear these around my neck but it's not comfortable so it doesn't last long. I've had them for a year and continue to try to use them but it always fails so they just sit in a box for the most part :( sucks because i love these so much and really dont want to buy a new pair of headphones.
p473
aVBroke after a few months.  We sent them back to skull candy following their online return policy about 18 months ago and have heard nothing from them.  They claim they will replace the headphones if a speaker quits working but they haven't.  My son now has Beats headphones - they are awesome.
p474
aVI bought a pair of these headphones, a different design, but the same headphones. I bought them through Hastings about 2 years ago, and I'm still using them today. Best headphones I've ever had.
p475
aVFirst of all, these are Skullcandy and they do sound good. The bass sound is excellent , but the overall sound isn't loud enough. They make me want to increase the gain on every Mp3 I own. Now, just hold on a second, because these are fairly loud. My ears aren't ringing after listening to music through theses headphones. I bought these used and I always expect some problems, but I had to completely rewire these headphones. The headphones started making fluttering sounds and I know they were shorting out. They now work just as good as new. These headphones are just okay and don't regret buying them, I just wish they were about 3 notches louder.
p476
aVAfter 1 week of use, it already broke.  Both ear pieces disconnected from the head band.  I paid more for this thinking that it would be more durable.  I bought a $38 one of the same brand which lasted longer.
p477
aVI love these headphones. I've had a little extra money lately and I thought I would treat myself. Since I had recently broken my old in-ear headphones I wanted something nice. These were a good price for what I got. The sound quality is fantastic and they are very sturdy. I've May have tossed them around a bit and there is nothing wrong with them. I normally like skull candy so this definitely lives up to my expectations.
p478
aVBought these for a 14 year old for gaming.  He really liked them when they arrived - said they had good sound.  Unfortunately they started falling apart after two months of use  (one ear piece fell off) and after three months stopped working period.  Definitely not for heavy use.
p479
aVGood for closing on the job. they cancel out well if you turn them up loud. But I have six holes in my ears and these headphones are pretty tight right out of the box. Uncomfortable. And if you're over six foot tall or have a bigger than average head size, you're probably not going to like these. Carrying bag you get with these is a nice touch, keeps them safe inside a bookbag or duffle bag.But all in all: They are too tight, especially if you have earrings. The cord is braided, but is very short. The sound is good, but not fifty dollars good.
p480
aVThe adjustment on these headphones is the weakpoint... The ladders (or whatever you want to call them) are extremely thin - and the way that they headphones are designed - the heavier piece (that it comes out of with the logo) acts as a fulcrum to weaken these rather thin plastic parts. My left headphone adjuster is cracked clean through - enough to expose the wire - so I have a very ridiculous frakenstein tape job holding them together. The right side is also clearly weak and is beginning to crack as well.
p481
aVI bought for my birthday nephew and he love it.!!!The quality is incredible ,very  soft when you put on...and the most important we havegood product from our basketball team....I really recommended to everyone  that want  to get amazing product.We are very satisfied.....Thanks.....
p482
aVThese are mediocre headphones to put it best. Would probably be great for younger children or those not really serious about sound quality.The sound quality on these headphones is below average. My music constantly sounds distorted/fuzzy when listening with these.The build quality is less than stellar. If you enjoy 'creaking' sounds with every twist and turn then these by far are the king of creakiness. It's almost unbearable just to adjust them on your ears after extended periods of use without having to cringe at the sound of cheaply made plastic.The Skullcandy brand is all hype! I've even tried the ti headphones which are supposed to be an upgrade from these... sounds the same to me. If you are more worried about fashion than sound quality, then Skullcandy has you covered. You can find just about every color to match your outfit of the day. They even have headphones from all your favorite sports teams! Jack up the price by slapping logos of your favorite team on them, but pay no attention to sound quality.I'm writing this review not even an hour after selling these on Craigslist. Comparing these headphones to my Audio Technica WS-55 and M50 is like night and day. If you are serious about sound, steer clear from this brand altogether.2 stars since they have a pretty decent warranty. Not many companies will get you a replacement for 50% off if you accidentally break them.
p483
aVfor the price i paid, i expected them to last longer. They lasted for 7 months before one of the headphones broke off of the headpiece. I was NOT mishandling it or being rough, throwing it around, crushing it under stuff, especially because of the price. They are cute and pretty comfortable until the 5th month when the ear cushions get a bit harder and less giving.I would not recommend these if you are looking for something to last a long time. I could have bought 5 pairs of headphones for this price and still had three or four leftover by now.
p484
aVThese headphones are great for sitting at your computer and listening to music. They have a great sound that doesn't produce to much treble or bass; very well balanced. There are two issues with these headphones that comes down to personal preference. First, whatever you are listening to is going to be heard by the world. These headphones do not muffle the sound of your music at all, so others will always be able to hear you unless you turn your volume literally all the way down. This isn't an issue for me because I listen to them primary at home. Second, if you move around at all while listening to these bad boys you are going to sweat. This is an issue for me because I often clean and dance around when I'm jammin. They are similar to ear muffs and will heat your ears pretty quickly. Keep those two things in mind, but also know that this is a nice pair of headphones depending on your preferences.
p485
aVFor starters, let me just say that these phones actually handle DJ TECHNORCH, noizenecio and t+pazolite very well! Most stereo systems and headphones simply cannot output his music all that well, but these headphones can! These headphones can handle powerful beats up to 800 beats per minute. Just go on youtube and play NECROPOTENCE from t+pazolite. That was the song I used to test out how fast of music these can handle. As far as heavy hitting bass, anything done by RoughSketch, noizenicio, and DJ TECHNORCH was good enough to test these headphones out. They can literally handle anything you throw at them.These headphones cost me about $50 and were the perfect replacement for my Sony headphones. The bass is definitely there without the need for extra subwoofer power from the higher end headphones. The headphones cover your ears perfectly to keep outside noise out, even when the volume is low, so I can use them near loud vacuum cleaners or machines or something.Bottom-line, for the price, these headphones are golden! It is like you are getting something far better than beats audio headphones (usually go for around $200) for 1/4 the price!
p486
aVPros: Its size and sound is better then my old Sony's and much more cheaper then other headphones of this quality. The cord is a great length, and very durable. They are also really comfy to wear.Cons: They lose their adjustment position sometimes, but this is a minor gripe.
p487
aVI bought these headphones for my Grandson (11 yr. old) because he doesn't like the feel of earbuds.  He loves them because they are comfortable and make it enjoyable to listen to his music.
p488
aVi enjoy listening to music with my new headphones because the sound quality is great, it blocks out almost all other sound, and they are mostly comfortable, but they could be a little less tight against my head, which i unfortunately cannot adjust
p489
aVMy son likes these but they feel cheap for $60. In short not worth it in my opinion. Why spend good money for soothing that takes more space, weighs more and feels cheap?
p490
aVThey are too tight on my head.  After 6 months, they finally snapped. The sound quality is fine, but these are cheap headphones overall. You get what you pay for.
p491
aVLoud and clear sounds. Headphones have good bass and treble, easy to adjust, and comfortable. I am pleased with them and hope to buy other skull candy products in the future.
p492
aVI've had a couple pairs of these now, and both pairs broke within a year of purchase. They are good quality sound for their price, but aren't durable enough to be worth it.
p493
aVI bought these for my daughter and although she was not over the moon about them, they were the upgrade she was looking for and when she told me what she thought they were worth, it was the price exactly.  They are exactly as pictured and have decent sound quality.
p494
aVI'm not buying another pair of these.  I was very excited when I first saw the headphones, thinking they were stylish, good quality sound, and economical (mine cost $30).  Unfortunately, they only delivered as I had expected in style.  They looked exactly the same in real life as they did in the pictures online.  For the first few months, I really loved them.  However, after I took them on a trip and wore them for more than an hour and a half, they started to hurt my head.  I felt like my ears were being crushed.  The headband pulls the cans together way too hard.  Granted, my head is larger than average, and as far as adjust-ability goes they fit _around_ my head very nicely, but for extended listening these headphones hurt.  Now I'm no expert on sound quality, but these didn't seem too magical, and from what others have said Skullcandy is primarily about style.If you have a small head, care about style over quality, and can't afford Beats or some more fashionable but comparably low-quality pair of headphones, by all means buy these.  Otherwise, go for a pair of cheap Sonys, JVCs, Koss or some other brand that puts sound quality and comfort first.  You'll thank me later.
p495
aVThis is exactly what my son wanted. It would have gotten 5 stars but i had ordered this separate from some of the things for my son and this was suppose to be a gift for him. They put it in the same package and he opened it and got it. That really sucked because I ordered it on a different day and these cost enough all alone to have super saver shipping.  Very disappointed in amazon for that. I made a point to order it like i did. My son is happy with it though.
p496
aVFor the amount of money I paid for this product, it is very good. I cannot compare it to Bose or other companies like that, but again, I did go for the cheaper option. It is comfortable to wear, and gives very good sound quality. Definitely worthy of all five stars!
p497
aVPoor craftsmanship. They look good, but the headband is constructed with a metal strap that attaches to the earphone with plastic. Over time the plastic cracks and breaks leaving the earphone detached. I contacted the seller about this problem but got no reply. If you do decide to purchase a pair of these headphones you must remove them carefully otherwise they'll break in time. Since I got no reply from the seller I have reattached the earphone using zip ties which will only last until I find another suitable pair. This time I'll be more careful. Buyer beware.
p498
aVYou get exactly what you buy. They're good headphones with regular sound quality. They're tight around the ears and hurt after long periods of use. I feel like they're very sturdy. Overall I'm pretty happy with the headphones I recommend them.
p499
aVI bought these for my son for a Christmas gift.  He used them only at home, not hauling them back and forth to school.  He enjoyed using them until about June 1st at which time they snapped where the earpieces adjust to fit over your head.  He's currently still using them but the've lost their appeal with the shiny silver duct tape holding them together.
p500
aVI heard about these new "beats" headphones, and looked them up online and discovered that they were very stylish, and I also discovered the price, unfortunately. I am a huge OKC thunder fan, and play basketball a lot.I sampled the beats from one of my friends while we were shooting hoops. i realized why the beats have horrible reviews. The sound quality is very poor. I decided these Skullcandy headphones were going to be the best choice for me. I have had them for 6 months, and i these six months i have discovered thse things.  1. The sound quality is absolutely insane. I have never heard headphones that project the sound so clear. I am more of a pop- rap guy, and these headphones are amazing.  2.  these headphones NEVER fall off. I have taken these headphones to their limits, and they have never let me down. I have done every workout  I know of, and they have never fell off. ever.  THE VERY FEW COMPLAINTS... I would really have liked the parts where you can adjust the size to be metal.  2. After 4+ hours they start really hugging your ears and they start geting uncomfortable. But if you take them off for 5 mins, and then put them back on, they'll feal good as new.  overall great headphones.
p501
aVFor ~$50, you will get a decent product. Although many people will only buy it because of the brand name/looks, you won't get a bad pair of headphones. The large 50mm drivers make for loud sound. Whether that's good sound or not is a whole different story. From the ears of an audiophile, you will immediately hear imperfections. However if you've just come from cheap iPhone headphones, you'll hear heaven. There definitely is a burn-in time. When you first get it, the bass will be a little overpowering, bleeding into the mids. The highs won't really be noticeable either. However once you've got a few hours into them, they start to even out. I tested these with dubstep, electro, rap, and rock in FLAC format. If you're listening to mp3, you're not going to hear what these headphones can actually produce. The Hesh don't actually have a ton of bass compared to others, but the bass is smooth. If you're looking for head-thumping bass, you're not going to get it from these. What you will get is a smoother, more refined bass. The mids are harder to detect. They're not as prevalent in these but a trained ear can hear solid mids. The songs I was playing didn't really push the highs too hard so I can't vouch for certain the quality of the highs.I liked the different color varieties so you can personalize your headphones. They're not at all bland. The headphones are sleek and aesthetically pleasing. I only have one complaint in that the cups are a little too thick. You'll look kind of like Mickey Mouse walking out in these. It doesn't really matter to me since I'm only going to use these for office/travel use.The construction is where the Hesh falls apart for me. It's made entirely of cheap plastic. I can see they did it to cut down costs but in the end, these headphones will not last. The adjuster band killed the headphones. After a few months of use, they snapped one-by-one. I ended supergluing it together but now it will no longer be able to adjust the size.The comfort is also not a huge win for me. The headstrap does not have a lot of padding. It also doesn't create a lot of friction. It can be good or bad depending on how you wear it but for me the headphones just kept slipping off my head. The cup pads are very stiff. They're made of a fake leather material. It's very hard and uncomfortable compared to other headphones. Depending on the size of your ears, the cup may be over-ear or on-ear. It's just small enough and just big enough to be both. The cups will end up hurting your ears after a while of wear.These come with a gold-plated 3.5mm jack so you can use it for your iPhone or PC. I've had no connection problems or power problems. I've accidentally run over the cord/jack with my chair and no damage has been done. The cord is made of nice braided fabric so it will last longer than other rubber/plastic cords. The mic is of decent quality. Phone/Skype calls will work pretty well. However since it is an inline mic, they tend to pick up a lot more things than you want. For example, my friends could hear my mom in another room or my dogs barking outside.In the end, I wouldn't exactly recommend these to anyone but it's not exactly a bad choice if you're set on getting one.
p502
aVI would recommend buying skull candy products if you like Useless Customer Service departments. I been waiting 4 months to get a part for my headphones and now they wont even respond. You know what I hear every time I put my headphones on????? yup you guessed it. NOTHING. Notta, Zilch, Zippo, zero, ........
p503
aVThe construction of the headset if cheap. These broke after a few months and I used duct tape to do a cheapo fix. Spend you money on better quality headphones like Bose or Beats.
p504
aVMine finally broke after a fall to the grould out of my book bag of a height of maybe 5 ft.. they snaped in half... but they sound just as good, if not better than Dr. Dre Beats... amazing bass!
p505
aVI bought it because my son is a big Heat and Dwayne Wade fan. The sound quality was not as good as other headphones in this price range. However my son (10 years old) was happy with them so I would recommend them to heat fans that are not looking for high quality sound.
p506
aVThis was an amazing order. The headphones work and the description said there was a big scratch on one side but when I got it the scratch was barely visible which made me feel ten times better. They are pretty much like new!
p507
aVthese head phones sound great, but you have to have your ipod or whatever turned way up to hear them well. but the sound quality is amazing for the price you pay. they look well as well and are comfortable.
p508
aVLike I said, good sound and good volume capabilities, but the round shape covering the ears doesn't match not round ears, therefore, after a while it starts pressing against your ears a little too much and they will begin to get agitated and maybe sore for younger people out there.
p509
aVI bought these as a gift for my niece because of the monkey and come to find out, these were headphones that she wanted and they were a hit with her classmates and she said that she loved them because they're clear and you can't hear outside noise. I asked her to let me try them and I have to say that I now want a pair of my own but different design. Most of all the price was right. :)
p510
aVThese headphones have great quality.But could these headphones be better than beats???  Well, i think they are because the price costs less and again,these headphones have great quality. so,i think tthey are better than beats.
p511
aVI like these a lot, so far really no problems out of them. I've always liked Skull Candy stuff, they usually last a while, and not as expensive as a lot of headphones.
p512
aVI love my new over the ear headphone. D Wade is my favorite player on my squad  The Miami Heat. I get alot of looks whenever I where wear them.....They really block out the sounds around you.....Great buy you'll love them
p513
aVThese were a replacement of the ones that broke where the part that fits over the ear connects to the head piece.  We bought the original ones at Radio Shack.  They lasted about 2 years and then that piece broke.  So my daughter loved these headphones so much, she wanted the same kind.  So I bought these as a replacement and was thankful I could find the same headphones online.  The process was easy and arrived quickly and she loves them!
p514
aVHeadphones looked great in the package.  My teenager was thrilled. On the third day of owning her new skull candy headphones we noticed the cord coming apart.  The part that plugs into the phone has a complete separated from the cord and wires are exposed - I expected a little for for the money I spent.
p515
aVThis product replaced a similiar pair.  Skull Candy has an excellent warrantly and replaced a pair with a tear.  No problem. Got a replacement pair in less than a week.
p516
aVOne of the best sets of headphones I've ever owned. Very sturdy, amazing bass and sound. I've grown a lot of hate for Dr. Dre because of how overpriced they are. All you need is a great sounding pair of headphones - and these are it. They sound absolutely beautiful on newer songs such as Imagine Dragons - Radioactive, however they sound great on all songs.Instead of wasting a ton of money on a pair of Dr. Dre's headphones, buy these.*EDIT*After an honorable use of two-three years, I've gotten new headphones. I got the Skullcandy Crushers, and they're very nice. I decided to come back to these headphones as a spare but they sound like rubbish now. Was surprised at first, but these things are dirt old.
p517
aVThese are the most uncomfortable headphones I have ever had the displeasure of owning.  They place a constant pressure pincering onto my skull, and my ears dont fit within the cushioned hollows so I have to fold them in or adjust constantly to get sort of a smooshed ear fit.  Im an average sized adult male, these should fit much better.Sound is adequate, single sided cord is nice.  Rest of headphones feel too large and plasticy, but also fragile.  Hoping to return them tomorrow after just a few houes of ear torturing ownership.
p518
aVThe skullcandy hesh are pretty awesome. I just bought my second pair and they are great. of course the build isn't the best, but they are the best headphones under 50$ that you can get. If you are on the budget, the highs, mids, and bass are the best on these headphones than any other. just be careful because they aren't the sturdiest pair around. i would refer these to a friend.
p519
aVMy son wanted these because a friend of his had some and he loved everything about them.After looking locally at all of the stores we found them on Amazon for $20.00 less and that made him very happy since he was spending his own money.  He thinks the design is awesome and has them around his neck as much as possible whether he is using them or not. He couldn't be happier with his purchase.
p520
aVI took a chance on purchasing them while shopping at another retailer. I was looking here at another brand,(which I'll still purchase cause I want them), but at this moment I was in need of a pair for my HTC One with Beats Audio. The moment I plugged them in, I was thinking to myself, "They'll probably sound OK" That was an understatement. The enhanced sound quality from the Beats Audio of this phone gave these headphones some serious knock. The bass response isn't overpowering, but it's more than adequate. The highs and mids aren't piercing either, so you won't get that scratchy sound I hate. The only genre I've listened to with them so far is Dubstep and Hip-Hop, and I've been more than impressed by the sound quality. For the price, you can't beat them. If your looking for some serious sound on the go without breaking your wallet, then Skullcandy Hesh gets 2 thumbs up from me.
p521
aVI bought these phones at Sam's Club for 40 bucks. I was looking for something that was sweat resistant, durable and decent sounding. These are not audiophile headphones, but they sound much better than most for the price...and I consider them quite sturdy...at least compared to my Grado headphones. Overall, highly recommended.
p522
aVThese headphones came in Record time: 2 days. The sound quality is great for just $40! They do not fit too tight and came in the original packaging. The material is very sturdy and nothing is flimsy. The only thing is that the blue is much darker than what is shown in the picture. But other than that these headphones are great. A very good buy.
p523
aVonly pet peeve is the right side (away from the wired ear piece) sometimes the connection fails and you have to wiggle it a bit before the right ear makes contact and plays in stereo. maybe I should have designed it's contact points : P other than that I'm in love! for under 30 clams I can't complain much...
p524
aVI would give the seller a 5 star as the customer service wasn't so great, though, the item arrived very quickly, over 3 weeks before the estimated delivery date and the item was in great condition. With this being said, I have only had the item for two days so I can't say for sure but I think that it is of high quality. A 4.5 star review if possible (iAccessory Shop - seller)
p525
aVI bought this for my son as a gift and he loves them. The sound is adequate, but you shouldn't be looking for high quality sound in this price range. He's mentioned they are very comfortable, although I will say he has a small head, so larger nuggets may get different miliage.
p526
aVI was really attracted to these because of the Boston Celtic team colors and KG as the featured player.  It is top notch Skullcandy performance as over ear headphones and sounded great.  Only problem I had was that the head band is made of plastic and didn't adjust too much. I wear a size 8 cap and these headphones were on the tight end when I put them on.
p527
aVI bought these for my 10 year old son to use with his mp3. They fit great and are so comfortable that I borrow them when I'm doing work on my computer and need a bit of peace and quiet!
p528
aVI have to laugh at people who say the packaging was hard to get into- I ripped it right open with my hands and I am a pregnant female. Besides it has nothing to do with the product.I amusing these right now. Optically I love them. They sound just fine as well. I don't have them turned up loud and they tune out the outer noises. They are pretty snug and tight on my head though but maybe I just have to wear them in a bit, they are stiff straight out of the box and I do have a big head. Good sound though!!!
p529
aVBought this for my son, he was happy. Sound and noise isolation  is good for this price point. Styling is great for a kid or big Knick fan, but I can't picture myself walking down the street with these.Comes with a carrying/storage soft case when not in use.Overall I would recommend these as a great entry level headphone with superior styling and comfort and good sound.
p530
aVMy son is truly enjoying these headphones.  The quality of the product is good.  The sound that comes from the headphones are remarkable.  For the money, they are worth the price.
p531
aVI ordered the Black Julius Skullcandy headphone for my son's birthday. My son opened his gift and was very disappointed. The music/sound came from the right ear only. I sent the item back and received my refund. However the cost of shipping the defective headphone back was not refunded to me.
p532
aVI purchased these headphones for my 13yr old grandson. He absolutely loves them. The only problem that he has with them is that his mother keeps taking them to use herself. He said I should have bought her a pair also so that she would leave his alone.They are of great quality. I wanted to keep them for myself but I'm sure he would not have liked that too much either.
p533
aVI got these for my son for his 7th birthday!!! He was thrilled!!! We used them on our trip to disney and it kept him entertained on the plane for hours!!!
p534
aVThese headphones are great for blocking out background noise and the mic is crystal clear.  Single click and it toggles between play and pause, two clicks and it skips to the next track.
p535
aVFirst off, I would like to point out these pair of headphones are horribly made. The bad shape hurts your ears, unlike most other headphones.Second, this piece of crap literally FELL APART after 4 months. BOTH hinges SNAPPED off one day when i put them on. WTF?Sound is pretty decent and loud. But that's probably i have a beats computer...
p536
aVI Bought these for my boyfriend for his Birthday and he loved them, Great sound there loud and i like the string instead of wire to connect to a device and they come with a cool bag ! :)
p537
aVThese headphones are a complete steal for 50 bucks, I use them all the time. The bass sound is amazing on them, and I love a lot of bass. Although if you don't like the bass sound in your ears, I would personally not recommend buying these. But, overall they're sound quality and price make them a steal for a buyer.
p538
aVMy boyfriend prefers headphones over earbuds, so I decided to splurge and buy him some of these. He listens to music every day, so I was hoping they would last, coming in at $60. Unfortunately they fell apart in about three months, even though he took great care of them; there was absolutely no durability in the pair we received. Won't purchase again.
p539
aVMy original review appears to have been based on faulty data and I apologize to the Skullcandy people.  This set has decent power, clarity, and a good range of sound.  It does not have AC-DC concert volume, but at this price, I really didn't expect that.I had written that there was a good deal of distortion at higher volume levels and this remains true, but I am speaking about what most people would consider an insane decibel load for the human ear.  After 45 years of playing like Tommy Chong, my ears are shot anyway, but others might like to preserve their hearing.The cord is a bit short, but I own many extensions, so if you need a longer cord, pick one up.  I really like the fabric feel of the cord.  It should help it last longer than a traditional one........time will tell.In short, I recommend these phones both for the average listener and for the Rockers out there who are tired of wimpy low end headphones and on't want to drop a few hundred dollars for the big boys just now.
p540
aVI just got these headphones today. They're amazing! Very nice, very stylish, very padded. :) The sound is AMAZING, literally like no other headphones that I have ever tried before. The bass is AWESOME and I love them. HOWEVER, there is one big down side. (Which is why I didn't give it a 5.) After about twenty minutes these headphones hurt your ears. /: Maybe it's just because I just got them today and they haven't "stretched out" or because I was just sitting down in one position, but they were really tight. I think that if you were doing something at the same time, such as moving around or reading a book, you might be able to ignore it. But just sitting down and listening to music, they really hurt. I'm not sure if this will go away with time or not though, so I'll update in about a month. I would definitely buy them. :)
p541
aVI got this in Ross for only $30. Of course not the nice color, Only ugliest color was available (gray/black). Anyway this is a great Headphone as I expected, although it's a little heavy and too tight to hang on my neck
p542
aVThese look great and the colors are rich, not like the faded ones in the picture. I use these at work and sometimes when I fly for 4hours or less. It's not something i really like using for longer duration as the ear buds tend to hurt after a bit. But it is great and the sound quality is also pretty good. For the price, i'd say this is a great product
p543
aVI purchased these for my son's 14th birthday and he loves them.  He says they are comfortable, provide good sound and looked just like the sample pic.  He would recommend them.
p544
aVThey are great. These are a great pair I've had no problems with them at all. No signs of breaking anytime soon, so I don't see what people keep complaining about.
p545
aVLove Skullcandy Best Headphones ever. I have owned a lot of headphones in my days and skull candy seems to have the best sounds when it comes to listening to music and canceling out the surrounding noise.
p546
aVBought them for my boyfriend for his birthday and he loves them! It arrived on the exact day I was told and he's been using them and he said the sound is perfect and they block out the sound around him! highly recommend
p547
aVFor the price you pay the quality of the sound is amazing. The clarity of the music is amazing and good for the price the only thing lacking is the plastic that makes up the headphones. It is cheap and when used everyday on a normal basis the plastic tends to give up and can form cracks which eventually can break. The last problem is the cups, they hurt the ear when used for more then 30 to 40 minutes.
p548
aVhalf of peoples reviews are complaining about hot ears and broken pieces and stuff, truth is yall cant take care of headphones.. these headphones are good, nothing wrong with them, and for a price like this, i think its better than beats. no complaints please, I RECCOMMEND THESE HEADPHONES (:
p549
aVThese headphones sound very nice, the clarity and tone are great.  Additionally they are pretty comfortable on the head and not too heavy. I also like the looks, kinda funky but fun.  Almost all headphones sound better than simple ear buds but I was not able to actually compare them to high-dollar brands.Overall I am happy with the purchase and would recommend them for someone wanting a nice sound with worring about them getting stolen or misplaced.
p550
aVI have had these headphones for about a year now. They are great and are very durable. I have mistreated these headphones so many times and they never broke! Sound is pretty good.Would recommend.
p551
aVBought them today, OMG they are awesome. very comfortable built nice and the sound is incredible. i listen to old school rap and my music came alive. they need power so your ipod may not have enough, but if you have a good sound card like i have with a headphone amp and a DAC the sound is awesome. the more i crank it up the beter it sounds. the highs are awesome and the bass is not over powering or muddy. and they can be found for a reasonable price.
p552
aVThese Hesh headphones are decent for the price, but they are uncomfortable. They squeeze your head a lot and the padding is hard and irritating. Makes long listening sessions almost unbearable. The construction is cheap plastic, and the sound gets distorted as the volume increases. But for the price, they are pretty good. I suggest lower volume listening, so that you get better overall sound. They look stylish, but for $60 I bet you can find better. Look for brands like audio technica, sennheiser, and grado. If you aren't an audiophile, then these are great. If you are, go for something else.
p553
aVI bought a pair of these from the local Entertainment store and have had them for about 2 years now and I can say that this headset is awesome! Sound is great and they're really loud for what they are. I was never expecting this much volume from a headset that doesn't require batteries. The sound is great, I can wear them for a long time before they bother me but like any headsets they will start hurting eventually but thats just the ears' way of saying they need a break. I see a lot of bad reviews saying these are cheap and break easy but I have dropped mine a fair share and they are still intact and work perfect. It is most likely user error to people who claimed theirs broke so soon. These are $50 dollars, so quit expecting them to work like $300 cans! These are just perfect for anyone who wants high volume and great sound at a decent price but know that you are getting what you pay for, Skull Candy, NOT DRE BEATS!!!
p554
aVI know i get what i pay for but i kinda feel i got the raw end of the deal on this one.. I expected alot better quality from skullcandy then this. Poor sound that i prob could have gotten for some 10$ noname brand..
p555
aVDecent quality. i especially liked the design of the logo. cord is sturdy. however i would recommend you just skip these and grab the skull candy aviators instead. the quality for those are amazing and you can get a pair for $90. i bought a brand new pair of hesh for $30 and for the price, they were good. i was mostly paying for the design and brand and besides they ARE NOT worth $60 when the aviators are out there for $90. those gave me a musicgasm. make sure you pick up the 2012 MODEL! they are so much better than the 2011 aviators.
p556
aVI remember reading the posts about how they break easily and I figured that most of the posters must be negligent, but I've been proven wrong.I bought the headphones for myself as a X-Mas gift just to have one side crack while I was placing them over my head. LITERALLY. Not even a month and they broke up going over my head.A week later and that side has snapped off completely. Now... it's not like these were even my daily wear headphones, I only wore them when working from home and the sad truth is my dollar store headphones, and $13 Skype headphones have lasted over a year.Why the bass was great and the noise cancellation was unbeatable what's the point if you pay $50 for a month? Unless Beats by Dre are actually durable and worth the money not only have these headphones turned me off from Skull Candy forever, but perhaps all premium headphones.Good riddance...
p557
aVThe sound quality was great with these headphones. I got them for a gift for my gamer boyfriend and he loves them. Skullcandy's headphones always look great but these seemed even more vibrant than usual.
p558
aVMy son loves these (and frankly, I've used them a few times too to tune out the noise!) to listen to music and play games on his iPad. He can't hear me when I talk to him from the next room, so they must be doing their job!
p559
aVI bought these headphones for my 8 yr old son  and he absolutely loves them. He says they are a liittle more firm on the pads compares to other brands. I think the quality is perfect. I was gonna buy  these at Best Buy for much higher, so you can't beat the price.
p560
aVThese are the coolest headphones on the market, from the NBA store, they cost over $60. One thing that I would like for them to do next time is maybe put instructions because you have to do something to make both ears work, because it came with only one ear working. I would recommend this to Knicks fans everywhere. Best $35 headphones ever.
p561
aVGot these for my 11 year old son.  He loves them.  We don't need to spend hundreds for the fancier ones.  I tried these too.  They block out most sounds and sound great.
p562
aVA gift for my son, and he loves them. Excellent sound quality for the price. Maybe not quite as high in style points as the beats but still acceptable to a 15 year old boy.
p563
aVBought these for my son.  He says that they work great!  I liked the price.  Don't pay loads of money for headphones when these will do the job.
p564
aVI purchased these for christmas for my 8 year old son, who actually requested beats by dre........... i saw these and when i saw they were miami heat decor, which is me and my sons favorite basketball team. they became an absolute must have. the quality of these headphones are above my expectations. my son loves them! in fact my husband does too! excellent product and so glad i got them at a great price!
p565
aVSaw other reviews talking about vibrations.  I haven't noticed anything.  Been using high quality headphones for years and these are a really nice set.  A much less expensive set than Dre's but great quality for the price.
p566
aVAfter having a server ear infection resulting in a tube being put in my ear I was told by my doctor to switch from earbuds back to headphones. I have heard very good things about skull candy so I looked into getting a set of headphones made by Skullcandy. While browsing I ran across this pair and fell in in love with them! They are very good. Perfect noise cancellation, fits my ears extreamly well. My only complaint is that they are kinda bulky and don't fit around my neck as well as I had hoped. These head phones come with a drawstring bag to carry them around and protect them as they ride around in my backpack when not in use. If a friend asked me to suggest a pair of headphones i'd tell them to go right for these.
p567
aVThe headphones have great sound quality and I love how they look.  The only thing is that they are a little tight on my head, so after about an hour I can't wear them anymore.
p568
aVThese headphones are very nice looking and the sound quality is good for the price. The fit is nice over the ears, sound (especially base) is solid, but anything passed 75%-80% volume the sound gets muddled & sound bleeds out so others can hear music. If you're looking for high-end sound then these are not the headphones for you, but if you want an affordable, good (not great) set of headphones, these will do just fine.
p569
aVGreat gift! Great quality of product and great price. It was easy to find and because it was for my son, he wanted 'HEAT' ones and they were easy to find. Very happy I got this for my son for CHRISTmas.
p570
aVI purchased the headphones for my son for Christmas. He wanted the Beatz by Dre. But after reading the reviews on the poor quality; how quickly they break, etc. After reading the reviews I selected this model of SkullCandy headphones. My son loves them said they are better than the Dr Dre headphones. He now wants another pair in a different style. Awesome buy!
p571
aVThese Skullcandy headphone are a fabulous affordable option to the Beats by Dre.  They provide great sound quality and are "cool".....my son loves his and I bought myself earbuds as a result of his experience with the headphones.
p572
aVMy son loves these. They sound great and are durable, for the price they are hard to beat. My older son had a pair Sony headphones that have been returned, he will be getting a pair.
p573
aVAfter two weeks of steady use, my brother noticed cracks developing in the adjustable plastic part of his headphones. He doesn't have a large head, and he always treats his electronics with care, yet the cracks have deepened almost enough to snap the headphones right off. I can only conclude that the Hesh headphones are made with subpar materials.On the plus side, they do have a nice sound, good bass and noise-canceling ability. And they look cool, lol.
p574
aVI had to for about a week and i had to call up Skullcandy to get a new headphone. The problem is that they themselves don't sell this version, so i had to get a low rider headphone which is not as good as this one. I really wish i didn't have to replace it because it was wonderful.
p575
aVmy Grandmother got me these for christmas and ive never had a headset as good as these, they drowned out all surrounding sounds and the instumentals are perfect. i love these headphones.  ( This headset was a Christmas gift for my grandson and he wrote the review.  I will tell you he was very excited and told me it was just what he wanted. He loved the headset. By the way he is 16 yrs. old.)
p576
aVHaven't used them yet, they are for my son for Christmas! The came packaged nice, but looked very dusty, like they had been sitting.. When we try them, I will give an update!
p577
aVOn my third pair but I'm die hard Knicks fan. Skullcandy  upgraded to a more metal base headphone with the Hesh 2.0.  That's my next buy in about 4 months when these break...and they sadly will
p578
aVThese ended up being perfect for my 10 year old son.  They fit great.  Other models wouldn't stay on his head very well, the cup design works well for him.
p579
aVExcellent sound - comparable to the quality of my Bose AE2's with a very high efficiency (volume produced for the input given - as loud as I have ever seen any headphone produce). They are heavy and they bother my ears after about 40 mins. I have a large head but tiny ears and the design of the cups just does not work for me. The cups are not large enough to go all the way around my ears so they apply pressure to either the pinna or the lobes. The padding on them is not soft enough to compensate for the pressure they apply on my ears and the discomfort gets to me after a while. The headband is somewhat bendable and you can reduce the pressure they apply to your ears to some extent but it is still not enough. I like the sound enough that I have been wearing them several times a week for the last 3 months and unfortunately they have not gotten any more comfortable with breaking in.
p580
aVI find this headphones so good. Its quality is perfect. There is only one thing that I don't like which is that they are kinda tight especially if you have a big head.
p581
aVI found this pear of headphones elsewhere, and decided to write a review here for the community. Highs are very good, lows are enjoyable and the overall build quality is good. This is the first generation, so they do feel a bit plastic-y, but not so much that you feel like they will break at any moment. They isolate outside noise very well only when the music is high, but that is usually not a problem for me. The leather cushions add for an extra luxurious feel and are very comfortable to wear, partly because the top of the headphones is also padded. The leather has its downside as well: your ears will warm up after about 30 minutes of constant use. The cord is of appropriate length and doesn't limit your mobility. If you're on a budget, this pair of headphones is still a very good buy, even if they are a bit outdated.
p582
aVI've owned all the different scull candy earbuds.. I've had many break do to faulty product. They always gave me a credit which is sick. But now they have their act together. They have great products for any price range.
p583
aVLove the design. Love the carrying pouch that comes with it. Sound is pretty good, but I'm not an audiophile The headphones feel a little too tight to wear, which isn't too uncommon for me when using over-the-ear headphones.
p584
aVOverall, the sound of these headphones is top-notch for the price range, although the highs are a bit muddied VS the lows. Nonetheless, sonically, I'm impressed for what I paid.However, these headphones HURT. I'm a skinny guy, 25 years old, normal sized head and ears, and these things make me feel like I'm wearing a vice on my face. If you wear glasses, don't get these at all unless you've been dying to discover new pressure points behind your ears. They squeeze really hard all things considered, and the earcups are deceptively small so you have to actually wrap the cushions around your ears in several steps to actually make them fit on your head.Overall, great sound, really really uncomfortable for someone who has an adult-sized head.
p585
aVBought them at the airport and since then, love these set of headphones. The sound is pristine and the bass is pretty neat, too. Sadly, broke 'em as I sat down on my chair, but hell, just bought another pair. Highly recommended; besides sounding great and at a great price, they look awesome on you.
p586
aVI got these headphones to replace a pair of $7 Vibe headphones that were starting to have audio problems, which i got to replace a broken pair of Skullcrushers. The sound quality is very good, with all of the genres I listen to, Metal, Classic Rock, Electronica, House, dubstep and SID. All of them sound amazing! the only problem I have with them is that the foam parts of the earcups are too small, and after about 2 hours of skateboarding and listening to music, my ears started hurting. Other than that Great buy(i got mine used for $28 bucks, they were treated pretty badly, but i bet that brand new, they would be worth the $40-$50 you have to pay) the cord never tangles, I never have any problems with the minijack not fitting in my mp3 player or reaching it(i'm very short for my age though)Pros: Great sound quality with most genres of music.Cons:Earcups are too small, plastic feels brittle.Decision: BUY THESE! THEY ARE AMAZING!
p587
aVAnd I need to as the moment I left them unattended at my local YMCA, they got stolen.I hope whoever has them now is enjoying the amazing bass and crystal clear sounds coming from those ear muffs.
p588
aVOkay, these headphones are O.K. they have good low end beats and the sound isn't distorted when the volume on the ipod nano is on full. I'll give u a quick pros and cons chart.  Pros:-great low end beats-compact-extremely comfortable if you have a small head-handles high volume  Cons:-cheap plastic-this probably doesn't go for most people, but i have a hearing loss so I cant listen to loud music, so i have the volume low. But when the volume is low, the beat cancels out the other noise such as synth, if you listen to house or dubstep like i do. Sure, if the volumes loud it's still crisp.-uncomfortable around the neck.
p589
aVI bought these as a gift for my fifteen year old brother, and he loves them. They block out all outside noises, which my mom does not appreciate! He says he can hear sounds in the music he is listening to that he did not even notice when listening to on regular speakers. They are also stylish and fairly priced.
p590
aVGood sound quality for the price. However, the construction of it is insanely cheap. After a few months of light use at a desk, the side began to crack and a few months later, it broke off conpletely. The only thing holding the side on is the speaker cable. Too cheap to recommend to anyone.
p591
aVThese headphones are a great alternative option for people not willing to spend $200 or more for products like: Beats by Dre and Streets by 50.  The sound quality is superb, the design is great, and they fit and form very comfortably to size.  Only drawback is that they are easily breakable because of the plastic design.  I highly recommend it to any music lover.
p592
aVHaving read all of the review to these headphones i thought these were gonna be great. Turned out they weren't very comfortable at all, and to me, a pair of headphones arn't anything without comfort. The music quiality of the headphones were alright but they didn't block to much noise out. The worst part of these headphones are their durability, the area were you can ajust the size of the headphones was made of cheap plastic and snaped after a couple weaks of use. Not recommended headphones.
p593
aVThey do sound good for the price but they are made from cheap plastic. Mine broke just taking them off my head. Mine seem to exhibit the same weakness that others have complained about: The adjusting slides are made of thin, brittle plastic and break very easily. I would not buy again.
p594
aVGREAT BUY! The mike however doesn't work with my Nokia Lumia 710, and I do wish that the cable was removable but for the price I paid ($34) I can't complain. The bass is there but it's not over powering the rest of the important parts of the song (Cough cough beats). They aren't that comfy, infact after 20-30 minutes they started to hurt my ears. But remember they are around the ear. Overall I recommend these headphones for regular listeners or anyone on a tight budget. Keep in mind that these retail for $60 elsewhere!
p595
aVAll in all the only things these headphones have going for them are the desing and brand name. The earcups are too tight and trust me when I tekk you in a matter of 5 to 10 minutes you will have to take them off ang gett some air. Don't buy these.
p596
aVI got these a little over a year ago and they work PERFECT! I use them every day and they still produce amazing sound ! A must get in my book!
p597
aVThe sound quality and clarity is actually pretty good for headphones in this price range. They are a bit bulky, and if you think your going to be wearing them around your neck while they're not in use then you might want to look at some different headphones for in my experience they are simply too bulky for that. The bass also leaves something to be desired but for quality on a budget they're pretty great.
p598
aVBought these headphones for my son and didn't even have them an hour and plug was disconnected from wire.  We filed warranty, but never received anything from warranty or refund.
p599
aVthey are really good overall but the 3rd day i had them my dumb friend tried getting my attention and tried to pull them off my head and they snaped in half
p600
aVI put these on my wish list because my old Sony earphones had the fake leather peeling off all the time and leaving little black bits in my hair/ear. I ended up getting these as a present for my birthday.These Skullcandy Hesh headphones sound pretty good but the build quality is poor. Less than a week of having them the fake leather is peeling away from the headphone cup. At least its not leaving bits of stuff on me but it wont be long before the other side starts to do this I imagine. Has it hindered my ability to listen to music? No, not yet, but if the thing starts coming undone within a week or owning then I dont recommend it to others.
p601
aVThese are great headphones, The over-the-head strap is comfortable (there's some kind of padding in it). I like how the cable only comes out of one of the sides.The cable itself is covered in some sort of fabric, so it is tough, and also flexible. The cable will never retain its shape, which is good. You should never have to worry about this cord getting tangled. The cable is only 3ft long, so you're a little limited there, but I have never had an issue with the length (except when I try to get up from my desk forgetting that I'm still wearing the headphones).The ear pieces are a good fit. There is sufficient padding around the ears so you shouldn't have to worry about them being painful. They are sufficient large enough to completely go around my ears and make a good seal.Sound. The sound quality is good. They are quite loud, and I have never noticed any issues with the sound. However, the domes on the outside tend to pick up external noise. So for example, wind is easily picked up by these phones. So if I'm wearing these outside on a windy day, the wind will be amplified in my ears by these domes. This is one of my annoyances with this product.The other annoyance is the fabric. I feel like the fabric that covers the ear padding as well as the over-the-head padding seems like it might be the kind of fabric that will deteriorate over time, or that it will crack.Overall: Good headphones, good sound, good fit, not the best for cancelling external noise, fabric doesn't seem reliable.Recommendation: Go for it, I love these!
p602
aVThese are great noise cancelling headphones for the price. My son has sensory integration issues and the headphones help with the surrounding noise and he is able to listen to what he wants with out the distraction of the people around him.
p603
aVThe headphones are really good in the overall... but sometimes, with some songs, they do not sound that good... I look rock and they seem to be perect for that kind of sound, but if you listen to pop or electronic they do not sound that well...Its worthy the price....
p604
aVI am so hyped with my Wade Skull Candies. I rock them with a white wade shirt and goes perfect.The construction is perfect, designed so the cord does the easily get a shortage.The music and sound quality is amazing, not as good as Beats By Dr Dre, If you are buying ear phones for studio quality, Skull Candy is not designed for such.The frabic on the top loop becomes discolored to a white-yellow colour after a few months of use. It does come with a nice clothed bag, but I didn't use it too much.The ear cushion began to acquire slight ware and tear after a year of slow-moderate use.Recommendation: Buy if you a HUGE Wade fan, because there is nothing like it on the market right now.
p605
aVI bought these and a pair of Beats tour, let's just say the beats one....these are very loud but little bass :/I wanted something to look good in and sound great ill give it a 3/3 style...and 2/3 sound its decent
p606
aVThese headphones are great. I got them last year for christmas, and they're awesome. The sound is amazing, there's little to no leak, and I love the pause/unpause/skip button on the cord. There are a few problems though, and they are enough of an issue that I decided to share my experience. If you wear these for too long, they tend to hurt your ears a little. Also if it's hot, they get sweaty. The worst problem, however, is that they break. I don't know if it's just me, but a week or so ago they started to break. When I had them hooked up to my computer, they would sometimes randomly do short bursts of static, or a loud popping noise would occur. Also, the part of the headphone on the left ear right above the speaker and below the size adjustment thing broke. It just came loose, and now whenever I wear the headphones, the left ear sticks up and won't fit over my ear anymore. This sucks because these headphones have great quality and I love them, except they haven't even lasted a year. This is pretty disappointing because now I actually have to buy some. I've tried my best to preserve these, but alas, duct tape has failed me. All in all, these are amazing headphones. I'm no audio nerd, but I think this sound is great. It's clear and loud and everything is just perfectly blended. If you're thinking about getting these headphones, I recommend that you do, but maybe get them used or for cheap because they will, inevitably, break. So, if you get these, treat them as nicely as possible and prepare yourself for when they break, because they will, and it is rather heart-breaking. These were some great headphones while they lasted. If you get them, maybe you'll get more than 9 months of use out of them.
p607
aVSkullcandy Headphones are some of the best headphones you can buy.But on the down side of the subject, they are pretty expensive to.  You know how they say, "this is music to my ears.", these headphones bring that metaphor to life.  They are very high quality, it feels like you're actually at the band whose concert you're listening to. like I said earlier, they are a great pair of headphones, and there just a great product to listen to music with.The first time I listened to a pair of Skullcandy headphones was after school at my friend's house.  He had a pair of them on his bed so i asked him if I could listen to them and he said yes so I picked them up and I pressed play on his IPod.  They sounded great!These are perfect headphones for kids and adults any age.  Someone who would really like them would be someone who enjoys music, also, I wouldn't recommend putting these were a baby could get a hold of them because they are expensive, other than that, they are great headphones.
p608
aVI may not have bought my headphones from amazon but they are the same headphones none the less. I got them for Christmas. They lasted my 8 months before the left ear part snapped but stayed on. I managed to fix them with super glue and ductape but I will not be buying these again.
p609
aVI see alot of you guys talking about how great the bass is... you obviously haven't heard a good headphone.  The Bass and overall sound in these is VERY hollow ,  If some of you 5 star folk's listen to some better headphones like some good sennheiser or something you will be very disappointed the next time you listen to these
p610
aVThe moment I pulled these headphones out of the packaging and plugged them in, they were ALREADY broken! The sound only comes out of the left side of the headphones and it is a terrible quality sound as well. I am incredibly disappointed as my boyfriend has a wonderful pair of Hesh Skullcandies and I really wanted a pair of my own. I guess I never will at this point, because I'll never be buying from Skullcandy again.
p611
aVOk so i have had my pair for about a year or 2 now and there still going strong, I love them... I dont really like the bass on them but other than that the sound is crisp, clear, and overall just good.they are hard to wear for a long period of time(like 6 hours or so)The only thing that I really saw as a reason to mark off one star was that they broke on me(plastic broke)So one day i was using my headphones and they fell off my head onto the ground and the pastic part that makes the earpiece swivel broke so the right ear just hanged down by the wire. I really got aggrevated and tapped it but nothing sticked. So finally after a week or two went to the store spent 5 dollars on crazy glue glued it completely(used half the bottle) and now they work perfectly!Overall I recommend this to anyone who can not afford the new version.My reasons for recommending1)Good sound quality(not enough bass but not by much)2)blocks a lot of the sound from the outside3)Is comfortable as long as you dont wear it for more than 6 hours5)VERY load... this thing gets very load so when your testing sound quality put your computer volume on 35-40 because it is insane :DHope this review helped you make your purchase! :D
p612
aVI rated four stars for some reasons:First lets see the PROs:  +4 starsPros: - Very good sound quality,  - Best sound in R&B; and Pop Music  - very nice design and fit in your ear.  -  the wire cord is made like "shoe lace" so it won't twisted.  -  And most of all the price is very reasonable not like ( "BEATS by DRE" it's very overpriced ).On the other hand, I noticed some CONs: -1 starCons: - made in cheap plastic.  - bass are not too impressive, I preferred "BEATS BY DRE" if you want a super excellent bass.  - wire are not detachable But, as I heard Skull Candy have already released a new heads check it out in Google.So overall,I am satisfied for my purchased. Definitely, I will recommend this product to all who don't want to pay big $$$ for a headphone, and if you want a good sound quality with average bass, this is the right choice.
p613
aVThe plug is very fragile.the headphones worked a single day, the connector is very fragile. I bought two headphones and in both cases the fault is the same.The version the NY and LA are very bad in the connector or plug. I am disappointed of the skullcandy
p614
aVThese headphones are sooo comfertable! i never want to take them off! And they sound awesome! I take them everywhere i go now.i dont see how anyone could dislike them, and they look freakin awesome!
p615
aVAt first, they were great. The sound quality was great and everything, but after a while, only one side of the headphones worked. I found out it was because the wires on the inside were very small and kept breaking. I got it fixed, but 2-3 days later it broke again. I don't really abuse my headphones, so I was pretty mad. I don't reccomend buying these headphones unless you really like the look, cuz that's what you're paying for.
p616
aVWhen I first bought these headphones, I was excited they had really good sound. But months later, the notches on the sides were starting to wear badly. It did not even last a year and one of sides broke with ease. They were not even used everyday. I would like to purchase from this brand again but I want assurance that the sides are more sturdy and not brittle like candy.
p617
aVI ordered the Skullcandy Hesh headphones for my 12 year old son.  They are sound cancelling which is a nice feature.  Also, the volume is quite loud.  He is pleased and I loved the price!
p618
aVThese headphones are a great product to buy, they're lightweight and drown out a good amount of outside noise and that's before you turn on your music. Great product for recording
p619
aVBought a pair at a local FYE store, got to the car and they sounded awful! everything was crunchy and distorted. i realized the driver or something was busted. Went  back and traded them, the new ones sounded better. pretty decent sound, good price, and looked really good. i also liked that the headphone jack could be removed from the headphones just like you can with the beats. but these leaked really bad, and didnt have very good sound cancelation. but my goodness they are very uncomfortable. ive had uncomfortable headphones, but after like an hour or 2. with these. i had a headache in 10-15minutes. they squeeze way too tightly. I took them back, i got the skullcrushers, they are SOOO much better. and the sound is way better too. they dont leak much at all unless you crank them and are standing right beside them, and they do a great good job of canceling surrounding sounds. plus they have dual drivers, and a subwoofer! id get skullcrushers. or atleast not the hesh, unless you have a very tiny head!
p620
aVI use these at the office when I need to drown out the rest of the noise and people.  Either fire up Spotify or start into my own collection.On the plus side when you fire these up you discover a whole new side to your music colection that you've never heard(if you've only used the cheap plugs that came with your mp3 player) for not much more than the bottom line pairs.These are not fully up to par with the high end sennheisers, beats, etc.  Some people will take that as a negative, but you're also not paying the price for those head phones either.  I've heard people complain about breakages etc, mine have been rolling in the bottom of my backpack for 7 or 8 months with just the little sack they came in for protection.  I've got a fairly fat head(7 3/4 hat size, and they fit comfortably sound great.They are not specifically advertised as isolating, but you put these on and you won't likely hear your coworkers or any workplace noises.
p621
aVI bought these headphones from Bestbuy about a year ago. I put in hours of research trying to find the best bang for my buck. I came across these and i really liked the style and power so i grabbed them. About 8 months into owning them i was putting them on and they snapped... Thankfully Bestbuy let me get a new pair because they were still under warranty. All in all i am very pleased with these and will continue to use Skullcandy. Just remember to be careful putting them on. The way they feel on your head is very nice but takes a bit to get used to. Buy this and you won't be disappointed!
p622
aVGot them 1 year ago for $35 refurbished, and now they are starting to break. If you can get these for $25-$40, they are OK for the price, but you can get better. Definitely DON'T pay $50+ for them though. If you are paying $50, go for the Sony XB500, they sound a lot better, and are more durable (as well as more comfortable). If you are on a budget, and only want to spend around $25, look up the Monoprice 8323, they will have the same durability, but will sound almost twice as good for $25 then these do and they are selling at $50+.
p623
aVI recently picked these up in the store and so far they are almost just like the Turtle Beach X11's (Minus the stupidly long cord X11's have, and it doesn't have a mic). The cord is about 30" (30 inches), but the Turtle Beach X11's is like 14' (14 feet). The braided cable is a nice touch, it is also on most Razer headsets. The surround sound is awesome, I would say it is exactly like the X11's. The bass and treble is great, plus a good bass makes the shots echo in-game (I love that :P) the surround sound is great for spotting enemies. It is a great headset for the price! (I got it for $60 at the store, the 2nd version is $70) Fairly good noise cancellation, would without-a-doubt recommend to anyone looking for a good gaming and music headset!P.S. Has one audio plug, fits every cell phone, laptop, and MP3 player ;)
p624
aVQuite a few months ago, I had bought a set of these. To my satisfaction, they are still as good as new I had brought these to school with me, and I found that the Headphones can take a beating, but don't be expecting you can fling these across the room and they will be fine durability-9/10I had bought the Scout version of these, being an outdoors kind of person, and Hesh fit the bill perfectly, and they turned a few heads as well. in looks-10/10I listen to music as much as possible, mainly rock, or hard rock, or heavy metal. These make the music clear as day. I could here every pluck of a guitar string, every beat the drums threw out, and every voice fluctuating there was. I also tested other styles of music based on what I had figured a lot of people listen to today; First I tried was dubstep, The sound quality is clear and crisp, but the Bass in these aren't as strong as something you would find in Skullcandy's "Skull Crusher" model. If you want as much bass as possible, go for the Skull Crushers. I also tried orchestral music. Every song from the popular music group "Two Steps From Hell" was a new experience. I heard new melodies, and new harmonies. I heard sounds I had never even picked up on with my old set. Another thing, these get LOUD. I mean if you crank up your computer's volume to the max and put the speakers together, they will shake in your have. If you put the volume at the max, and listen to even a relatively calm song, you won't be able to hear very well for a few minutes. All together, I had came to the conclusion that these are well rounded headphones that make great work of many, if not all genres of music. Sound-9/10The microphone on this set, I had found useless, It's plug-in has a triple stacked whatever thing (One of my friends tried to explain it to me) that enables the microphone to connect to the computer using the same plug-in as the headphones themselves. The reason I found this useless was because of the fact that it should mainly be used on a cell phone, which I do not own. But that's just my opinion. The microphone for me gets a 5/10 just because I don't have a need for it, but most might.On of the deciding factors that had me itching to buy this pair of headphones, was the comfort. I would be wearing these for many hours of the day. I am a gamer, so I figured if a get good comfort, then I would get more out of them; being able to wear them longer. I have only slight comfort problems, sometimes I will get a pain right below the back of my ear, from how tight they can be, but once you adjust them to a size that would fit you, you can wear these all day. Comfort- 8/10The next section of my review is the closer, affordability. being $50, they were the most expensive headphones I would have bought to the date. To me, do to all of the factors stated above, I would say these are the choice for you if you are looking for the most efficient way to spend your money on headphones. Although somewhat expensive, they are completely worth it. Affordability- 9/10
p625
aVThese headphones quite simply are ok. They're not great nor are they terrible.{SOUND}I listen to a lot of dubstep and with dubstep there is a lot of jump between deep bass and high highs and everything in between. The highs are pretty good as well as the bass, but the mids aren't very good at all high mids are very prominent while the low mids have trouble coming through. Overall the sound is ok.{FEEL}As a person with a very large head and very large ears it is hard for me to get good headphones, though these fit very well. My fit inside of the cups even though they look very small. There is also plenty of room if you have a big head. I usually have to pull headphones all of the way out to fit my head, but I'm about to notches in on each side and they fit great. They have a thin mesh, nylonish head band with surprisingly feels pretty nice. The general construction feels solid with nice soft, rubberized plastic through out.{LOOK}If you're buying skullcandy headphones this probably matters to you and they look pretty good!
p626
aVMy husband and I both bought a pair of these head phones so that we could listen to music while in the school library.  When the head phones are on you can't hear anything from outsiders and outsiders aren't bothered by your music.  We have had our headphones for over 9 months and these have certainly held up to the test of time and the use and abuse that comes with our daily commute.  They are super comfortable, I can wear my head phones for hours at a time (which is really good when I'm writing a mid term).  Recently my husband has started wearing them outside when he is doing yard care, and they are really good at muting out the sound of the machinery.
p627
aVThese headphones were amazing. With awesome bass boosters and perfect earcups make them the best headphones I have bought yet. If your looking for cheap headphones that are better than dr dre beats.... Here is your pair
p628
aVNever had owned a pair of Skullcandy headphones before, and these were amazing, that was until they broke on the sides. Only got to use them three times before they sides cracked. Don't get me wrong, they're nice headphones.
p629
aVHonestly I can be pretty rough on headphones. But these stayed at the office and were only dropped once or twice. the really skinny piece of plastic that allows the band to be lengthened snapped (not that big of a surprise). I got mine for ~$30. I see them listed for over $100 for some reason.??? I wouldn't speed nearly that much on these even if I didn't think they would just break again.Sound quality was decent for over the ear. Ok bass, that didn't buzz or rumble too much. Decent treble. If you want to give some one a nicer (looking) pair of headphones for a gift and not be upset if they break, these would probably work great.
p630
aVOkay,so I bought these back in March for my 13th birthday as a present for myself.These things are AMAZING.They have been thrown against a 12" thick concrete wall,and other than a small slit in the side of the earphone,they are still in perfect condition.All I have to say is thanks Skullcandy for the amazing product. (:
p631
aVIt's all in the title. So they're not studio headphones. They are cheap for looks and quality. Very nice design with jersey on it. Also, they are supposed to be on ear phones but they pretty much surround my ears. The only knock on this is maybe the bass. But it can be fixed with settings on your MP3. and they cancel noise for the most part. Glad I bought them.
p632
aVThey where ok but the base was FLAT and they were super flimsy and are already after a week the leather is coming off. They were not very comfy and my head would hurt after like a half hour of wearing them. They were super big and not good looking at all.
p633
aVBought these as a birthday gift for my son that turned 15 recently. He loves them !!! We travel for baseball tournaments and they are perfect for the long car rides.  He plugs them in and away we go.  They are sturdy, comfortable and shipped to us relatively quickly.  No complaints here.
p634
aVI ended up throwing this one in the trash because it broke. And I am not a person that's rough with items. I take very good care of my stuff and I don't take them for granted. I pretty much wasted my money however small amount it was.
p635
aVI got these headphones about 1 year ago and a year later one of the speakers are blown out. They're are good headphones at first. If you get them try to take care of them cuz i think it got blown out cuz one of the wires were out. Overall they're are pretty good.
p636
aVThese headphones were, let's just say, adequate. When I first got them I was super excited because they were my first headphones that were over $30 (assuming that more money meant higher quality,) and all of my friends had recommended them to me. When I first put them on, I was sad to say that I was not very impressed. The only difference between the sound of these and some regular $10 ear buds that you could buy in a vending machine was that the bass was brought out a BIT more. Besides that, almost no difference. Even after a 24 hour burn-in period I noticed almost no difference. I must admit, I was a bit disappointed. However, I can admit that the comfort of these were alright, I could wear them for hours with no discomfort. The main problem with these though, is that they break very easily. When I say this, I mean that they break after a period of time. I had these for 5 months with no problem, but then one day I noticed a slight crack, and then it went downhill from there. After that, I counted 7 more breaks in the next 2 weeks (by now, they were pretty much just big duct tape headphones.) My last complaint would be the price. Seriously, $50 for these? I think now they MIGHT be worth $30... maybe. With all of these factors considered, it's safe to say that these were certainly not worth the money that was spent. You can easily find higher quality headphones for $50.
p637
aVOverall, I like the product. They look nice and do ther job. I was skeptical about the quality of the headphones because, other customers who rated them had negative views of the product. Pros: They keep a significant amount of noise in so that no audio bleeds out, they look nice, and have great sound. Cons: Material is a bit flimsy looking, after about an hour and a half of usage and they began to hurt the outer ear.
p638
aVI love these headphones! They are ready to go right out of the box, no burn in time needed. I have had these headphones since January-February 2012 and they are still going strong! I use them everyday and can toss them in my backpack at school and they don't even come close to cracking. the only thing noticeably wrong is the plastic around the plug is splitting, but thats expected, at least from me. Overall, 5 star headphones for the price.
p639
aVI bought the Black Hesh headphones, and I wore them for 7 months. The sound is wonderful, they are super comfortable and the cord never ever tangles. However, near the end the headphone ear cups came loose and the right one broke off with no rough handling. Since they have a lifetime guarantee on Skullcandy.com, I messaged them with my problem and sent in my headphones at their request.They got back to me within the week and emailed me a full refund coupon, and buying a new pair with it was super easy.All in all, WONDERFUL HEADPHONES for the first half year or so, then they will most likely break. However, the lifetime guarantee makes it super easy to exchange them for new ones
p640
aVThese are the greatest headphones ever they were worth every penny. The sound is amazing and clear and i love that you can hear the bass in the songs. The are comforatable and dont slide down or move. This is a great buy.
p641
aVMy son owns these and loves them.  We also own the expensive Bose headphones for traveling.  There is a slight difference between the two.  The Bose does have better sound quality and noise reduction.  The Bose are also lighter and less bulky but cost a whole lot more.  These are great headphones for the money.
p642
aVPros: price, cable is not rubber - harder to entangleCons: unconfortable, very hot, high side pressure, high bass/boomy sound, muffled/low treble.After 3 or 4 hours trying to like it, it's going back to the store.
p643
aVI bought these for occasional use on the test bench as I repair audio equipment for a living. I wanted a pair of affordable headphones that offered full range sound and a comfortable fit at a reasonable price. I didn't need a headphone that is extra durable for daily use that need to take a beating.The Skullcandy Hesh fit the bill perfectly. At an affordable price, the frequency range is nicely balance between the bass and treble - with a bit of a dip in the midrange as I expected. They are comfortable and block outside noise very, very well. The soft storage pouch is a really nice plus too.A couple extra thoughts to pass along. These are not audiophile grade headphones, they lack detail and refinement found in higher-end headphones... however if you are going to listen to MP3 audio, they are just fine. Also they did not sound good at all when I first listened to them! These do need "break-in" to sound good. I connected them to a home receiver, cranked the bass, and let them play for an hour - made a big difference.Lastly, for home listening you will need an adapter for 1/4" jacks (should be included IMHO) and watch for clearance sales on outgoing colors and styles. They are not worth their full price - there are much better headphones available for just a little more (the Sony MDR-V6 comes to mind). But when the price is discounted, these are a good deal.
p644
aVMy boy loves music.  He's only 7 so I did hesitate to buy these for his birthday because everyone else was talking about how they break easy.  I bought them anyway because they're really awesome looking and they were only $50.  I'm impressed so far as my son has not broken them and the cord is actually wrapped in some sort of cloth braid.  They're really much nicer then I thought they would be and have a good heft to them which gives me the impression of strong materials.  These are good headphones hands down.
p645
aVI got these for my 13yo son. He is one of those kids that takes great care of his stuff and we typically pass his old toys/electronics on to relatives when he is done with them because they are in such good shape.  Well we won't be passing these headphones on.  After only weeks of use the adjustable head band cracked.  It will no longer stay on his head and is now headed for the garbage can.  It is a shame as the sound quality was very good.  I would not recommend this item.
p646
aVI loved these headphones for a few months, just given the great sound.I however like wearing my headphones around my neck while i'm not listening to them, but the cups do not have enough swivel to complement the bulkiness. The material connecting the cups to the headband doesn't help either.  They are held together by a thing plastic that starts cracking and eventually breaks. Sure you can tape them up, but then you can't adjust them.Again, I love the sounds, and of course the look, but for the price, even with warranty they are hardly worth the trouble.
p647
aVthe Dwayne Wade headphones were given to me for my birthday because Wade was and is my fav player. the sound quality was amazing and the bass was great because it was loud but did not muffle the sound or cause static. the headphones took a while to get used to as they have to be fitted into. after you get used to it though it is not much of a problem. these headphones are not something you want to wear while you sleep as your ears will be throbbing a little. other than that the headphones are excellent for any genre of music. if at 75%-100% then sound outside your phones are for the most part expelled out. many other people who wrote reviews say the headphones are made of cheap plastic and break easily but that is not completely true. as long as your not yanking it off your head than the headphones will last quite a while. the designs are also amazing and there are a wide range of choices you could pick for the headphones. i would strongly recommend these headphones for music lovers.P.S.: The cord does not get tangled.
p648
aVI bought these head phones thinking that they would be comfortable around my ears...... They are not! After about 20 minutes my ears are hurting and I have to constantly shift them around just so that I can stop the pain that is caused by them. I wear a 7 1/8" hat so i dont think my head is too big. These head phones are just not comfortable.
p649
aVThese headphones were the best until a couple of days ago I was putting them on and they snapped!!!! The headband is made completely out of plastic!!!!If u want "temporary" headphones then I suggest these, if not, then get some aerial7 tank like I just did right now.Good bass, good sound, cheaply made.
p650
aVHi folks,According the price, $30, they are a good headphones. But they will be uncomfortable after some days. They hurt your ears and will lot allow you to wear them for long hours. When I ordered them I thought that they might be having some bass effects, but they really don't. So if you are looking for the music output headphones, they are not the one you should go for.
p651
aVPurchased for my son after the kitten chewed thru the wire of his last pair of skullcandy's.  He loves these, says the sound quality is better than the last pair, purchased over the counter in Aust from an electronics store.  Excellent price from Amazon, at least half of what he paid for his last pair in Aus.  Also, they look really cool.  Delivery was very quick to Aust and exactly as described.  Good communication from Amazon throughout the transaction.  Will definitely purchase from Amazon again, but not all goods they sell are shipped to Australia.
p652
aVthese are great ipod or mp3 or android headphones with no adjustments needed.  but if you own an av amp like sherwood or denon the high powered amps that put out 200 watts a channel i own a sherwood usa hd receiver. you will need two do one thing before plugging them in  if your bass is set at +5 or higher you will haveto turn it down anyware from +2 -1db or the bass will completeley overpower the headphones and you will completely blow the driver so they are great headphones you just haveto adjust the bass setting when plugged in two a receiver. the perfect bass setting for me and they still pump amazingley is -2db.by the way i never blew these they sound great its just common sense that an amp will blow these without adjustments.
p653
aVThe sound is really good. The all around look is pretty awesome too. I have had no problems with them but they are sort of fragile. As long as you take care of them they'll be great.
p654
aVI didn't actually buy these off of amazon, but I looked at the reviews to see what other people thought of them. These headphones are made very well. They work great, and they seem very durable. The cord is made of some type of nylon fabric, not plastic, so it is very unlikely that it wiil get tangled. the sound is great and the headphones fit very comfortably on your head and around your neck when not in use. Lastly, they look great. I think people buy skullcandys partly because of their look, and these look great. overall a great buy.
p655
aVTal vez no son lo mejor de lo mejor si los comparamos con otros audifonos mas costosos, pero por lo que pague por ellos estoy mas que complacido, no solo tienen buen sonido, tambien tienen estilo, si te gustan a la vista te gustaran mas al tener los en tus manos.
p656
aVExcellent headphones, but with a serious design flaw. The plastic extenders are way too fragile, and started to break just from wearing the headphones for a few months. Now my awesome looking headphones are reinforced with duct tape because the plastic cracked. You'd expect better from Skullcandy, especially for the price.
p657
aVI got the Paul Frank Hesh headphones as a gift to myself, thought they would look cool and I was right, the looks are awesome, also the sound is great but I got them four months ago, and they're already dammaged, you see the plastic used adjust the size to your head is a very cheap one, and breaks only by using them (even carefully). So if you're like me and cannot use these without adjusting the size, it will be an awful waste of money. Please reconsider buying quality semi-pro headphones such as Sony and others alike, don't get fooled by looks like I did
p658
aVI have had these headphones for about 6 months, around 2 of which they were not in use. I'll break down their features by section. I paid around 30 dollars for them.Sound: 2/5Honestly, these headphones are nothing special in sound. Upon receiving them, I was immediately disappointed by their quality. The bass is rather weak, the trebles are muddled, and the highs are unfocused. Depending on the price you pay, this may be acceptable, but if you're looking for sound alone, a 15 dollar pair of headphones could beat these. Although they are around-ear, the headphones are not very effective at passive noise cancelling, and leak a great deal of sound.Comfort: 2/5I found that after wearing these headphones for more than an hour, my ears started to hurt. Part of this is due to the fact that the drivers are round, whereas ears are not. What results is that the upper part of my ear gets clamped more than the rest of my ear, and this causes a lot of pain when wearing them. Additionally, the band is not very flexible, which creates quite a bit of pressure on your skull. However, for people with smaller heads and ears, this may not be a problem. The leather on the ear-pads is not bad.Design: 4/5These headphones look quite good when you're wearing them, but it should be noted that you intend to carry headphones on your neck, it will be impossible with these. They clamp around your neck completely, making it difficult to breathe. So if you are not wearing them on your head, you must stow them somewhere else.Durability: 1/5I put these in a backpack on a flight, and the adjuster on the side cracked. The problem is that these headphones are entirely made of plastic. Had the adjuster been aluminum or some type of metal, this would not have happened. Admittedly, this was my own fault, but this was ENTIRELY avoidable. Aluminum is cheap, and even that is found nowhere in this set. The mesh inside the drivers is also easily ripped, although I haven't experienced this. The fabric appears quite low quality.Portability: 3/5The headphones come with a nice bag, and the non-tangle cord is a nice feature (and should be standard on all headphones when possible). On the other hand, the headphones don't fold up, so there is no way to reduce their size.Bottom line: If you can get these headphones for around 20 dollars, it's not a bad deal. However, these are by no means a spectacular set. There are better options out there for the money that you would spend on these.
p659
aVthese things only have a little just a litle bit of bass but other that that they are awesome and i can hear really good with them.the sound is really clear
p660
aVI just got these headphones. they are AMAZING.i was very impressed with bass quality and overall sound sound quality. the bass is thumping but it doesnt distort the rest of the music. My brother got dr dre beats studio and the only big difference i could see in the quality was the bass. it was better on the beats.Pros: very good sound quality for the price, very good bass, look awesome, and they come with a soft carrying pouch which is nice so they dont get scratched up.Cons: they're al little tight on your ear so you cant where them for a really long time.
p661
aVI bought a pair of these and they fill the need I wanted them for: inexpensive, full ear cup headphones to use with an mp3 player. Which is obviously what they were designed for. The cord is too short for anything not within arm's reach, and do not come with a 1/4" adapter. Plugged into a stereo, or recording equipment, or an electronic musical instrument, they don't sound all that good. Very colored sound. Way too much bass, for my taste. But for an mp3 player, they fit the bill. With a little tweek of my Sansa's EQ, they sound pretty decent, and the snug fitting ear cups really block out external noise well. The large drivers make these loud, so I can turn the volume down some and get better battery life out of my mp3 player.
p662
aVThis headphones are great, only problem I found is that the cord is kinda too short if you want to use it in your computer (like really short). But everything else is perfect.
p663
aVI would strongly suggest avoiding these SkullCandy over-the-ear headphones.First, they sound terrible.  Listening to a favorite piece of music, suddenly I'd open my eyes and say "Where is it?"  There would be pieces of music simply missing.  They sound muddy and bass-heavy, and just plain awful.. especially when you have to wonder what pieces of the music you aren't hearing at all.To top the experience off, they broke!  (No great loss!!)  Flimsy construction of earpiece holders.  One just snapped (and it was under no significant pressure.)SkullCandy in general is now on my Do Not Buy list, as I consider them a rip-off.  I replaced these crummy $58 (approx) set with a $20 (approx) pair of SennheisersSennheiser HD 202 II Professional Headphones (Black)and all my music is back.  They're *much* cleaner, more accurate, more comfortable, and from past experience with Sennheiser they will be rugged and long-lasting.I can't imagine quite whom the target audience is.  Perhaps those who have never heard even a reasonable set of headphones?Hope this review helps someone else avoid a similar disappointment!
p664
aVMy 10 year old son received these headphones for Christmas and just loves them.  He uses them with his Apple iPhone and iPad and the price was right.  They seem very sturdy and built to last.  So far I really like the value of Skullcandy products.  I would recommend them to anyone looking for a good value in headphones.  Thanks Amazon for a great price and customer experience!
p665
aVThese headphones are amazing.  My son cannot hear a word I'm saying (which is great for him bad for me) and the sound is crystal clear.  Another good thing I noticed is the cord is wrapped with this fabric material instead of the usual rubber or plastic that ends up bending and tearing. My son uses it on an old 3G iphone with no problem.  My husband had trouble getting a good plug in and working properly with his iphone 4 w/ otterbox.  I haven't tested it myself to see if it's the cable plug in what but the quality of the sound is wonderful.  The price is low enough compared to others like this.  I highly recommend!
p666
aVBought these at bestbuy, tried them on and they felt overly tight on the ears. The sound were not as good as my JVC headphones. So I will be taking these back for a refund.
p667
aVIts pretty great. The sound is clear and i always use it when im practicing guitar.The only problem is that the sound leaks when i put it really loud but other than thatIts a great buy.
p668
aVThey have the skull candy feel but they aren't comfortable for long time listeners and there bulky and a bit annoying to lug around. They sound great but they aren't as comfortable as I thought they would be.
p669
aVI bought this for a friend and they look really cool! I haven't opened them or used them but I know SkullCandy products are usually reliable. I'm excited to see how well they work :)
p670
aVI just got these at Target on Clearance and I can't believe how sub-par the sound is on them. I just compared them to 3 other pairs of "left over" headphones I have (including a pair of Altec in-ear buds I purchased for $8 and these Skullcandys SUCK. Some of the people leaving 5 star reveiws really need to do a little research on headphones and they should also realize the great sound they are missing out on by not having a better pair than these Skullcandys.
p671
aVI loved these headphones... Until they broke and it only lasted me 2 and a half weeks! My friend had a very similar pair and they broke the same way. The earpiece with the wire snapped off. I was sitting in class and a kid knocked them on the floor and backed his chair into them. My friend stepped on on his. What i'm getting to is the fact that it wasn't designed well at that part. There is a crease at that point and now that I look at the other side I can see that is a seperate piece. There were only two narrow, hallow tubes holding it on (and the wire).Its a shame because it looks great and the sound is even better. I don't know about you guys, but I don't buy items like this for short periods of time. I wanted this headset to last 2+ years but that won't be the case with this.
p672
aVi love the hesh Heat edition. They have great padding and soft ear holders. They have great bass and have ear-pollution which means that you can't hear the out =side noise. i purchased them on march 12 and got them on march 16 which is really good shipping. they can fit anyones head and they look great on anyone. i went around asking people to try them on and they all looked great. they dave a button on them that controls the music as well they have a mic so you can talk to people through the headphones. i love them and hope you get them
p673
aVI had bought these with the intention of having great sound and pretty good bass (albeit they aren't to the point where they meet how much Beats can withstand bass, but if you're not a major bass head it's ok). When I first got them they were extremely adjustable, but no matter how much you try to keep these adjusting sides with care, they will ALWAYS break. I guess it's because of some cheap design flaw, but I overcame it because i was able to use these headphones one the very last notch, subsequently meaning i had to duct tape both sides of the headphones (the left side broke first then the right side). Ironically, this headphones performance has not diminished because of this. I say that because the wires run though the inside of the headphone extenders and the headband itself connecting both earpieces. You can even use these with your gaming system and hear crystal clear audio, even the own footsteps you and anyone else make. Overall I have to say these are some really nice headphones, design and all. Oh and the little bag it comes with for these things is so nice too.
p674
aVThis pair of headphones was $50 originally, but through discounts and promotional offers, I got them for $12.  I'd say they're definitely worth $12, but far from being $50 quality.  The sound is pretty good for the price, but that's pretty much the end of the pros.Cons: Ear cups will likely crimp the edges of your ears which can be irritating after 20 minutes and very painful after an hour; cord is very short; the headband is connected to the cups in a way that makes the headphones sit extra-wide on your head, looking a bit goofy; no volume control within the headphones themselves, you have to rely on the source; virtually no noise-canceling--certain external sounds actually seem louder when the headphones are on, albeit distorted; small amount of sound leak.Once again, everything above being said, they're worth $12, DEFINITELY not worth more than $25.  Skullcandy's $10 earbuds are a much better value and very similar sound quality.
p675
aVI love these headphones! I am hearing my music like I never have before, with a whole new clarity. Whenever I get the chance I try to get my friends to listen to music through these headphones, these are just to great not to share!
p676
aVSon loves these! He said the sound quality was excellent! He is unable to hear anything else when having them on. He loved the style and color. He said they are very comfortable.Will stay with this brand style in the future.
p677
aVi read all the reviews and my conclusion is people have a grudge against skullcandy for some reason. these headphones are perfect, im wearing them right now. the cable is wrapped in some sort of cloth-like material, i love it. the bass is clear and the highs, mids, and lows are crisp. 45$ is well worth the high quality. but if your a mainstream-loving person who doesnt care about wisely spending money, then go ahead and buy beats by dre for like 300$. i saw those headphones and my instincts instantly told me "not worth it". these however, are worth it.
p678
aVI bought these looking for a medium grade set of headphones for until i could afford a high quality set. They live up to the skullcandy name of being sound quality when compared with the price. These did not blow me away. They are simply an adequate set of headphones.In terms of comfort, I can wear them for an hour or two before getting uncomfortable. The foam does not squeeze but they are firm. It has the feel of a lower grade headphone in this area but no actual complaints.One issue Skullcandy is known for is how you have to go through their headphones like, well, candy. But they have started a life-time warranty that made me comfortable enough to buy a somewhat more expensive pair anyways. The cord is wrapped in a cloth to add strength, and they feel sturdier than i was expecting. I have had them for about five months and they have lasted, which is a pleasure.Sound is kind of an issue. The bass is impressive for a pair of their size. They have a clear treble. However, one thing I noticed is that it seems like the sound is obviously coming from the left and right (I know this sounds obvious but bear with me). Most headphones will have the effect or feel of the sound being centered in your head, but these seem like the sound is coming far from you in either direction, possibly from behind. This effect is strong enough where it irritates me but it could just be the way they fit on my head, or it could just be my imagination. I don't know.Overall they are what Skullcandy usually is: Better quality than their price indicates. The $40 I paid for them was a good price. I wouldn't pay more for them, and anything less would have been a very good bargain. A very adequate set of headphones.
p679
aVI had about 20 dollars in amazon credit, so I decided to order a pair. When I tried them out, the sound was "distant" and muted. Messing around with the EQ on my computer didn't fix the problem. Get Sennheisers instead, you'll be glad you did.Though, these are one of the most comfortable pairs of headphones I've ever used.
p680
aVI've had problems with two different pairs of these headphones.  The headphone on the right side has gone defective both times.  I'm NOT hard on them.  They just don't work.
p681
aVAfter dealing with earbuds for years I made the decision that I needed a pair of actual headphones.  I toyed with the idea of shelling out big bucks for BOSE headphones or even Beats by Dre.  Thankfully my lack of funds forced me to explore less expensive options.  I paid around $30 for these headphones and could not be happier with my purchase.  The sound quality is great and I am thrilled to have bass back in my life.  Some of the reviews mention that these headphones might not last as long as others, I just bought them a few weeks ago so I can't comment on their long term durability but they seem to be constucted just fine.  Also people mentioned them not fitting over big heads.  I have a large head and the headphones fit perfect.  The ear pieces are mad comfortable and work as ear muffs to (it's winter in Boston)!You will not regret buying these headphones!
p682
aVMy son really wanted these headphones.  We saw them at an office supply store and a big electronics store for almost $20  more.  The sound is really good and they seem durable.  Would recommend these for the teen group.
p683
aVDon't buy these unless you can get them for $5. I wouldn't spend more than that on them. I bought these and returned them within 10 minutes for better headphones. They sound distant and lacking, like the sound is coming from another room instead of from headphones. They also do terribly on trebble and are mainly midrange with some bass. They aren'y particularly loud headphones ether, nor are they good enough quality to be worth $50. You can get some great pairs of headphones in the %50-60 range (Sony MDR-XB500 being my personal favorite) and these are not one of those. I am an audio professional and have used several pairs of headphones for various uses. I was planning on getting a pair of these for use while walking for listening to music because I figured they would be loud, but the terribly balanced sound coupled with low power handling make these not only sound bad when they're at low volume levels, but become even more distorted at higher ones. They have worse sound quality than the $3 colby headphones you can get. These I used to wonder why people thought Monster Cable made the best headphones but comparing them to these beats sound phenominal, but Beats also only have the overall quality of about $50-75 worth. Bottom line is I would not suggest these headphones, nor any headphones made by Skullcandy. I also suggest against Monster Cable's audio gear. Go out and get yourself some SOny MDR-XB500's, or save up for the XB1000s or some Sennheisers or Sure or any of the other actual audio companies. Don't get these. Ignore the people saying they're great because they haven't used any other headphones in that price range. Also steer clear of Bose as they are just as terribly overpriced.
p684
aVI purchased these for my daughter, they fit well and the sound is great! My son tried them and he also purchased a pair. I don't necessarily like the graphics. Price was right.
p685
aVThis product is just AWESOME, the price is great, the brand is great, the sound quality is just really great, the bass it has inside hits harder than my Macbook Pro and other famous Headphones brands i have seen... I compared it with a Senheiser that costs over 150 dollars and i can say that they are pretty much the same in sound experience. The cushion is really good, its size is ajdustable, even the cord quality is way superior than others..!!With this headphone i can listen to really noisy/loud music without feeling pain and without hurting my ear.I recomend you buy this product..!!
p686
aVThe hesh headphones cover the entire ear making them more comfortable and blocks out any outside noises.  Since they are so comfortable you can wear them longer and have great sound quality.
p687
aVI managed to get these headphones on sale for $40 and am pretty satisfied with them so far.  The sound quality is great for the price I got it for and further tweaking with an equalizer can further enhance these headphones.  Outside noise is reduced quite a bit and is almost eliminated completely when listening to music at a reasonable volume.  My only complaint is that these headphones aren't quite the most comfortable and the cord for them is a bit short at about 3-4 feet.  They press down on your head a good amount and the pleather headphone coverings get kind of hot after a while.  Overall I think they're a good kind of middle ground headphones.  Comfort may be a bit lacking but their quality is quite a bit above other cheap headphones that I've tried.
p688
aVLow price but high quality sound and construction. I love that the braided cord only comes out of one side of the headphones! Plus awesome looks to boot! What else could you want? Buy these now, you will not be disappointed!!
p689
aVWith less than six months of use, the rod broke left and right earpiece cracked. Unbelievable that a phone that seemed to have as little lasting quality and without daily use.
p690
aVI had listened to my brother inlaw's skullcandy. I was very impressed. It totally blocked out all outside noise. All I could hear was pure music. Each and every note clear as a bell. The bass was unbeilieveable! So for Christmas I bought my brother a set. He is just as impressed as I am. He said everyone should own a set. Here's hoping for my birhtday!
p691
aVokay so i'm going to break this review into parts to make it easier to figure out what im talking about. I am rating them in comfort, style, and sound. each rating i give is one out of 5 starsComfort:****I gave this four stars because despite other peoples comments on this i thought they were coftrable. They fit over my ears perfectly and the headband is the perfect size for my head. I gave this four stars though because i've read from other reviews that the earpieces are too small to fit over most peoples ears, and i do have rather small ears so they might not fit over most peoples ears.Style:**so i gave these headphones two stars for style because they are huge and they will make you look rather dorky. They are also a lot bigger then i expected, but style doesnt matter much to me since i only listen to music with my headphones at home.I would have gave style one star if it wasnt for the cord the cord doesnt tangle and is really cool.Sound:****the sound overall i would give a four because after listening to music with them for awhile i have found they make my ears tired like i dont want to listen to things it might just be my pair though.The sound overall is very nice and smooth. I have found after listening to songs i like i have found new parts i hadnt heard before while using other headphons keep in mind though that i usually use a cheap pair of $15 headphones. Another thing to consider though is that they leak sound. They are also very loud for a pair of heaphones they are about as loud as my old headphones at were when i turn the volume to medium but if you really like loud and turn it up to full volume it has a bit of base which is an interesting thing ive never found while listening to other over the ear headphones.Are they worth the price?:Despite the few problems I found with these headphones I think they are well worth the price. I truly belive that you wont find a better sounding pair of headphones for this price. And if mine do happen to break i will definetly be using my warrenty and getting annother pair. Point of mentioning skullcandy has a lifetime warrenty on these headphones so if its a problem with manufacturing they will give you a full refund and if you break it they give you 50% back on them.so In conclution I think these are worth the price and you should definetly buy them.update:1-2-13 ive had these headphones for quite awhile now and they are still working which is amazing :) none of my headphones have ever lasted this long.
p692
aVthese headphones are insane for the money.  rich super deep bass sound yet clear and powerful.  i dee jay with them ( bedroom DJ here) and they are great and handle the bass with ease...
p693
aVI had two pairs of skullcandy hesh headphones and I'm unsatisfied with them. They look cool when you wear it but for me that was about it. The sound was okay  it wasn't good but it wasn't bad. The thing i dislike about this headphone is they hurt your ears after 10 minutes. Not only that they brake really easily. Both my headphones broke after two months of usage. But, the good thing about this headphone is that it is not expensive for a headphone.
p694
aVAll i can say is wow!! these are a really good pair of headphones, the bass doesn't over power anything. If you like huge bass that will rattle ur brain go with the skullchrushers but, if you want good overall sound quality then get these! The padding on the side are very comfortable and wont hurt ur ears. Also they are adjustable so they can fit a large head or a small head. The cord has a cord type of thing on it to make it tougher. The plug it gold plated witch makes the music sound better and more fresher.
p695
aVMy 16 year old daughter, an "expert in headphones," had been looking in the local stores for this brand. I showed her how much less it was online at Amazon and she picked out the pair she wanted from a much larger selection than we'd seen locally. She's been showing it off to her schoolmates and several have decided to buy the same pair....
p696
aVThey look great, and are really flashy.  Thats about it.I've bought some cheapo Sony headphones for a little less than these that sounded much better.  I also have a pair of akg studio headphones I bought for the same price that sound much better than these.Ironically, I have a pair of skull candy in ears that I bought for $20 that sound much better than these.  That is, in part, why I went for these.  I can't believe all of the possitive reviews.  I'm very disappointed.The sounds were distorting and the bass was weak, even when I messed with EQ levels and moderate volume levels.
p697
aVI received my black and blue pair of SkullCandy Mesh headphones a couple weeks ago and I have to say I love these headphones! I'm a college student who is almost always on his laptop (I use it for music, my tv shows, soccer matches, and sometimes hw) and these headphones seem to excel with whatever I am doing. I was worried that the large amount of bass these headphone promise would take away from the clarity of them, but that is absolutely not the case. These headphones are comfortable also, I only seem to have discomfort with them when I wear them for a couple hours consecutively and am also wearing my glasses, but a simple readjustment should fix that. The thing that stands out to me most is how alive the crowd sounds when I'm watching a soccer match, it's amazing. My roommate often watches hockey on his laptop, and he often borrows my headphones to do so when I'm not using them because it makes the sounds of the ice really come alive! This is an overall great pair of headphones, and I would definitely recommend purchasing them, because like I said before, they aren't just good for music, they're good for any kind of listening.
p698
aVThese are, to be concise, Amazing.I received these as a gift and have had them for a few months, I'm wearing them right now actually, they have performed wonderfully for me.I'm a CG artist, so I spend hours at a time working and listening to music, these headphones are REALLY comfortable and even after wearing them for a few hours (provided I put them on the right way) I don't notice them.I'd recommend these highly to almost anyone.
p699
aVAwesome headsets! For the price you cant go wrong.  They handle the sound well no cracks when the bass gets loud.  They also block noise.  I highly suggest these for anyone who wants a nice pair of headphones and dosnt want to pay out the nose.
p700
aVI got these as a replacement for my beats, but i gotta admit, I'm gonna keep these for a heck of time! Well its true that the sound clarity in the beats is amazing, but the HESH is HELL LOUD! The sound is so loud and yet, so clear ! Amazing headphones! HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
p701
aVThese headphones give the perfect amount of bass that'll keep you rockin' all day long. It gives comfort, a quality other headphones lack. Your ears will be cushioned in cloud-like ear pillows that comforts your head better than any other headphone money could buy. Mix-Masters cost 7.5 times this much and they have no comfort at all. For just $40 you can get these headphones. They ROCK!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
p702
aVLoved this item, especially for this price :) Sound clarity is good. It looks nice too. Delivered on time. Little bit heavy, so might be little difficult in portability, but this thing is really good!!
p703
aVPurpose: Something durable that i can use at work that would block enough of the surrounding sound but still providing deep sounds, at an affordable price.Pro:Deep soundsBlocks off a lot of the surrounding sound. It blocks off enough of the sounds in a office setting. (mildly noisy)AWESOME PRICE (29.99) (better than the BestBuy price of (49.99).Nice lace cord.Quality head cushion.Cons:Even extending the headphone to its maximum size, it was somewhat tight to my head (bigger than average). It is offset by the cushion quality of the earpiece.
p704
aVThis has to be one of the coolest items I have ever bought online.I got it in 5 days and it was in perfect condition. It sounds great and the price is just great.I love them.
p705
aVI really enjoy these headphones. I received them today so I will be sort of loving and bias towards them. My shipping was super fast, they shipped out on Monday and I received them today(Tuesday). They sound good and are somewhat noise cancelling, not completely, but that's OK. I haven't "burned" them in yet so I do not have a good view on the bass, even though I should point out I do want a little bump in my music since I do listen to rap/hip hop mostly, but I don't want it to be too over powered and rattle my ears. You don't need to worry about having them at full volume I only have mine at 40% and they are LOUD. They are not bulky on the head like other headphones and I love that. They were $20 cheaper then on skullcandy's website. They look great, even better in person. Only problem is you can tell from the get go how they are made with plastic. For the price though I'm not complaining I knew what I was getting. They fit comfortably on the head and I enjoy wearing them. Overall I get them a 8/10. Only thing holding back is the plastic and because I haven't gotten to experience them burned in with full sound quality and only having them 1 day. I would recommend these things in a heart beat for people wanting a stylish good pair of cheap headphones. Hopefully skullcandy expands into other sports like football and I would gladly buy another pair of Steelers!!
p706
aVSkullcandy's are awesome headphones, They're not THAT delicate, I'm very rough with my headphones because I only buy headphones that can take a beating! I bought a Celtic's pair in 2009 and it lasted me a year (My ex boyfriends pit puppy chewed them apart) after the quality of the sound and bass and for under $100 I decided to buy another pair of Skullcandy Hesh headphones, I bought the shattered Rasta ones, I was worried about them not lasting too long because the cord was plastic instead of braided (Like the Celtics ones) but they lasted until January 2012, and the pull down part broke, they still work (nothing a little duct tape can't fix) But I'm not wearing duct tapped headphones out in public, I ordered another another pair and again, AWESOME headphones, You cannot find another pair of headphones with great quality sound and bass for the price of skullcandy (between $50-$125) and with HEAVY abuse they last about a year, NOT bad (Before skullcandy I was buying $20-$50 headphones that'd last me a month or two, then I'd have to replace them)
p707
aVThese headphones put out great sound quality and have amazing drown out sound so i don't have to listen to people in the background. HOWEVER, these are incredibly delicate. One day i moved my head forward with these around my neck and barely touched them and one side of the ear snapped. Ridiculous how terribly made these things are. They're made out of plastic and a fake leather arc for the head cushion at the top. Skullcandy did an incredible job making people think that these headphones are worth the price. They fooled me
p708
aVSeriously I wish I could give them a 100 stars. They are freaking amazing. They're loud and block out most other sounds, the music comes out totally clear and awesome! GET THESE HEADPHONES!
p709
aVI bought these for my 13yo, who's very picky, and he absolutely loves them!!! The colors are bright so they don't get lost, I'm not hearing, "Where are my headphones?" I would recommend them for anyone that loses things easy. Also, the sound quality is superb!
p710
aVGreat price and good sound for headphones at this price.  Shipping time for the product was very good.  The product was shipped the day after it was ordered.  Works great with the i-pod my son has.  Recommend these headphones highly.  You can't go wrong for the price and sound.
p711
aVAt first I was a little skeptical about buying them, but it seemed the good reviews outweighed the bad. Plus they have a lifetime warranty:) I am a reckless teenager, and i break things easy. I have had these headphones for almost three weeks, and they seem pretty durable to me. nothing has broken, snapped, tangled, or fallen off yet. These headphones may not be good for the serious audiophile, or a DJ, but for a teenager or young adult with a young budget you can't beat the price. period. I love them. Let's start this off with looks. we all know skullcandy is top ranked with style and fads, so the fact they look awesome is obvious. I love Bob Marley and Rastafari, so these are perfect for me. PLUS they have a super strong cord. It's made of nylon or some kinda fabric, and it's only on one earcup. the cord hardly ever tangles. perfect design on the cord for my uses (listening to music at school to drown out the teacher). Now comfort... they can be a little annoying, but if you adjust them just right, they feel fine. at first i thought the earcups hurt pretty bad, but after a couple days the leather really loosened up. they may not be very practical for some things. try hiding these under a beanie or hood so you don't have to listen to what your teacher's saying. NOt a big problem for me, i just carry some ear buds along. But for traveling these are pretty good also, and they come with a cool little travel bag, a stencil, and a bad-A sticker i put on my phone. These headphones are great overall, and the only downside for me is the noise leakage. if your'e listening to your music at halfway volume level, the people around you can hear it also. My mom doesn't like Dr. Dre at all, so when i use these around her or in a quieter place i have to turn it down pretty low. at lunch when the halls are filled with screaming girls and obnoxious guys they can't hear it at all, so you can listen as loud as you want. I like listening to these around my neck because they're like carrying speakers around. really good sound with an equalizer. if you can customize the sound that comes out of these cans, DO IT! I listen to a lot of rap/hip hop reggae, and rock, so if i can put the equalizer just right they sound really great. Oh, and even when the volume on them's pretty low, you can only hear your music. noise cancelling to you, but not to people around you. overall, i give them a 4.5/5 for my purposes, and considering the good, the bad, and the ugly.. I LOVE MY SKULLCANDY HESH's.
p712
aVWhen I used to listen to music it was like a surface level sort of thing, I got the music in and that was that. I'd been using Skullcandy headphones for as long as I can remember and had never even considered over the ear until recently. When I first got my buds I thought I had never heard music the right way before, it was just so much more immersive as Skullcandy tends to be. When I bought this product it happened again, I rediscovered sounds in my favorite songs that I didn't know were there, minor nuances that just made the sound a much more enjoyable experience. I would definitely recommend this product to my friends and any and all consumers as well. Great quality as always from Skullcandy.
p713
aVI'm pretty picky with audio equipment and I would not have purchased these if I had not owned a pair of Skullcandy before. I purchased my first pair of Skullcandy on clearance, because I needed a basic pair for work (quality didn't matter). After using the 2XLs ( the other set) I was immediately impressed with the quality. The lows weren't over enhanced and the highs were very clear.After I purchased this pair I wasn't expecting to be disappointed and I was right. The quality of audio from these headphones is very high, especially for the price. The lows aren't over emphasized and the highs are crisp. The mids seem to be just lower in volume which is perfect for my taste.I've seen some complaints on this product and I can't imagine them being caused from the headphones themselves. I'd suggest getting a pair and trying them yourself. A few reviewers suggest that the device determines the audio quality and that's not particularly true. The quality of the music depends on the file you place on the device. Most devices that were made any time recently are built with the hardware to handle higher quality audio. If your music is 128Kbps then you can't really judge anything. I'd suggest 256Kbps at minimum and 320+Kbps preferred.The noise cancellation is remarkable. My wife was listening at maximum volume next to me on the couch in a silent room and I couldn't hear anything at all. She never knows if I have the music on or not when I'm wearing them.The mesh wrapping on the wire protects it immensely. The plastic sheathing on typical wires get pulled and tugged very often and the mesh is very strong which prevents damage on the wire.The 3.5mm jack is very small so it's not bulky. It seems sturdy even though it's very small.The wire comes from one side of the headphones keeping the wire from being across your face.Buy these headphones, you won't regret it unless by some chance you get a DOA.
p714
aVThese headphones are good on the whole, and for $30 they are well worth it. That being said, i did not find them too comfortable, as they are squeezing in on my head and causing my right ear to hurt a lot. Its probably not as bad as I made it sound, but a factor that should be considered when buying the product.
p715
aVthe headphones are very good quality construction material of good quality, sound quality is good without being excellent and the price have a very nice style.There are better options, but the brand has skullcandy headphones good enough to enjoy quality music with good sound quality.
p716
aVI will get right to the point, I only have a few things to say about these headphones after I have used them for about 5 hours watching movies, tv shows, listening to music and playing video games on my computer.PRO: soft ear pads, very nice crisp sound undistorted by excessive base, the look is good and they do wonders to keep sound out.CON: there to tight around my head, they compress the cartilage in the back of my ear and it hurts after about 1 to 2 hours or so, but I knew about that before I bought them from other reviews. If it worn't for that one thing; I'd give it 5 of 5 stars.
p717
aVIll flat out say buying this product was a mistake, its only use for me now is backup in case my main headphones die and i need to wait a bit to replace them..  I give it one star Maybe the version i got was messed up or its just me but i noticed that the sound quality for me was sub-par. sounded like playing through cheap speakers my logitech wireless headset had better sound then this did......not only that but i found it had a very small but stil present annoying feedback noise when plugged in that my other headphones did not have . to my computer.Cant believe i wasted 30 bucks (plus 4 bucks overnight shipping) for this product. Too much of a hassle for a return because then youll have to get the box sent to you , repackage it.  get it to be shipped blah blah blah. and thats one of the reasons i shop on amazon.. no hassle. to be fair its not amazons fault. either the headphones i got were defective or its just not the best product and half of the people reviewing it need their hearing checked OR it could just be that it works fine on cd players and the like, but has bad sound when used with a computerwho knows.either way i dont care Im not wasting my money on another skullcandy product again.  Besides honestly the headphones were a bit bulky for my taste anyways should have just got the replacement sony headphones that broke.  didnt have overnight shipping but i could have waited.ugh.  thanks a lot Skull-candy expecally considering i had a pretty bad day today so this didnt help at all.whatever.
p718
aVI was able to get these for 30 bucks, and for the price range, these put out excellent sound. Crisp highs, full lows. Very nice. I highly recommend them. They're comfortable too.
p719
aVThese headphones are awesome! Before i ordered them i had these headphones that really hurt my neck and i listen to a lot of music when i travel places especially when i'm roaming around at the basketball tournaments waiting to play, i don't want to have a stiff neck before the game. I highly recommend these headphones to anyone who likes comfort and style!
p720
aVThese headphones had Very good sound quality, they fit my had nicely and were extremely comfortable on my ears and head. The only reason for the loss of a star is that the sewing on the ear pads was uneven causing the headphones (when not stretched out) to not be flat when touching. Other then that,great. Not really worth 60 dollars but, I bought them on sale and they were defiantly work the 32 dollars I paid!
p721
aVMy son really wanted a pair of headsets and of course he wanted the most expensive ones. Since I couldn't afford the preffered headset we compromised and settle on the Skullcandy hesh. He was able to pick his favorite color and style and the sound is great. Not to mention that his friends at school liked it too.
p722
aVI will start off by saying these headphones arent bad, just not the greatest. Right out of the box you will notice they are rather "creaky" and feel a little cheap, however I am not too worried as they dont really feel delicate, just plasticy. Mine has a cloth cord, which I like a lot, it feels tough and its unique. The packaging was a huge pain to get into, they seal it everywhere possible, so you really have to hack it up to get the headphones out. Upon first putting them on, they feel a bit tight and almost stretched out to fit over my head. They do make your ears very warm (to the point of sweat) and for me they get uncomfortable to wear after only about 20 minutes due to them being very snug. Because of this I wouldnt recommend these for gaming sessions or media editing.Getting to the sound; at first they sound "in your face", deep bass and loud. I have read that headphones need a "burn in" period, which is basically a break in period, and that headphones will sound better after several hours of playtime. I began to notice improvement in overall sound after about 3 hours of use, vocals sounded cleaner and everything was more balanced. Going into specific genres now, we'll start with metal and rock. The vocals sound a little overpowered here and dont really stand out against the music. Also metal can become rather fatiguing to listen to as these headphones make it very boomy/thumpy. For metal and rock, I would rate them a disappointed 2/5. Next some bass heavy dub, which sounds good on these, any vocals come through nicely I dont really have any complaints there as I think these headphones were meant for bass heavy tunes, so a 4/5 on that. Now trance/dance music featuring crisp vocals; the vocals could be better and the again the beat of the music tends to compete with the vocals which are supposed to be the focus, but they do sound pretty good here, I give them a 3/5 almost a 4 but not quite.Bottom line: based on the price (not comparing these to top of the line headphones), sound quality is an overall 4/5, but the comfort and build quality/fit are at a 2/5 so I give these headphones a 3/5 total rating. In my opinion they look very goofy while worn, they do have some cool designs though. The way they are marketed makes them come across as more of a toy or fashion statement than anything else. Understand that these are marketed for teens mainly, so thats why they arent the best for adults, like myself, in terms of fit. For the price of them they are not bad, but I would suggest going with something else as there are so many other brands of headphones for around 50 bucks.
p723
aVThis is amazing and i heard about these headphones having mini-subwoofers in them. It sure sounds like it to me. For the price I would buy these over any name brand. Like Dre Beats iFROGZ or anything else.
p724
aVThese are amazing!  The quality is amazing, the sound is amazing!  I love how they come with their own satin carrying bag, embossed with the 3 tag on one side and the Skullcandy logo on the other.  I am so impressed with their built in mic- the sound quality is amazing (both for myself and the caller on the other end) and they are so comfortable!  The construction is great, the only draw back is the white around the pillowy ear piece-- being a woman, they will probably have makeup residue left over, but I could not be more satisfied with this purchase.  This price is phenomenal and the quality is so well worth it.  I have used many other types of headphones/sound equipment.  I was a little hesitant after reading reviews, but I will be gushing about these headphones to anyone who will listen!  MUST HAVE!
p725
aVin my words these head phones are horrible i got these for child and she says that when she has her iPod on medium the left side goes out and THESE ARE THE WORST HEADPHONES I HAVE EVER GOT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
p726
aVThese are great headphones, I got them for my son for Christmas. They got here before christmas so no problems with them getting here late. Great sound and they our easy to use.
p727
aVThese headphones sound the best of all the headphones I've ever owned, good base and quality sound. My only complaint, and something I'd say to watch for is that they are very large and look pretty stupid on your head. Good for wearing around the house, but thats it unless you like looking like a chopper pilot.
p728
aVI bought these for my husband for Christmas and he loves them. He stated the sound quality is great and it blocks out external noise.  He really likes the cloth cord as it does not tangle or knot up like the plastic cords. His favorite part is the 'Rastas' theme as it reminds him of  his trip to the islands.
p729
aVI loved the headphones they are the s**t they are loud and sure it leaks but just a little bit and really i dont mind that at all because it more than makes up for it with the high quality sound over all i really dont see how some people hate on them there comfortable and reliable if you know how to take care of them. over all these headphones are beast..
p730
aVI purchased this as a gift for my 16 yr. old grandson. He loves them! I tried them out and the sound quality is great! I may have to purchase some for myself. They cancel out surrounding noise well. The cord design is fantastic, it does not become tangled. Quality product, well worth the price.Skullcandy S6HEDZ-058 Hesh Over-Ear Headphone (Rasta)
p731
aVI saved like 20 dollars because they cost 55 in stores, and the one day shipping was awesome. I got them just in tim in they work gre. Great buy, great performance, and it comes with an awesome free sticker. BUY THEM!!
p732
aVA great headset but I do feel that for the price of $50 there are way better things out there.Sound quality is worth the $50 and I'm sure you'll be satisfied with that. For me however, the sound is all it's worth. The headset itself feels flimsy and is made of cheap plastic. The parts where it extends tend to break and because of that you need to be very careful about where you put them down and how you wear them. If you have a rather large head like I do, this may not be a good idea.All in all an ok headset. But one you need to be super careful with.
p733
aVThese Rasta Hesh Over-ear Skullcandies are a great product. Here are some pros/cons:Pros:Great soundSturdy/durableSoft cushioningCool colorsAdjustableBlocks out most of the soundCons:Gets uncomfortable after a whileNo DJ articulationNot considered noise cancelingThe headphones come with a spray paint templet, sticker, and a black bag to hold them in.For the price, I would but them again.
p734
aVI'm going to be using these for regular use outdoors and what not. So when I tested them out, the sound quality was AMAZING. Way better than my headphones that I received with my iPhone. You definitely get more than you what you pay for in my opinion. The bass is amazing. However it does not affect the quality of any other sound in my songs. You don't need to listen to these at full volume like I normally do because they are LOUD and amazing.
p735
aVThese headphones sounds really, really good.  The only issue I have is that they are not very comfortable and after about 30 minutes they start to feel really heavy on my head.  I have a pair of SK Low Riders and while these sound better they are much more comfortable. I do plan on buying another pair for my brother because he loves the sound too! I have had really great experience with Skull Candy so far!!
p736
aVI bought these for 9 year old son because my older son had the DreBeats.  These are by far the best and inexpensive headphones that I have ran across.  Not only are they very attractive but the sound is terrific.  Trust me for a long car ride or a long day in the basketball gym these are the way to go...
p737
aVI got these headphones for myself as a Christmas gift.  I've been wanting some "real" headphones because I just got tired of how pathetic earbuds are.First the GOOD:  The sound is good, pretty much what I was expecting from earphones of that size/price.THE BAD:  Despite its padding, and despite breaking them in, these headphones squeeze in AROUND the ears too much (not the actual ears).  I can actually feel the pulse of my heart beat push through the pressure the earphones are creating.  It's very uncomfortable after just 5 minutes or so, which is unacceptable because, I mean, who the hell only wants to listen to 5 minutes of music.  I put a large bottle in between the speakers so as I'm not using them, it will slowly break in the phones so they aren't so stiff.  Even though they are significantly looser now, they still restrict the blood flow around my ears.  I shouldn't be able to feel my heartbeat through my freaking ears/head when I'm trying to listen to music.IN THE END:  Good sound, but too uncomfortable to wear long enough to enjoy anything.  For $50, that's kinda BS.  Unfortunately for me, I can't find the receipt.  If you buy this, SAVE THE RECEIPT.  I wanted to give 1.5, but I guess 2 stars from this reviewer.
p738
aVI love them. Being a DJ I know what songs should sound like and this did the job better than I had expected. They are a quality product with a relatively small price. I own some on ear Bose headphones but they might be replaced. I'll recommend these to anyone. Only reason their getting a 4 is that they tend to be quiet with certain devices, like my phone.
p739
aVThese headphones are great!  They are probably the best headphones for $32.  The bass is great and the sound is definitely comparable to beats by dre.  Just make sure to take care of them or they will snap.  There is one flaw though.  The only problem is that if you are listening to these headphones for about 1 1/2 hours-2 hours then your ears will get sore.  Other than that, best headphones I've listened to for the price:)
p740
aVI love SkullCandy headphones, but was a little disappointed at how stiff the ear covers are on these headphones. It makes wearing them for long periods of time a little uncomfortable, and sometimes painful so that I can't wear them anymore and have to take a break. I am going to see if I can replace the ear covers with a softer more cushioned cover, but if not then I will be purchasing new headphones somewhere down the line.Also when I bought these they were around $50, what a waste of money now that they're cheaper!!Other than that they have great sound, I love that the cord is covered in a cloth lining - it makes it more durable!
p741
aVI don't know why so many people hate these things. They are good cans with comfortable, soft leather ear covers. My only complaint is that THESE THINGS LEAK. I'm not worried about my cans leaking, but if you need private headphones, these aren't for you. But if you're like me, these are good headphones, with nice clean bass especialy for hip-hop/rap. I ordered them late wednesday night and they were here friday morning. Great buy, I deffinately recomend them.
p742
aVMy son plays basketball and is 10 years old. He loves these headsets they are durable and sturdy. The sounds is very clear and because he is a Miami Fan this just adds to the enjoyment. I would recommended this to anyone who loves the team and loves music.
p743
aVI purchased a pair of these Skullcandy Hesh headphones a couple of years ago, so the price was much higher back then. The current price for these headphones is pretty decent for what you're getting sound-wise.Quality-wise, these are poorly built. There is absolutely no padding whatsoever on the speakers. My ears hurt very bad after an hour or two of use. I had to resort to putting a thin piece of cloth on the speakers so my ears wouldn't feel any pain. The fit is also very tight as it felt like my head was being squished.Now onto the durability, which isn't all that great either. Since these headphones have such a tight fit, they also have a tendency to easily crack around the band. Thecord also started having issues (a common theme with most Skullcandy products) and stopped working, so I had to do without the volume-control.Now, finally onto the sound. The sound is actually fairly decent. Very crisp highs, and decent lows. The bass blends in well and doesn't distort.Overall, I wouldn't recommend these headphones to anyone due to the comfort issues alone. It's a real shame, because the sound quality on these headphones isn't bad at all. But, it's simply not worth the damage that will be done to your ear.
p744
aVWhen I was going to to buy this headphones I saw a lots of negative comments from youtube and other places but I still bought them and the funny thing is that they are 10 times better then the panasonic rp htx7 headphones that my brother has and does headphones only have good reviews on youtube. The skullcandy have better sounding,it louder, and the material that the skullcandy is made of is more finer then the rp htx7. So don't let other sites confuse you about buying this product. It is so great I bought another another skulcandy.
p745
aVI bought these headphones because I didn't have enough money to buy a better pair, and was just hoping for the best. When they arrived, I listened to them, and was extremely pleased with the quality of the audio. I would say they are just as good as Beats for a bargain. These headphones are great for a great deal.
p746
aVGood headphones basically especially for the price. Great sound, they are extremely comfortable. Wore them for about 4 hours straight yesterday and had no pain on my ears. Comes with carrying case. They aren't too bulky. Looks just like product picture which is good. Fast shipping even with Super Saver option.
p747
aVAfter looking at noise cancelling headphones @ $150-$200 a pair, my son settled on these for abou $40 on Amazon.  We tried the Dre, and to me, they are a piece of junk.  So, for $150, you are getting a noise cancelling piece of junk that is a status symbol due to the name.  I read reviews on the Dre, and everyone complained about the breakage, and they were right.  I went to Best Buy, and the floor model was broken.If you want good quality and nice sound, these SKULL CANDY headphones are for you.  I used to DJ about 20 years ago, and I fell in love with my Sony headphones and I have them to this day.  They weren't noise reduction, but they worked just fine.  Same with these.  I can hear the highs and lows very nicely and they handle the digital sound perfect.  Why spend all that money on a name, just buy these.Specs:-These fit nicely OVER his ears.-Cord is a nylon covered material that doesn't kink or knot.  It's a great feature.-Color is cool.-My 11 year old son loves them.If you decide that you want noise cancelling headphones, forget the Dre or any of the midline stuff, and buy BOSE quiet comfort headphones.  They are worth the money.  If you want a good entry level headphone, these are very good and won't break the bank at $40.
p748
aVThese headphones are great! The price was amazing and shipping was fast and easy! The sound is pretty good considering my first choice were beats by dre headphones! I recommend a pair to everyone! Very pleased!
p749
aVThis product is wonderful my children love them.  The headphones has great sound and anyone of any age would love them.  My children love the team i chose for them and they have just had a ball with this item, i recommend it to anyone!!!
p750
aVThese are awesome people wrote negative reviews are crazy. I'm 45 been listening to music a long time Dj some in my life.now don't get me wrong they are no beats by dre. But they work very well crisp and clean with plenty of Bass .........I Love. Them ....just got them today and I have had them on for 4 hours ..Great Great Buy.
p751
aVThe red plastic part on my pair is about to snap. I'm very easy on my headphones as they are so bulky, I make sure to carry them separately in my hands instead of my backpack or anything else.I haven't even had these things a year, and they're done for. I also don't use them very often, either. I only usually use them on road trips with my folks.The sound quality is pretty good for the few months you DO have them. I've also read a few other reviews with this exact same issue.
p752
aVFor such a low price, these headphones work extremely well. Unless you are very serious about the kind of headphones you use, these are perfect. I can still hear what people are saying around me when I am using them but it is not a problem for me. Sometimes after wearing them for a long amount of time they need to be adjusted because they hurt my ears. Otherwise no problems.
p753
aVI got these for my teenage son for Christmas, and he absolutely loves them. He says they are the best headphones he's ever had, and he's had a lot of them. I was going to get them directly from Skullcandy, but they were a few dollars less here. So I got a great deal, in a timely manner, and they were exactly what I expected. What more could I ask for
p754
aVI listen to music casually and these are of very good quality for the money! I'm satisfied. There are way more pros than cons when it comes to these headphones. Definitely one of the best gifts I got for Christmas.
p755
aVI just recieved my Hesh Skullcandy Headphones yesterday and I already love them.  They came with a carrying sack and they are very good for noise cancellation.  While it doesn't cancel all outside noise, it is sufficient.  The only bad thing I can say about these headphones is that they aren't quite as loud as I would like, the maximum volume isn't very loud.  The bass also leaves something to be desired, but it is pretty good for the price of these headphones.  I would definitely recommend these to someone else.  Now to see if they're like all other skullcandy headphones and don't stand up to time.
p756
aVI purchased these for my grandson for Christmas.  He was very pleased with them.  Evidently, they are all the rage.  The price was excellent compared to other online prices I found and the item arrived within a few days.  It was great.
p757
aVI bought these for my husband.  He is a huge Blazers fan.  They were $50 at our local store and half that on amazon.  He loves that he can plug them in to his computer to listen to the radio while he is working.  He also loves to use them as a hands free device for his iphone.  He has expressed many times how much he likes this product.  My only complaint (which isn't really much of one) is that he can't hear me very well when he is up in his office with the headphones on and I am downstairs.  Great product, great buy!
p758
aVBought these headphones as a gift for my husband who is loves listening to his iPod while running.  However, when he uses earbuds, he has problems with vertigo. So, I thought these headphones may be worth a try. He loves them. My husband says not only has the vertigo disappeared, but also the sound quality is awesome. These are great headphones especially for use during running.
p759
aVBRU THIZZZ THINGS ARE SO AMAZING ITS UNBELIEVABLE AN FOR A PERFECT PRICE IF U WANT HAED PHONES BUY THESE THERE WORTH THE MONEY DONT WASTE THEM ON ANY OTHER GAREBAGE HEAD PHONES
p760
aVI bought these headphones for my disabled daughter who loves music... These Skullcandy Hesh headphones were the best set of headphones I personally have ever bought. The quality was "out of this world"! They are comfortable for her and stay on her head very well.  If you want a Great set of headphones... I would buy this set!
p761
aVThis product is great! Unlike the highly overrated beats by dre, this product costs on 30 on Amazon and is just as good. At times almost sounds equal to/better than the beats solos. I definitely recommend these style headphones for anyone looking for good quality affordable headphones.
p762
aVthese headphones are very confortable and I am able to wear them for hours while playing guitar. I did compair these to much higher priced headphones such as Sony, Beats, and Bose. there sound very similar and the price is far more resonable.
p763
aVPurchased these for my nef. he loves them. the bass is on point and the look makes his friends green with envy. For the price of 36 bucks you cant beat these headphones. In the store they where 69 bucks.. great buy
p764
aVMy Mom bought these headphones for me for christmas and at first they weren't the ones i wanted at first i wanted the skullcandy skullcrushers, moslty for the bass.  When I got them I didn't know what to think of them because i hadn't look up on them very.  I had actually wanted a pair of good headphones moslty to listen to music and to help out when creating music for mixing I do like bass I'm very into my bass music and I know there are people that say that the sound sucks and that the bass is cheep and that your better off buying a cheep pair of earphones which is stupid because they have amazing bass they aren't over done most headphones can get into bass.  I thought the sound of these headphones were awesome to me the cancel out just enough sound so I can focus on what Im working on.  They are built really good they have very comfortable and i have big ears, and the cups fit really good on my ears I can listen to them for hours on in and my ears won't hurt.  also the built on the top of the headphones has amazing padding.  I also have read that they look extremely cheep, but to me they look really cool, and they also come a nice little bag that is very nice.All in all great pair of heaphones for a person who is in high school and doesn't want to spend a whole lot on headphones because I am know to break stuff very easily so far they are very durable.Beast headphones!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
p765
aVI bought two of the skullcandy headsets for my sons for Christmas in late October.  Christmas morning when these gifts were opened one of the headsets only worked in one ear.  Being the the order was made early I guess that Amazon will not replace it, only give a partial refund.  I will begin buying elsewhere in my Christmas shopping plans, where gifts are not opened and tried out immediately.  I guess it does pay to shop local is cases like this for Christmas gifts.  Navigating the Amazon returns process is an endless loop once purchases are two months old: a very aggravating process in trying to contact this retailer.
p766
aVThese are decent headphones.  They are a bit on the small side if you have larger ears.  Sound is so-so, bass gets a little muddy.  For the price they aren't bad I suppose.
p767
aVThis headphones are awesome, cheap in price, and you can buy much more expensive Seinheiser ones that sound a lot less powerful that this ones. They isolate surrounding noise very well, and the bass is powerful yet not intrusive in the quality of the music. They also look great, GREAT HEADPHONES; GREAT GIFT! I use them with my Nexus phone and they sound great.
p768
aVThis headphones are amazing they sound so clear and does not hurt your ear with the music even if you put it on blast. They look really koo and they might be like the BEATS but they sound as good I had BEATS and they sound good and this ones have replaced them I am going to stick with SKULLCANDY :) I highly Recomended.
p769
aVI have had these for about 3 weeks now, and i have nothing bad to say about them. The sizing adjustments lock securely into place. Quality sound comes out at any volume level. There is a little sound leakage at higher volume levels. Ear pieces fit comfortably when they are fitted right, i wear them all day long at work. the cord is wrapped in something that keeps it from getting tangled at all, and it is just long enough to go from my face to my pocket. All in all there is nothing i can complain about in a pair of headphones i paid $30 for.
p770
aVthe shipping was amazing i got them right away. they are VERY noise cancelling and very much worth the purchase. i love having them, the cord is just long enough to sit comfortably in my deep pockets and not yank. very sturdy and very vvery good sound quality
p771
aVI bought these headphones for snowboarding and lounging around the house. I had read that there was issues with them breaking but I figured these people were just being careless. I was wrong. The joint where the extension piece operates is just fragile and cracks after usage. I had these headphones 6 months and in that time glued the piece back together 3 times. Sound is great but considering they are made and sold to be durable, they are far from that.
p772
aV### Updated 2 December 2013 ###There are absolutely better headphones available to enjoy music on, that should be obvious.  But someone with a budget, who can't spend more that a few bucks, isn't going to consider a $300 pair of cans when shopping around.  I'm going to be as objective as I can be and only review the Hesh based on its price range.  (even though reviews like these are very subjective)MY EXPERIENCE:  I've listened to music avidly since I was old enough to walk.  Oldies, soul, RnB, classic rock, funk, alternative, metal, hip-hop, punk, even classical on formats such as vinyl, cassette tape, CD, MP3 and telepathy based music (word).  I'm only 29, but I think I have a fair opinion on how each genre should sound when you hear it reproduced on audio equipment.  Professionally, I've been in a career for 7 years now that involves serious critical listening skills (transcription of foreign languages).  I won't bore you with the details, but almost every day I wear a high-end 2 lb headset for about 12 hours.  I also dabble in amateur home studio music production, and have learned much in the past years about mixing and mastering tracks on reference monitors and headphones (shouldn't mix on headphones though).  I hope that you will trust me with at least the technical aspects of this review.THE BUILD TYPE:  The Hesh is a pair of Closed Back Circumaural (around the ears) 50mm driver headphones.  The two main types of circumaural headphones are closed back and open (or semi-open).  Most likely, you won't be able to find a set of open-back headphones for under $50.  That shouldn't bother you though, since open-back headphones have an airy sound (a drier, tinny sound).  Most people who want to 'enjoy' their music will prefer a closed-back set, this allows for a typically deeper sound, with more natural bass.  The soundstage may become more cramped (because of the physical properties of the headset), but I would say people who are going for the Skullcandy are looking for a more exciting extraction of the music they listen to.  This is to say that the main demographic of Skullcandy consumers is probably those folks who want 'Beats by Dre' type sound but can't afford it.  You want bass, you want it in your face, and no less (whether its good for the music or not).  I get that, and hopefully Skullcandy gets that enough to include some quality in their production.THE BUILD QUALITY (4 out of 10): I've already seen a fair share of negative reviews criticizing the build quality of these cans.  Know one thing, something made of thin plastic is easier to break than something made of metal or wood.  It shouldn't take a genius to realize that its more affordable to build something out of plastic than other nicer materials.  The Hesh is made of cheap plastic, so it can be sold cheap.  Increase the material quality = increase the price, duh.  That being said, there are a few things to be realized.  I am a responsible adult when it comes to taking care of my electronics.  When I buy something that lacks durability, I treat it as such, and am careful with it.  Most Skullcandy users are probably the young crowd, teens or whatever.  A younger person can't be expected to be as responsible with their possessions, especially since their parents probably paid for it.  Parents, if you're complaining this headset falls apart after a short period of normal use, you should probably re-evaluate YOUR definition of 'normal use'.  A kid will probably break this headset before an adult does, this is just the nature of responsibility (in my opinion).  Continuing, here's what I think of the quality.  The worst offense, I'd say, is the ear-cushions.  They are very stiff right out of the box.  The first few hours/days of wear time will be somewhat uncomfortable until the stiffness loosens up.  I hope in time they will soften up, because I'm use to gel-filled pads with my work headphones, and soft leather ones with my studio reference cans.  The earcups are also somewhat on the small side.  I have a larger head, with medium size ears so I was a little surprised how small the earcups were when putting it on for the first time.  The head band is also cheaply made, with minimal cushioning against the head, but not completely awful.  Wear times longer than an hour or 2 could get pretty uncomfortable, and perhaps sweaty.  I don't think these headphones were made for very large heads either (like I was saying, more for teens) as the compression on my head is fairly tight.  The cable is shorter than would like it to be, its about the same length as my earbuds cable.  I would prefer at least 6 feet for circumaural cans, a cable as short as this one just makes the headphones feel more like a toy.  The build quality of the cable is also pretty cheap, and will probably be damaged by accidental crimping, tangles, tie-ups, etc.  To avoid this I just have to treat with care, like I plan to.  To summarize the build quality, I will just say two things you should expect: cheap plastic, stiff cushioning.(((UPDATE: The stiff earcushions are still a bother, and the smaller size of the earcups still lead to quick discomfort after listening for more than 30 minutes.  Nothing has broken or been damaged yet, but the uncomfortable build is still a major issue for me.)))THE LOOK (6 out of 10):  This brand (and market) of headphones is usually more about style than substance anyways.  Quality costs more, but looks cost almost nothing.  These are larger headphones, so wearing them may make you look goofy; but only as much as any pair of larger headphones you put on.  They look okay, and there are several flashy styles/colors to choose from.  If looks is more your thing, get Skullcandy.SOUND QUALITY (2 categories)1.  BURN IN-  10 minutes (5 out of 10): Right out of the box they sound like expected.  Unrefined across the  entire spectrum (w/IPOD).  But know that almost all headphones need a break in period (called the burn-in).  The burn-in period could be 24 hours of play-time or it could be 200 hours of play time.  It really depends.  At the  time of only 10-30 minutes of play time, I find it to be too strong in the low-mids and also  high-mids.  The bass at first seems to be attractive, but I realized after a few minutes that it was  actually the pumped up low-mids that sound like bass frequencies (they are just above the bass frequencies).  The chief problem with boosted low mids (or any part of the mid frequencies) is the problem of listening  fatigue.  Some headphones are so well balanced in sound that you could listen all day and your ears won't  be tired or worn out.  I already listen to headphones all day professionally, so listening fatigue is extra  irritating to me.  The last thing I want while listening to my music is a headache from boosted dB in any  part of the frequency spectrum.  It just shouldn't be there, but at $50 or this kind of deficiency should  be anticipated.  You should also know that at this point I've only tried these on an IPOD, which I'll go  over soon.  My opinion at 10 minutes of burn-in: Almost poor.  It needs more time to break in, then I'll  re-evaluate it.  24 hours (combined playtime): Not much difference...  3 months : Unless the source of music is EQ'd before reaching the headphones, the sound is going to be less than satisfying.  Plugging them into a non-EQ'd source (even a high end one), you hear the sound flaws of the headphones.  I don't think these headphones have aged very well after break in.2.  FORMATS:  IPOD (6 out of 10)- Most customers of the Hesh will probably use it primarily for the IPOD.  EVERYONE should realize the problem with listening to an IPOD with any kind of headphones: The audio source  quality is just as important as the headphones thru which you listen to it.  If you plug a set of $300  headphones into an IPOD, do NOT be surprised if it sounds just as crappy as a $20 pair of headphones.  The IPOD, while it is a great readily available media for playing music on the go, is not made for the  HI-FI and audiophiles market.  You MUST expect a lower quality of audio when plugged into it, and should NOT  be surprised when your music sounds like junk listening to it thru any set of cans.  This problem is  exacerbated when you listen to a lossy compressed audio file (usually an issue only with MP3).  To truly  evaluate the headphones, without unfocused or unknowledgable bias, I have to check the IPOD against other  formats.  As a tip, if you're going to listen to music on the IPOD with these, select R & B or Classical as  the EQ setting.  I find either one of those settings covers most music genres nicely, and makes them more  pleasant to listen to.  Bottom line, the IPOD is far from the most ideal listening source, when it comes to  audio fidelity.  (((UPDATE: While I don't think the IPOD is a Hi-Fi level source, listening to music with the EQ setting on R&B;  seems to sound pretty good.  I switched out between listening to a un-EQ'd vinyl record thru a Marantz receiver  and the IPOD, and the IPOD sounded better.  I think it was because of the EQ setting.))  Laptop (6 out of 10) - Not much better than the IPOD, with one exception: I can control a 10  band eq with most audio programs I use.  The key to using the EQ is you want to subtract the right  frequencies rather than boost anything.  This will help to avoid listening fatigue, which if you don't  know by now I HATE.  If in any program (such as ITUNES) try these settings: Boost 32hz and 64hz 3 dB,  cut 125hz and 1khz by 3 dB, boost 250hz and 500hz by 1 and 2 dB, respectively.  Boost 2khz and  4khz by 1-2 dB.  Boost 8khz by 2-3 decibels and leave 16khz alone.  This might help bring better  sound out of the headphones even if only marginally.  DAC - ((updated)) My recording interface is a USB Roland Octacapture.  Essentially it is a digital to  analogue converter.  I only listened to a few things thru this with the Hesh, so I can't properly evaluate  it.  But it seems like it would sound okay thru this, but just for listening to music or playing video  games.  It'd be horrible for doing any audio work (like mastering a track).  Headphone Amp - ((updated)) I didn't end up getting one, but I still highly recommend it, especially a  tube headphone amp.  It helps balance out impedance problems in the signal chain.  I'm sure the impedance  is low on these though, I haven't checked in a while.  Low impedance headphones are easier for amps to  drive.  Stereo system - ((updated)) I have a Marantz SR7005 surround sound A/V reciever system at home.  When I  tried the headphone output while listening to a vinyl record player thru a high-end preamp, it sounded  pretty terrible.  It lacked clarity, the bass sounded really muddy, and I couldn't believe the mess being  made in the mids.Thanks for reading folks, this is the final draft of this review.  I sold the Hesh at a garage sale late last year.  I'm very happy to be rid of it, but that's ONLY because I can afford better headphones.  I've owned Denon AH-D5000 headphones this whole time as well, so consider my bias for expensive gear into this review.  I know the Skullcandy Hesh is a cheap piece of plastic to most, especially me.  But its not made for HI-FI snobs, its made for the affordable crowd who want a flashy pair of cans with pumped up bass, even if the listening spectrum is badly unfocused.  If $50 or less is your budget, I say go ahead and try them out.  But be prepared to give them time to adjust to being played, treat them with care, and plug them into a good audio source ((or use R&B; eq setting on IPOD)).  But I would look at other brands/models first before getting these.  And stay FAR away from Beats By Dre or any other similar knockoffs (Ludacris makes some).  They are truly the epitome of overcharging for garbage quality.  There is too much snake oil in the audio equipment world, don't be the one to buy in to it.
p773
aVMy son bought these for himself for his Ipod. A great product. Eliminates outside noise completely. Well made and a good value. Skullcandy products have been long lasting in our home of teenagers.
p774
aVIf you like listening to music these are the headphones you need! the sound is great, as well as have microphone, you can use them in the computer to talk on skype ... Excellent product!
p775
aVPros:These are great headphones.  they are extremely loud and give out great sound.  on my laptop i would normally have my volume at 100% and have problems hearing it (using on the ear headphones), but with these i need my laptop around 25% and i cannot hear anything outside of the music playing.Cons:These headphones are over the ear and if they would be just a little bit farther from the ear they wouldn't start to press against my ears.  after about 6 hours it start to hurt the edges of my ears (but it may be just me, because i have some big ears).  but this usually goes away after 5 min of having them off and them i am ready for another hour.hope i helped.
p776
aVI have to say, they're just okay. They don't fit over my ears quite the way I'd like, and they were a tiny bit small for my head. So for those people who have large heads, it's not probably the best product for you.Plus, they're just so bulky. I didn't think they'd be quite as bulky as they were =/But one good thing is the wire. As with all Skullcandy headphones I've ever bought, the wire is covered in fabric instead of rubber. It's therefore more naturally durable, though if you're not careful it can actually break more easily.
p777
aVThis was my first time ordering from Amazon and I am so pleased with my purchase they are exactly what I saw online.  They are a gift for my son for Christmas.  Way to go Amazon!!!
p778
aVThese headphones I would consider average. They have good sound and also hug the ears. They problems is the wire is thin and weak and can be easily torn. They are also very fragile. Don't expect to bring these headphones everywhere they aren't durable.Pros:Good soundComfortableHug ears won't fall offCons:Wire are thin and weakNot durableCan't fix all head sizesNot very portable (even carrying around neck)
p779
aVThese head  phones are most definitely funky in appearance but I'd have to say that the sound quality isn't all that great. It's perfect for me when I need an escape but if you're walking down the street with passing cars? Forget about it. Even if you turn your ipod up all the way to hear the music you're not going to want to because the distortion of the speakers makes you want to cry. But like I said, they're perfect for around the house use and I use them all the time.
p780
aVSo Iv had these headphones a lil over a month and Iv put them threw a bit of abuse and there still intact even tho they do feel like they might break any second but they havnt and the sound quality is amazing...I love um
p781
aVBought these as a xmas present for my 16yr old sister and I'm sure she will be very happy with them - great price, arrived to me (in NZ) really fast too which is awesome thanks amazon :)
p782
aVlove my headphones sound is clear and love that i can answer my phone through headphones and warranty is awesome when my headphones stop working informed skullcandy and they replaced them with no problem plan on buying same type for my brother for christmas
p783
aVWith so many great reviews I was really looking forward to receiving a really solid pair of headphones. But I didn't think these Skullcandy headphones were as good as people said they'd be. Personally I thought it was too heavy on the bass, which I found ok for hip hop and r&b; but not really suitable for other genres. However, for the price I can't really complain though because really really good headphones run hundreds upon hundreds of dollars. So overall I'm pleased with what I got based on the low price I paid through Amazon, but otherwise if you pay retail price then I don't think it's worth it.
p784
aVFor the two weeks than I had these BUMPIN' cans, they suited my needs very well. I mean these things had great bass response, highs, lows, mids but after about two weeks, the little adjuster bar thing cracked and broke. So, I did the  thing that everyone else does, I sent them into skullcandy headquarters for evelauation. So I have been waiting...and waiting...AND waiting for them to give me the heads up that they have recieved the damn things and say that they will send me a replacement set. NOPE, I have been waiting since APRIL for them to send me at least an email or text or SOMETHING. I sent them emails and emails and emails. Just do yourself a favor and don't buy headphones from skullcandy...
p785
aVThese headphones are amazing for 30 dollars! I cannot stress it enough! The sound quality is incredible for the price. They are also very comfortable. I cannot say how durable they are becuase i only got them today, but if you take care of them they should last. One tip: when you take them on and off do it in a straight line. This prevents less movement of unnecessary parts. They also come with a pretty nice carrying bag. Also, don't bend the cord around the jack too much so the cups will still work.
p786
aVOh my gosh, do these HURT to wear! I can't wear them for five minutes before I start fidgeting. They are so tight they make my ears numb. I tried wearing them upside down and it helps, but I shouldn't have to do that and it still hurts, just less. They look snazzy, the cord is sleek, and they work but they are no better than the $20 JVC dinky ones I got at walmart in sound quality. They are nothing special and not worth the money or the pain!
p787
aVThis Product is Amazing!! Its built pretty sturdy, the material feels nice, and it fits pretty nice! For $35 on amazon compared to $50 dollars at zumiez this is a great buy! It shipped pretty fast even with the Free Shipping option and they sound great! Wouldn't mind buying another pair sometime! :) Great Product overall, the only thing is that after awhile your ears get kind of hot so you have to ventilate them a little bit! But I don't mind that so for me they work perfect!
p788
aVI got these for my sister for her birthday. She really enjoyed listening with them. They have very high sound quality and fit very comfortably on your head. The cord is also very sturdy, but I wish the internal part was made of metal rather than flimsy plastic. Overall good buy. Get it!
p789
aVThe packaging was taped back together but it was a refurbished product. The headphones themselves have been reconstructed to a degree of quality higher than that of a pair of the same headphones that my friend just bought fresh from Skullcandy. These cans are, for the price, very high quality and the build construction is solid.The headphone cord is thicker than normal and feels very sturdy and does not tangle. The cans fit tightly on the head but the head band is not noticeable and only the headphones themselves can really be felt especially if you are not thinking about them. Again, this particular product feels more sturdy than an original from the online store and it clamps onto my head more securely than the original, though it is still comfortable and not to tight. Your ears do get warn and i use mine as a replacement for earmuffs when it is cold outside but i have never had a problem with "sweaty ears" so I cant comment much on these headphones from that angle.The padding is more than sufficient although there is some sound leaking if that is an issue. Above 75% volume on a standard ipod will allow others around you to enjoy your tunes with you if they listen close but the leaking isn't significant and is easily offset by the sound quality.Bass is low and clear with minimal distortion even at high volumes. The Highs and Mids are clear as well although it is obvious that these are built for bass emphasis. Acoustic and concert music both sound wonderful and the sound stage is adequately large and deep. They are built for R&B; but i have yet to find a song or genre that sounds less than adequate through these cans. I listen to a lot of House music and artists like Morgan Page sound wonderful on these.Hesh Headphones are not professional quality and do not stand up to headphones priced in the 200+ range but for the 30 i paid for them through amazon they are head, shoulders, and body above other headphones that can be bought for the same price. I highly recommend these headphones for anyone looking for a solid mid-level pair of headphones that can take a beating and still keep playing and pounding on. I personally would have paid full price for these (49.99) if I had needed to and still would have  gotten my moneys worth.
p790
aVIve always went with earbuds when it came to something to listen to my iPod to but this time i decided to try out these headphones and the sound was better than any earbuds Ive listened to. maybe if u have used other headphones other than this than your opinion will be different. i looked for the cheapest pair of these and i found these for 30.00 which is awesome because these cost 50.00 usually. they don't break easily Ive only had them for about a few days but Ive fell asleep with them and no damage was done so i wouldn't call that easily breakable maybe if you like throw them at a wall or something then yeah they will break. Ive found nothing wrong with these headphones yet if i do i will update this review
p791
aVNot gonna lie, but these headphones do actually produce great sound. But since they're essentially all plastic, they break so easily. I had mine for only a month until the adjustable band on one of the headphones snapped in half and I had to super glue it together. And it lasted for about a few more months like that! I mean, the sound still worked and I didn't really care as long as it worked and the other band was adjustable... But... Then the other band broke where I couldn't fix it with superglue, and then the sound started going... All in all, they're great headphones but NOT worth the price. $50+ for cheap plastic. Do more research before investing in ANY SkullCandy product. You're just buying plastic and design.
p792
aVI was pretty hesitant to buy this but once i got it, i loved it. Yes, it is true that this headphones are not very comfortable and feels like a burden on head after extended use, bu, it is worth for the amount of money spent. The sound quality is great, bass effects and beats are pretty good, better than the ipod ear phones. To avoid the disadvantage i mentioned, i keep on switching between my ipod earphones and skullcandys at some intervals. Also, one big turn on is the look. It looks SEXYYYY..It also comes with a small skull sticker(Rasta) which i stuck to my ipod case on the back :) ;) Makes it look FUNKYYIt is a good buy, i find it better than any other skullcandys especially skullcrusher and GI. Great value for money.
p793
aVI recently got the "Rasta" version of these headphones, and I am more than satisfied (as always when it comes to Skullcandy).Comfortable fit (even with an earring in), easily adjustable. Sound is a little more bass-prominent, whereas I find the earbuds to be balanced, but my skullcandy earbuds hurt my ears after prolonged use. I can use these over the ear headphones all day (literally, a 24-hour period) without feeling discomfort.Great for music, great for TV or movies. I'm sure you could find headphones with a better sound, but for the price? These are clearly the winner.Also, it came with a drawstring pouch for toting the headphones around, a sticker (that you can put "somewhere cool" and submit to Skullcandy for a possible prize), and a stencil of the Skullcandy logo.I love the design, and the top of it is wrapped in a real woven band (feels nice). My family complimented me on how awesome they looked. The cord is a bright green as shown. It easily untangles (and doesn't tangle easily) but I find that it sticks to its shape (if you bend the cord, for example, it's going to stay a little bent). It's the same type of cord as the earbuds I have. It's also pretty long.The headphones are also durable-- I've dropped them about four feet and nothing happened, also I accidentally banged the two parts that go over your ear together, with no damage.All in all? I can't find a downside to these headphones. I'd recommend this buy to anyone!
p794
aVThese headphones are really awesome! I agree with all of the other 5 star comments, these are boss. If you go on YouTube, there are a lot of really helpful reviews on skullcandy headphones, especially for the Hesh's. If you are wondering if these are going to cover your ears, my ears are on the smaller side and they kinda touch the inside edges, but this shouldn't be a problem. I'm positive that these aren't cheaply made and that they ARE durable. These are sick.****************************************UPDATE!*************************************After a week of daily use for a week or so, one of the wires broke internally. Sweet while they lasted, I guess. I know a friend who has a pair of these and his have lasted a few years, so I guess I got a dud.Oh well.
p795
aVLove these skull candy's! For $30, best headphones I've ever purchased! After previously breaking MANY sets of headphones (by the plug in part) I love the way the headphone cord is covered! Worth the purchase, I use them when working by myself, at home, and taking rides to places. They block out all noise, and get very loud! If you have the money laying around and need headphones, I do suggest these!
p796
aVMy son saw these online after he saw another pair that I purchased for my older son and wanted them for his birthday.  I bought them as a surprise and we sure were surprised when he got them. They look very cool and sound GREAT!  I actually considered buying some for myself because I like them so much! I've had great luck with my Skullcandy earbuds and was confident these would be well worth the money and they are.  They fit nicely, are light, and made very well.  I have recommended them to many friends and would definitely say they are a great value for the price!!!
p797
aVI'm purchasing a set after using my brother's for a long time. I have no idea what most reviews are talking about. The product is durable, as I do like to wear them while sleeping or laying down. The sound is perfectly fine for headphones, and I'm willing to splurge abit just for a brand name. I admit they did get uncomfy after awhile, but that was because of my small hoop earrings pressing into my ears. Flip them in, or take them off. Otherwise, beautiful.My only big issue was the fact we didn't have enough for everyone in the house!
p798
aVThey are made of brittle cheap plastic and are shaped oddly. They are not really comfortable and the sound quality is disappointing. It seems that the bass is way too high. The bass overpowers and muffles the song. The cord is really really nice and the colors are even better. thats really about it. I recommend the Roc Nation Aviators by Skullcandy.
p799
aVThese have turned out to be a very good product. Ourson wanted a pair of headphones for his laptop thatwere functional, but also expressed his love for hisfavorite NBA team. He's very satisfied with them.
p800
aVThis is my first set of over ear stereo type headphones.  I've used ear buds for the past few years, and I am definitely not an expert when it comes to anything audio.  But Wow!  What a difference these make!It's awesome to be able to hear the same favorite songs in a new way.  It's like you can hear what the artist actually intended you to hear.  I walk to class with these on all the time, and they do a good job blocking out the noise from the outside.  You can still hear certain things if the volume is low enough, but that's okay with me as I'd rather hear a car coming at me than not.I love how the headphones look.  There have been some reviews saying that they don't fit very well.  I think it's like a new piece of clothing.  They definitely felt awkward at first, but after about 2 days of wearing they felt like part of my everyday attire.Durability might be a question, but I've dropped these, smashed them in my backpack and choreographed my hip hop dances with them on and they don't show any sign of breaking.  Honestly, I try to take care of them but since I'm at so many placed everyday they do get banged up.  You can't beat the warranty, and that was a huge factor in me buying these.Overall I would recommend these to a friend.  Other people might say different, but I think they look great, feel great, and sound great.
p801
aVI am a programmer and am looking for headphones that I can use 8 hours a day. I picked up a pair of HESH at target for $45. I was impressed by the sound quality for the price, but I'm no audiophile. Unfortunately, I have to return them because after just one day of use, I have found that they pinch my ears. My whole ear will fit inside the leather but it is very uncomfortable after about an hour.
p802
aVI got this delivered in a timely fashion as always, coming from Amazon. At first I didn't like them because they made my ears heat up too fast and didn't envelop my ear as I would've like. After about a week though it became better. The sound on it is nice, rap music, rock or whatever, the sound is always nice. The sound also doesn't leak that much, so you can listen to decently loud music and not bother your surrounding. It's a nice purchase for the price.
p803
aVThese headphones are the best headphones I've listen to. The sound is so crisp and clear and the bass is fantastic. Top of the line. Skullcandy Hesh's are second to none. Nuff' Said.
p804
aVAfter trying some Skullcandy earbuds, I decided that the quality of Skullcandys products was good enough to purchase some earphones. After seeing the prices of high quality earphones, I felt that  Skullcandy would be a good value. I chose the Hesh earphones mostly on looks but the specs had a little to do with my decision as well. When I received them I immediately connected them to my iPhone and played all different types of music to really test them out. Sound quality overall is good but the bass isn't as deep as I had hoped it would be. They also weren't as loud as I would have liked either. I don't want to blowout my eardrums but sometimes you just want to crank it up and you can't really do that with these earphones.
p805
aVThe sound is awesome but they break for no reason and customer service is a Gamble trust me find a better brand. The warranty is a joke. You send in the headphones and they decide whether or not the damage is something you caused. IF they determine the damage was your fault which most likely 90 % of the time they will, all you get back is a 50% off coupon on your next purchase. They keep the headphones and you loose half of what you paid for them. Some warranty. The headset adjuster is made of cheap plastic that breaks simply because you take them off your head.They lasted about 3 days. I am very disappointed in this product.  My advice... go somewhere else to buy headphones.
p806
aVAfter reading several bad reviews, I figured maybe they just had a defective product. After weighing the good and bad reviews I decided to buy them and if I did not like them I could just return them. It took only two days after I placed my order to get my headphones and I have to say they fit great. Some reviews say they are bulky, they don't fit right over my ears, they are made of cheap plastic, when you wear them around your neck it does not fit right. Well to the not fitting right over the ears I will be the first to say I have huge ears and these fit comfortably and with any over the ear headphones you have to adjust them after wearing them for a long time. They are a little bulky but that is exactly what you are buying, bit headphones that will fit over your ears. One review I read about the cheap plastic and they bought it for their child(teen) and after a few days they broke. I am only 22 and can tell you those headphones did not bread from normal wear, the teen probably horsing around with his friends dropped them and broke them, as with anything if you drop it or are rough with it they will not last. Overall I give these headphones a 5 out of 5 and they are about 60% noise cancelling without music on. I don't know what other reviews have said but when I am listening to music at half volume I can't hear anything, they are perfect. I highly recommend these headphones. (and if there is any defects skullcandy has a warranty and will replace them or if you break them you can get a new pair for cheaper)
p807
aVI've been using this headphone for like two weeks now, and so far it has met my expetations.The sound is not very loud, still it's clear, and as it avoids most of the outside noises you won't need it to be very loud.The material seems very week, but the cable (where headphones often break) is very good and flexible.For the price, i guess it's pretty much worth it.
p808
aVI just ordered these headphones a week ago, and one of the sides is already starting to crack. I even treated these headphones like glass. These are just way too fragile.
p809
aVWhen my brother asked me to buy him these I thought they were a ripoff but I eventually bought them. After he finished using them I decided to try them on and see how well they sounded, my mind was blown. Being the first high quality headphones I think they are amazing, whatever music you listen to is going to sound great. Now a few months after even I started using them on a daily basis when my brother is at school so they get like 7 hours of use everyday and they don't seem to notice. We don't treat these like they are some sort of jewelry they are always on on the desk sometimes I wear them to go workout.The build is very durable and I don't know how other users manage to break them in such a short notice, they must treat them like crap.
p810
aVThe headphones are great the sound needs a little bit of improvement but for the price it's a lot more what you can expect for, the thing is that they feel a little bit heavy compared with others that I had, when you used them for a long time they feel a little bit uncomfortable. They look really cool and most of the people like them.
p811
aVThese headphones have the greatest sound and bass I have ever heard! These are DEFINITELY the BEST headphones I have ever had! I recommend these to everyone looking for great sound, great looks, and a great fit for headphones.
p812
aVThese skullcandy hesh headphones were by far the best skullcandies i've ever owned. They expanded far enough to fit over my larger than average head, a feat that the skullcandy crushers can't boast. The only problem I have is the comfort after an hour or two. The top really pushes down on your head. Still, an overall superior pair of headphones.
p813
aVIt works well with my  laptop but when I connect this headset with my iPhone4G to play music, the music stops. The Amazon spec did not mention anything about the compatibility issues.
p814
aVNot only do they feature some cool art on the ears, but they are a great sound cancelling pair of headphones. I use mine everyday and love them to death! When people see them, they're in awe at how cool they look. I recommend them to everyone who is a casual music listener. They're not extremely loud or bass thumping but they definitely get the job done - and at a great price!
p815
aVMy mom brought me to the mall the weekend before my birthday since y birthday was the second Monday of school & I couldn't have a real birthday party & I told her I wanted Dr. Dre headphones but then we found these awesome headphones & since they were cheaper than the Dr. Dre ones & more cool looking she got me those instead & now just yeaterday I noticed once I got on the bus that 1 of the speaker things was loose but figured it'd be fine so i continued to use them for thr next few hours but 2 or 3 hours later the speaker thing came almost completely off only dangling from the cord. I don't use them roughly or anything, I a very careful with my stuff, in particular any thing that was given as any kind of present 9especially if it's as awesome as these headphones. These are sound canceling and even have some sort of blue tooth in them so u can talk on the phone for ages without having to unplug them and putting ur ohne 2 ur ear. They are extremely comfortable and fashionable looking even come w/ a bag that I find a waste of money, since I only ever used it for about a week and got sick of it & now only plan on using it when I pack my headphones for a trip or something. Anyway I went to a cousin's place and she was able to glue the speaker thing back on & said I had to wait 24 hours to use them again so I am going 2 try them out & see how it goes, hopefully I wont have 2 buy a new pair of these. :(
p816
aVThey are really stylish. The only down fall is the cheap plastic. My last pair broke and i tried to order more on skullcandy,they were discontinued. I was lucky to find them on here though.Other than that they deliver in every aspect.
p817
aVI'm really not that hard on headphones. I'm not dancing around in them and people don't come over and use them. I use them for my work doing transcription. I am very disappointed to have to report that already -- in less than six weeks' time -- the right side earpiece is breaking off. Guess I'll have to go back to paying a lot more for headphones that will last for a decide amount of time.It's too bad. I had no problems with the sound and I think they are cute -- but breaking so easily just ain't cool...!
p818
aVI have a large head, and med ears, these fit over them perfectly. The sound quality is well balanced. They are not over bassy but have some kick to them. Good full sound.
p819
aVSkull Candy's headphones are like no other I have seen, they have a variety of interesting designs that stray from most competitors. But have they sacrificed physical quality for an appealing look? I must admit I really brought these headphones because of the awesome design and I have heard some good words for the actual sound quality which was quite promising and true.Although the setbacks that made me think "Why didn't I read a review like this one" was that upon sleeping in my SOFT bed full of PILLOWS with the headphones on I woke up in the morning to realise the frame supporting the two earmuffs together had suffered a gut wrenching crack. The headphones are still usable and it isn't much of a problem, but if I were to accidentally bend the frame any more it would surely snap. Now you could probably point the finger at me and say I could of rolled around too vigorously at night which would of snapped it, but I have read quite a few articles online by a simply Google search to use as my evidence of a poor quality frame. The major problem I see here is that Skull Candy is a well known brand and should live up to its expectations, in Australia you have to pay about $135 dollars at the local skate shop for these, I'm just glad I got them for an awesome price at Amazon.Now my half hast attempt is to try warranty them at Skull Candy Australia, if I get rejected it won't be a big deal. Now if I were to have brought them from the local skate shop here I would of surely had to tie a slipknot out of the audio lead and kick the chair.
p820
aVI am a HUGE fan of The Miami Heat and ofcourse Dwyane Wade. as soon as i saw my friend with them on my bus i said, i gotta get myself a pair! i went to stores in dolphin mall and stuff but they were 60-70 $$$ i found that a little too much so i went on amazon.com and i found a great price for only $31.40!!! i got my credit card and ordered them right away! i got them today they r great headphones, the bass is amazing! the style is cool, and the headphones r just plain awesome! i gotta say it feels cheapy and crappy but not if u take care of everything thing like i do. i dont even let my parents nor my sister hold them. they r delicate so dont rip them off ur head or u'll get wat u did...rip them off...but overall i'd give them a 4.5 awesome headphones i highly recommend these!!!
p821
aVThese are the best headphones I have ever bought. The sound quality is pretty good and the bass is awesome cause it doesn't overpower the whole sound. I would recommend these to a friend and I am already saving up for another pair
p822
aVthese head phones are great my friend has a pair of dre beats and these arent quite as good but they are amazing for the money they fit superb are comfy and the sound quality is AMAZING for the price i was blown away with the quality and the price the sound cancelation isn't perfect but it is pretty decent the bass is as good as you can get in headphones without a subwoofer amp thingey if your looking for more bass look at skull crushers but overall these are amazing im not too concerned i take good care of my headphones and if you do that you shouldnt have a problem with breaking plus theres a lifetime warranty :)Skullcandy Skullcrusher Over-the-Ear Headphones (S6SKDY-119) - Blue
p823
aVNeeded a new set of headphones. But I'm not made of money. There are more important things in life than to have the ultimate iPod experience. These ears sound excellent and they didn't break the bank.
p824
aVSo I got these for a 13 year old as a birthday present. So far it looks stylish as I got the "Dwayne Wade" Edition. The cloth is cheap looking but solid. The only place that really concerns me is the plastic adjustable part that allows your headphones to get smaller or bigger. It seems pretty easy to snap....even a 13 year old could do that. Anyways I just got it a week ago and the sound is good. Bass is solid and higher pitch parts are above average. Make sure you leave some breathing room for year ears though. They are very tight and easily make your ears sweat. Overall I would buy this item again as it was only $31. Although no Bose, I may just buy 7 of them to equal the amount I paid for my bose :)
p825
aVMy son bought these and loves them...Mom...listen to this! Of course he's now sequestered in his room and I wonder when I will see him again. (I'll save on food). He was proud I saved him some money by finding them on amazon instead of ordering them directly.
p826
aVI got it for my brother for his birthday and he loves the headphones and I have tried it as well and its a good product. The sound is great and I like the look of the headphones as well.
p827
aVI ordered these earphones for my son.  He seemed to be very pleased with them as they are always around his neck.. The quality of the sound is absolutely top notch.. They were so popular in this house that I had to order another set for the younger sister.. Very cool!  Greenbean
p828
aVWe got these headphone for me to run with and just to listen to music at home. For the price the sound is fantastic and the bass is awsome..would hightly recommend them
p829
aVAt first, I loved my Hesh Skullcandy Metallica headphones.  With the tight ear pads and in-line volume control they were the perfect match for my treadmill TV watching.  However, because the sliders for the headphones are plastic they cracked and became broken.  Now my headhphones are useless.So even though in the short-term I enjoyed them, they did not last without breaking.  In looking at the Skullcandy website, I noticed that most of their overear headphones have plastic sliders.  This is something that clearly needs improvement.
p830
aVThese headsets are great for the price!!!  The highs and lows on these headsets are outstanding.  Most importantly, there is no bleedover as others around you don't hear what you're listening to.  Will see how long they last me.  I would recommend these headsets to another.
p831
aVSkullcandy Hesh is a very good quality. I was very satisfied with my purchase even after a couple months of use. However, these headphones are not very comfortable for prolonged listening sessions. The plastic headband is soft. Later I noticed a small crease on both sides. This crease continued to grow until the cups completely dislodged and held on by only copper wires. However, the headphones failed during the return policy period, so I got refund thankfully. I would buy HESH again if Skullcandy improves in the plastic quality.
p832
aVthese are some of the best headsets i have ever bought and the padding is awsome and the bass is the best and another thing i like about them its like theres nothing in the room bt music because with those normal earbud headphones you can almost hear everthing in the hole entire building
p833
aVThese headphones are just fantastic. I was hesitant to order them at first because I ha know nothing about them. Once I got them i instantly loved them great comfortable feel. Adjustable and amazing sound quality. Also not a pair of headphones either. what else could you want in a pair of headphones?
p834
aVheadphones are great! provide just enough bass to love the song and still understand whats being said. For $38, I feel as though I got a great deal. Only problem if I had to point one out would be that your ears do get hot after wearing for a while.
p835
aVMy opinion about these headphones - they are very good. The sound quality is great. They are comfortable ,too.I am really enjoying them! Plus,I'm a D. Wade Fan , which makes them even better for me.
p836
aVI've owned a lot of headphones and this isn't one of my best pair but they are great. They have amazing bass that rocks your head, great sound quality, and amazing look. They feel great to put on and I just love listening to music with them.
p837
aVGood product for the money. Sound quality is good, I like the rope feeling cord, and the noise cancellation is fine if turned up at least halfway. The only real problem is that they leak a pretty good bit but I only use mine when I'm alone so that doesn't bother me. Overall a good product and if looking for a solid pair of over ear headphones less than 50$ then this is a great item to consider.
p838
aVThis brand was suggested by a cousin of ours, i have never heard of it before and to be honest did not expect much for the price paid, however, its build is acceptable(could improve a little) but its sound and fidelity is simply outstanding to the point that it makes me think that it does not make sense to spend more than $40 for any stereo headphones.Bought them for my 11 year old son and he is thrilled.
p839
aVI wasn't thrilled with these for a couple of reasons. 1) the sound quality wasn't as good as I expected, some of my skull candy earbuds sound better than these did. 2) The quality of the materials used to make these is awful! the extensions (so that you can adjust how they fit on your head) snapped off within the first couple of weeks)
p840
aVI just received these in the mail today-safe to say this was a pleasant surprise to come home to. Anyways so i checked out the reviews and i must say i was amazed. before buying these i read all types of reviews from amazon to best buy to skullcandy itself and upon trying them myself i give it a solid 5 stars the quality of the sound is great the bass is clear and on point the drops you hear them wetter than rain. the durability appears solid as they are well manufactured and so long as you take care of them they shall last you- but then again all electronics are that way no?So i'll finish with this; if your on the fence about purchasing this product cause of the few bad reviews or on the fence in general i say GO FOR IT!! any fan should have this as its a great way to support as well as listen to your favorite jams. lastly these are $60 headphones available for 30-35 thats a steal in my opinion! NYK 2012!!!
p841
aVNice huge headphones with very decent bass and a pretty solid build. Cord is short, but I like that because I only use it for my computer while I do HW. Cheap and decent headphones.
p842
aVLet me first state that I am a Radio DJ and an audiophile. I know how good headphones sound and I know how bad headphones sound. Normally low-budget headphones provide decent sound quality. After owning a few pairs of different Skull Candy headphones, I can honstly say that they are all just gimmicks. The 2011 Hesh headphones sound terrible. They sound extremely flat and the bass is virtually unnoticable.  As I just stated, I know how bad headphones sound and for Skull Candy to market these as premium headphones with 50mm drivers is complete BS. I have listened to a complete multitude list of songs and albums set at different kbps and genre and each song sounded terrible with these headphones. A cheap pair of Sony headphones sound way better than any Skull Candy product.The only genre that sounded better than Apple earbuds was Rap/Pop/Dance/Electric. Rock music sounds awful with these. So if you generally don't care and want to look cool, by all means waste your money on Hesh.For similarly priced headphones I would recommendSennheiser HD 202  II Professional Headphones (Black)for these have the best overall sound for entry level over-ear headphones. Trust me, AVOID SKULL CANDY!!
p843
aVThese headphones HURRRRT!!! to wear. They are extremely uncomfortable. The sound quality is decent enough but the build of these headphones is terrible. The chord will wear through at the base where it plugs into your audio device. Skullcandy has great headphones, this product just isn't one of them.
p844
aVI work in retail and stock various priced headphones, in and over ear. I have tried many of them out. The hesh's have to be the best sound for the price of all the ones I've tried. The construction isn't top notch, as 6 months after buying part of it broke so now the left ear piece is a lil flimsy, but it is still held together and manageable. Will def buy another pair. The price and sound quality is Uhhhhh-mazing!
p845
aVI have been using these headphones for approximately one month now, and I am pleased with my purchase.  The sound quality is some of the best I have ever had for paying $35 dollars for headphones, and is an incredible improvement over the $30 (vastly overpriced, and utterly crappy) Apple ear-buds. They have the typical good quality of parts that Skullcandy is known for, and they feel solid and fairly sturdy. These headphones DO NOT have any significant noise cancellation when you are not listening to music, but they were not advertised with that capability, so I was not expecting much. When you are listening to music you hear almost nothing else. My only complaint with these headphones is that, because I have a rather large head, they put some pressure on the top of my head, which can get uncomfortable over time, but it is not anything serious.Overall, this is a great product and an excellent purchase for anyone looking at budget headphones. I absolutely recommend these headphones.
p846
aVi absolutely love these things they sound amazing and at only 30 bucks where can u go wrong? They are not poor quality in any aspect i think they are very well built and the sound does even the most complex sounding song justice!!!
p847
aVMy husband bought me these headphones for Christmas 2010.  I'm an administrative assistant and use them for work.  To avoid my headphones getting lost or broken during my commutes, I keep them under lock and key in my desk at work.  I take extremely good care of my things.You can imagine my surprise when both of the headband adjustments cracked and broke by February.  Mind you, I don't even adjust the headband because they fit find without it.  The material is a cheap thin plastic.  I went to the Skullcandy website to see if I could get a replacement set and I did.  Only that the replacement set took nearly a month (March)to get back and I had to pay for the shipping, which was not reimbursed, about $8 and some change.  The first time, I'll give them the benefit of the doubt. However it is now August and guess what?  The same headband adjustment material, that had already begun to crack in July, has broken yet again. If you're keeping count that's 2 sets in less than 9 months.I'm contemplating on sending them back again, but what would be the point?  Eventually, I'll have to continue sending them back and spend more on shipping and handling than the damn headphones are actually worth. I feel bad for my husband that was laid off last year, because it took him a few months to save up to get them for me so he'd have something to give me on Christmas.Wait there's more! The headphones are cute and I find them reasonably comfortable but the noise leaks...a lot.  On days I don't want to wear the headphones I could easily use them as speakers with my iPod volume at less than half way and that's not a compliment.I would not recommend these to anyone. I find that they are banking on a trendy brand name and designs, other than that the quality is terrible.  Do not buy.
p848
aVMy cat killed a pair of Sony studio reference headphones and I was in desperate need of a pair of over ear, middle of the road price range headphones.  I found these on sale from here and was stoked when they arrived.  I was pleased with the design up close, and they sounded decent.  Not as as much deep bass as my old Sony headphones, but punchy enough to get passed it.  They started out a bit tight but loosened up over time and the ear pads were comfy. The sound isolation was good enough to block out most noise but not all.  The problem is the durability. The cord is tiny and feels as if the slightest tug will sever the wires and instead of making the adjustable part(which IS the stress point on these) out of metal, they used plastic.  3 good months of usage and they snapped  right above the ear... bummer.
p849
aVthese headphones came 2 days earlier than scheduled so that was and upside when i got them i quick opened the box and opened it  i put them on plugged them in and the sound quality was great also it blocks out the surrounding sounds very well. then i plugged them into my iPod and when for a bike ride i couldn't even tell there was wind because of how good it blocks it out finally there one of the most comfortable pair of headphones ive ever had.... ive tried beats by dr dre but i prefer these over them
p850
aVFor the small amout of money i paid for it, i guess you get your moneys worth. The sound is good, as well is the noise canceling. The one that that urked at me, was how small the headphones where. The ear piece did not fit around my ears very well... In fact there increadbly small. They only seem to fit my 9 year old brother, and then its still kind of tight. Just keep that in mind when you purchase this item.
p851
aVPlease read this before buying!! These are my SECOND pair of skullcandy over the ear headphones. The first ones where the foldable subwoofer model and they broke after about 6-8 months of use. I chalked it up to coincidence and concluded they must have been weak because they were collapsible. So I purchased this pair here, treated them like they where made of glass, and they are still already fracturing after less than a MONTH of use! The plastic part where the ear piece slides up and down is what has started to crack, causing one ear piece to be much less snug than the other, and I KNOW it will eventually just snap off just like my previous pair did. Learn through my experience - DO NOT BUY SKULLCANDY. They look awesome and sound great but WILL BREAK ON YOU IN LESS THAN A YEAR OF REGULAR USE, EVEN WITH THE MOST GENTLE OF TREATMENT.
p852
aVFor me, when a head phone costs more than $50, it better be good. I bought these at the store for $50 after my other headphones broke. I like these big ones, but they are kind of hard to find in stores. Its mainly just ear-buds they sell, which i don't like.I bought that and Sony MDR-ZX100 Headphone for $20, so i spent about $70 on both headphones. Anyway, I tried Candy first, because they were bigger. I was disappointed that it didn't come with a audio enhancer on the cord. My other pair (that broke), for $30 came with this feature (they lasted about 5 years or so). I put them on, and they fit my head very well, and your ears just slide right in.I turned it on (my MP3 player), and noticed it sounded different than my other ones. It sounded lower quality than the one i replaced it with, so i fiddled with the custom setting on my mp3 player, ect. It still sounds off to me, like the songs are low Q or something. If it makes any sense, it sounded like a triangle in terms of how the music is distributed. The lower stuff, guitars, ect, come out on both ends of the head phone and sound further apart (stereo), and to me, more balanced, but the vocals and drums are at the top, and sound like they are more mono, like a focal point, which bugs me. I guess if you like this set up get it, but the other headphone i bought, Sony MDR-ZX100, are square, as in, it doesn't sound mono, and everything is stereo and balanced, rather than having a middle-like focal point.The cord is short, but very light, it looks like a string, which is nice. It doesn't look like it will tangle or knot easily. It should have came with a sound enhancer for $50. IIRC, the one that does come with a sound enhancer is like $70 or something crazy.It comes with a stupid sack case thing, and a stupid sketch thing, just to raise up the price probably, I could have lived without both. These will be my backup head phones, and Sony's will be the main stage for now.TL;DR[-]Overpriced[-]Doesn't come with a sound enhancer[-]One cord coming out of the left side[-]Comes with a stupid carrying case[-]Drums and Vocals sound mono (like a focal point or something)[-]Other instruments sound stereo[-] I like the design with the skull[-]Short cord[-]Cord isn't heavy or bulky, but very thin, string-like[-]feels cheap[-]Light (as in, not heavy)Overall, its ok. It comes down too, if you like the focal pointing or the drums and vocals sounding mono or not. Not bad, i like a few thing, but the focal point kills me. Also, its very expensive, and doesn't come with a sound enhancer.
p853
aVI bought this item for my son but it does not appear very durable because in a few days the narrow part of the head piece snapped. I do not feel I got value for money.
p854
aVthe sound quality in this headset is great it is sturdy and a great design the only thing i have a problem with is how it fits on my head. i use them when im on my computer and after about 30 mins i have to re-adjust them they have caused headaches. mainly just fix them every so often and there wont be any problems. overall quality and sound is good but the fit could use some tweaks
p855
aVMy 15 year old begged for this headset. Delivery was prompt (actually earlier than expected) and my son was elated. He never takes them off. He says they are comfortable and no matter where he goes he gets compliments and requests to know where he bought them.  Great product!
p856
aVI bought these hoping I could get a descent pair of headphones for $50 at best buy.  At first feel the plastic feels cheap, and the ear pads are stiff and not very soft.  They fit very tight on my head, it was very uncomfortable to wear even for a short period of time.  My hat size is usually a 7 1/2.  I returned them and picked up the phillips o'neill stretch headphones from amazon, and they are extremely comfortable for my big head.
p857
aVthese are great headphones. they look awesome but they hurt alittle when you have them on for a while. i had mine for 5 months and so far only the part that you pull to make it longer broke. i super glued it and it still works amazingly. i definitely would recommend just take care of them!
p858
aVwithin a few days of receiving my headphones one of the speakers stopped working. Amazon was great and had a new set to me before the broken set was back in their hands , the problem is after only one week the replacement headphones died too!!
p859
aVI was initially scared to buy these headphones because of reading so many reviews of them being bad build quality, but I ended up getting them anyways.  After using them for a day, I am very impressed.  They look and feel awesome.  They also sound amazing. Overall I am very satisfied buying these, especially at $30.  This is an absolute steal.  I highly recommend getting these.
p860
aVThe old problem with these headphones I have is the short chord, but that is a personal preference. These are great for the price, I am going to order another pair as a gift.
p861
aVI was quite disappointed when I received these. They are too small, WAY to small. The sound is actually not THAT great. I would probably not suggest these to anyone. I find the earbuds are much better in sound.
p862
aVafter i saw this headphone on amazon i say i have to get them. i now have 2 moths with the headphones and they still work great, shipping and handling was amazing because they came within 2 days. i sincerely recomend this headphones to anyone who like good quality music and loves dwane wade. the bass is sick, expecially if used with iphone or ipod.
p863
aVI purchased these headphones from my local F.Y.E store. I got them on sale for 35 bucks thinking they'd be great for just listening to music. I didn't need any high quality headphones at the time, so I figured these would be perfect. And to be honest, for a few months, they were. Right out the box, they were especially louder than any other headphone I've tried! The 50mm drivers are to thank for that, even though these are the only 50mm headphones I have ever listened to. The sound quality served my needs quite well. But these were my second pair of Skullcandy headphones that broke. I won't go into my first pair's experience but this pair was different.I was listening to them at high volume when all of a sudden the left driver started cracking, so I took them off to see what the problem was. I tapped on the outside of the left cup and the speaker stopped working immediately and it hasn't worked since. These headphones were nice and they were loud with quite a lot of bass, but I doubt i will be buying anything else from Skullcandy for a while, sadly. The reason I gave this product 4 stars is because of its loudness and its sound quality which, to me, sounded remarkable. Great product while it lasted.
p864
aVAll i can say is wow... Being from a company like skullcandy I had high expectations for this product, iI decided to go with a more expensive, but not the most expensive pair they had. Turns out I wpuld have been better served if I had just set my money on fire. The pair of... Well i guess you can call them headphones arrived late, no suprise there, but the box it came in was HUGE!! No wonder my shipping required a second mortgage! And when I opened this huge box i see the heaphones in this weird plastic, with zero packing material of any kind, apparently $40 shrink-wrapped heaphones will be fine if they are able to fly all over the huge box in transit. I finally get the headphones out, and i can already feel what other reviewers have commented on, its cheap, brittle plastic, from the pictures it looks like it would be somewhat durable, but once you feel them you know they arent going to last. They only fit my head when fully extended, and even then they are very snug and uncomfortable. The only reason they are called noise cancelling is because the thick padding fills in your ears and ruins the music, sounds like im listening to my music while under water. The ear pieces are too small, and make your ears sweat and hurt after 10 minutes or so. I DO NOTRECOMMEND TO ANYONE!!!!! This $40 something pair of headphones are made to fit children and the quality feel like it was made BY children!
p865
aVBefore I bought these headphones i read tons of reviews about them because my music quality is really important to me and i wanted to make sure i was making the right choice. With these headphones, i made the best choice without a doubt. I've read reviews about how they hurt you're ears and are uncomfortable. I'm sorry, but thats a bunch of bull. They are extremely comfortable and i can wear them for hours without any problems what so ever. The music quality is very very impressive, i love using them whenever i can. The bass in them is fantastic, but also isn't overwealming and does not distort the music. If you love enjoying your music, and are looking for a quality pair of headphones, you've found them. And for $35-$45 are you kidding me? enter your credit card number right now and get these headphones. The only problem you should have is deciding what color you should get. Enjoy!!
p866
aVThese aren't bad cans but they don't surround your ear and are very uncomfortable. Only reason I got them was a warranty replacement. My sennheiser hd 202's sound 10 times better and were only $23. If you are used to good sounding music these aren't for you. If you wanna look cool have at it lol
p867
aVI love these head phones! Their so stylish and compared to my last earbuds, have amazing sound and are comfy!PROS:Pretty comfortable, i bought them on sale so for 35 bucks they have amazing sound! The noise blocking is pretty good, it depends on how close you are and how loud it is and stuff but its good. I LOVE THE CORD! Its amazing! It never gets tangled, and also makes for a nice toy to play with when im bored in the car! The padding on the sides and top is very nice too.CONS:Well along with style, they dont look the best sitting on the top of your head cause they look kinda flat. Its hard to explain but they dont look super awesome if you wear them normally. but who really cares. Umm it does leak sound, but its not bad. as long as you dont have your music blaring its okay. and again it also depends on how close someone is to it for them to be able to hear it. The only other thing is they kinda suction to your ears and it gives me a little headache after a while.But overall these headphones were worth all the money! Annnnd as a plus it comes with a carrying bag and a skull candy "Skull" cut-out! I put mine on my laptop:)Hope this was useful! It was also my first review! ^,^
p868
aVI am a 15 year old kid and I bought a pair of skullcandy skullcrushers a couple months ago and they still work perfectly but I just got the hesh yesterday and I would like to say for 34$ it's an amazing deal it has great sound quality and the bass is tight. They do cancel out voice very well and I Do prefer these over the skullcrushers because it has better sounding bass and the sound quality is almost the same and that's a 20$ difference plus te hesh feel more durable but what sucks the more u adjust them the more stress there is at te top of the headband and they stay on your head great! My problem is that I have big ears and it doesn't completely cup my big ears but oh well I would still recommend these to anyone on a budget (like I am) but if u pay over 45$ for these go with sony headphones or sennheiser. Oh I almost forgOt they do leak some sound not a lot but I mainly use them to run and to ride my bike and they are great!
p869
aVI love the game of basketball & also love music, so this was a nice pick up for me.The shipping was great, fast and on time. The product itself was amazing the sound quality is great.Looking forward to buying some Miami Heat Skullcandy's also.
p870
aVThese headphones have changed my perspective about over the ear headphones. I used to not like them because no matter how much you would turn up the volume you could still hear people talking. Now with the NBA headphones with just putting them on it is hard to hear people talking. Then as soon as you start playing music it is like that is the only sound in the world because that is all you can hear. All in all the Dwayne Wade NBA Skullcandy Headphones is the greatest headphones I have ever purchased.
p871
aVI've been using earbuds for a while now and I forgot what music sounds like! Can - type headphones are way better for music. These Headphones from Skullcandy are perfect and the price is just right. Cheers!
p872
aVI was thinking about getting these headphones for a while. I had owned many pairs of skullcandy headphones and they had usually lasted me a long time. I wanted to upgrade to a pair of studio-like over ear headphones and it came down to the skullcandies and the beats by dre. Although the quality is lower than the beats in both sound and comfort, these headphones do a great job for a great price. The Beats are better than these, however they are not superior enough to justify the price. If your looking for a solid pair of headphones all around, then these are for you. They are light weight, sturdy, and block out sound (great for buses, trains, crowded areas). Little discomfort on ears due to them pushing on your ears, but you will break them in. Like I said for the price, you can't go wrong.
p873
aVI bought these upgrading from the apple default buds and obviously anything will be an upgrade from those awful things. For the money these are great, the sound is decent (much better than my original buds), the bass is decent...not crazy over doing it and the build is very nice. I'm glad I bought these because for the money I spent on them I upgraded. Who wants to spend $300 dollars on headphones anyways these days?
p874
aVThese are a pretty standard headphone. The have Great bass response and ok mids and treble. You wouldn't want to use them to try to do a studio rough mix, but they make decent reference headphones. They're also great for the Airplane, car trips, or just Ipod listening. They're pretty comfortable, however the vinyl ear pads can get a little sweaty with extended wear. They do not isolate sound really well. I will give them the fact that they're not advertised as noise cancelling so this was less of an issue for me. The only real issue I have with them is that the adjustment bands on the side are cheap plastic.After about 4 months of standard use they're to the point where I have to have them replaced. I called Skullcandy and they set me up with an RMA no problem. The only downside is that you have to pay the shipping to them.
p875
aVAs soon as I opened the headphones, there was a rattling sound coming out of the left earpiece. The sound was average, I've had seven dollar sony earbuds that sound the same, They are however comfortable headphones. I would stay away from skullcandy as their quality control is horrible. The material used is also cheap. For the price get a pair of Sony MDR-7506's
p876
aVthese headphones aren't going to be perfect, your paying 37 dollars, you cant expect a BOSE sound, but if your looking to spend under 100 dollars or under 50 dollars, buy these headphones you wont be disapointed at all, the bass wasn't overpowering, i listed to electro, stuff like skrillex and deadmau5, and i am not disapointed in the sound at all.
p877
aVThis product is inexpensive and works very well!  It isolates the music from all other outside sounds, just like Beats do.  They are really cool looking and they have no flaws so I'm very happy.
p878
aVI am not a dj, or one that needs to use headphones too often. I use headphones while on my personal computer for listening to music, watching videos on youtube, movies and the like. The headphones have a great sound, no doubt that the sound quality is high. The headphones get a little bothersome though, the cuffs are completely round so they fit kind of funny on the ear and get uncomfortable after a little while. I found myself needing to take them off to "rest". Also, they aren't made very well. The plastic has cracked on the left ear side and is starting to on the right. In all fairness maybe I just have a big head, but nevertheless, I cannot fairly high recommend. Very Bulky and I feel made rather cheaply. The sound is great though so I give 3 stars.P.S. My hat size is 7.5.
p879
aVMy opinion and overview....I  believe the average person will find these comfortable, but for me, sadly, they are not.It seems that if the cups were constructed just a little bigger in circumference,  my ears would fit inside allot more comfortably.  I would advise trying em for a couple hours or days before throwing away the packaging..I will be returning them for that reason :(.other than that Id say these phones are a great buy and if you like rap, dance, or anything with bass, these go hard !!If you want a great set of cans, then forget buying those 20 dollar pair and invest some more $ in these, you be happy with the sound, and  Skull candy has that lifetime warranty, so your set. You'll waste more $ replacing those cheapo's besides the sound quality is levels above .
p880
aVlemme put this in simplest terms as possible.Me look at these headphones.Me like these.Me order them.Me listem to them and they have AWESOME AND CLEAR SOUNDMe like the way they look ( they are so stylish like u just wanna show them off!)me would really recommend these and by the way me a sophomore in high school and me like these ALOT! BUY THEM
p881
aVPURCHASED THE HEADPHONES FOR MY 12 YEAR OLD SON, VERY IMPRESSED WITH APPEARANCE OF PRODUCT BUT AFTER TWO DAYS WE NOTICED STITCHING AROUND EAR LEFT WAS COMING UNDONE, A COUPLE OF DAYS LATER, STITCHING ON RIGHT WAS ALSO COMING UNDONE. MY SON TAKES VERY GOOD CARE OF HIS ITEMS SO IT WAS NOT DUE TO MISTREATMENT, I AM CERTAIN IT IS POOR QUALITY AND I AM VERY DISSATISFIED WITH PURCHASE. ALSO, NOT VERY GOOD QUALITY LISTENING EITHER.
p882
aVthese headphones are pretty kool but the only thing i dont like is they are not good for wearing around your neck.they try to close so they stay tight on your head, they almost like choke u a bit. other than that the sound quality and bass are very good.
p883
aVJust received yesterday and love,love them.  I was a little skeptical about ordering them for myself...being that I'm in the "40 age range" but I am not disappointed.  They are a little bigger than what I anticipated but I can adjust; besides I am a big "Heat" fan.  The sound is like no other.  Good bass tone.  My daughter compared them to the Dr. Dre' headphones so you will not be disappointed!
p884
aVI bought it for my son and when i read the reviews they said that they break easily but you just have to take care of them and you'll have the best earphones ever!!
p885
aVI've always been a music enthusiast, however I was never able to use earbuds because my ears are far too small for them, thus began my search for a decent pair of headphones.These are not only decent, they are incredible!  The noise isolation is high quality and the sound quality is amazing; it was definitely love at first note.  These headphones are light, comfortable, and durable.  They truly live up to the quality that Skullcandy is known for.
p886
aVI bought these for my girlfriend whose a Celtics fan and loves music. She loves them but can't stand how they can't produce the same sound in any other electronics besides her cell phone. She plugged them into the TV at night to listen to movies without making much noise but couldn't get %100 sound without holding down the volume knob. Very strange. That's the only minus we have on them. They look great, feel great, and have AWESOME sound! No better headphones for your mobile electronics!
p887
aVI like these because they are comfortable but they sound a bit muffled. I mean, I like the way they are made and I am going to keep them but I am not that happy with the sound and I am not at all into my music. I expect a person who takes their music really seriously would be really disappointed in these but maybe I am wrong
p888
aVHad 2 pairs break! The side plastic narrow piece snaps apart from taking the headphones on and off.  The first one snapped after 2 weeks and amazon replaced them. The second pair just broke after only 2 months!
p889
aVThe headphones were very nice, good quality, and arrived quickly! I couldn't be happier with these. They also came with a cool bag to hold them in and some other stuff!
p890
aVI was really pleased with Skullcandy earbuds in the past, so I decided to buy a pair of over the ear headphones. They were great for about a week or two until I noticed the sides started cracking. I was careful with them to begin with and they have never been dropped or shoved into any small spaces, but after I noticed that I decided to be extra careful. Unfortunately that didn't seem to work. The right side is almost completely cracked off and I am super disappointed. They sound phenomenal, but they are not durable. I'm afraid to use them for fear that the entire right side will break off. Luckily, Skullcandy has a really great warranty and I told them about the problem and I'm getting them replaced.
p891
aVThis a great pair of headphones. They are low priced for the great quality of sound they put out. The volume can get loud so it would be a good idea to moderate the volume level. These headphones do a good job of canceling out other noises by you.  They look stylish and feel soft. My only complaint would be the size. They do feel a bit small on the head and around the neck. Good thing they're adjustable. The only other thing that would be a deciding factor is if you like how they cup your entire ear inside. Not to mention the cord to insert them into your MP3 player is a bit long which can get annoying.  But if you're looming for a great pair of headphones at a low price, this is the pair to get.
p892
aVGood sound quality. Get very uncomfortable after extended use - can not be worn with glasses. Overall quality seems to be pretty good, but they are tight. It can be seen how they would break if your not careful with them.
p893
aVWhen I first bought these, there was an incorrect picture up for the product. I wanted the blue ones but ended up getting these. I guess they were ok, but that left me a little angry. I already left a review about it, but I think maybe it was removed. I could be looking over it. Didn't take long for the plastic parts holding the ear cups to crack.
p894
aVI personally love Skullcandy. I live in Utah, and it's nice to see a Utah-bred company get some attention. These are the first pair of Skullcandy headphones I've owned. I got these at Best Buy for a good price. Here's a breakdown of everything:Sound Quality: 4.5/5Great sound quality; bass was great but not overpowering, mids weren't muddled, and trebles were clear. Great reproduction of sound. The only complaint is that the bass could have a little bit more of that "boom" factor; right now, they're just "there." Passive sound isolation isn't the best, but this isn't intended for sound cancellation anyways.Comfort: 3/5When I first got these, I thought that the padding was a little bit stiff. I thought I just had to break it in for a while. Now, after a couple of months, it hasn't gotten any softer. Compared to the Skullcrushers' soft padding, this is hard and doesn't create a very good seal. I constantly have to readjust the headphones, and the cups aren't the biggest. Maybe I'm just a wuss, but these give me a headache after just an hour of wearing these.Durability: 3/5Almost all plastic; I haven't had any problem with anything breaking, and I even keep it in a backpack that gets thrown into lockers and stuffed full of books. I don't know how much longer these will last, though. Even a little movement makes them creak.Portability: 3/5These cans are HUGE! Add that to the fact that they don't fold up, and you've got a huge thing you need to lug around. These also don't look the best on your head, and aren't ideal to wear under a hat.Honestly, if I were you, I'd get the Skullcrushers, which can be had for not much more than these. They fold up, are much more comfortable, and have some wicked bass, especially if you like hip-hop/dance music. The sound quality is the most important aspect, so I guess I'm going to give this a 4/5 overall.
p895
aVAfter reviewing several different options, I chose to go with these due to the price and the specs. This was my first pair of Skullcandy headphones. I usually spend the extra money and go with top of the line sound products such as Bose or Sony. I knew they would sound good, but I was very pleased after using them for just the first time. I didn't realize these headphones would do so well with noise cancellation. The sound from these things boom! I've used them for music and also with my PS3 for loud sound at night. They are very dynamic and put out loud sound even when just hooked up to my mp3 player. I've already ordered my second pair of Skullcandy headphones.
p896
aVThere is little bass, Break amazingly easy, there is distortion when they are turned up. And they sound a little muddy. A large scale example is talking with your hand over your mouth.
p897
aVI found that the Skull Candy Headphones were very stylish and received a number of compliments on them. For the low price I purchased them for, the quality of sound and noise cancellation were excellent. Also, they arrived at the exact projected date in wonderful packing condition. However, upon wearing them upwards of 60 min, they become annoyingly uncomfortable and can sometimes cause a headache. If one plans to wear them for less than an hour at a time, they are a great value. Unfortunately, they are not exactly dorm-friendly, as you must wear headphones in order to watch movies or listen to music for long periods of time.
p898
aVThe Headphones are Overall Amazing, especially for the price. the sound Quality is excellent and they are comfortable to wear on your head.Now the Only issues with these headphones are that when you wear them around your neck they kinda choke u a little. So Avoid that, I just used the slack of my belt to wear them on my pants when I had to take them off.And the other thing is that the Plastic extension on the headphones are of poor quality, the right hand side broke off from just normal wear and tear and the right hand side is now cracked. I easily fixed this with Black duct Tape, and no one notices.the speakers on the headphones are truly amazing, they never scratch or get any type of interference. So GOOD JOB! on that part SkullCandy! by now my headphone speakers would have blown... you can Definitely BLAST the music and not expect to go deaf or break your Headphones. LIKE I SAID EARLIER- GREAT BUY FOR THE PRICE!!!
p899
aVI bought these headphones in January. Within literally two weeks, one side of the headphone rails had started cracking. Being the lazy, non-receipt keeping consumer that I am, I taped them up and went on my way. Today (April 11, 2011), the other side has begun to crack and break apart.In summation, these headphones are crap and not even close to worth the money. They are simply poor designed, and can't handle the "stress" of being worn the way they're supposed to be.DON'T BUY!
p900
aVThese headphones are definitely not top of the line.  They aren't too comfortable and they aren't too durable.  But the sound is pretty good. I guess you get what you pay for.
p901
aVi like these but a wish i could of got the monkey ones for the same price so i settled for cheaper ones. The quality are the same they play fine + they fit well on your head. they seem like they will last.
p902
aVGood buy for the price that it is. As a college student it was great for keeping my ears warm and listening to music while walking to class. Great quality of music. Great headphones. A few downsides is that it if I use it too long it gets a little uncomfortable and also it looks really bulgy and big around the head.
p903
aVthis item was purchased fro me as a gift and the inner extension broke so therefore i rebought a new set only for within two weeks they broke again. not real happy with this product.
p904
aVI use this with my lap top to study for school - it allows me not to have to deal with any ambient noise so i can concentrate on my studies - it was a god send!!!
p905
aVI bought these headphones with a bit of reluctance because of some reviews, but some people obviously don't know what they're talking about. The whole thing is great! It even came with a nice carrying case. The sound is amazing, crisp and extremely loud. I have to turn it really low so people don't hear it! Bottom line, definitely reccomended. I've tried Beats by Dre, Sony, and Bose, and surprisingly the cheapest headphones I bought are the best. Great product.
p906
aVI bought these as a gift for my nephew and he has so far enjoyed them a lot better than his old ear plugs. The bass and the treble are so distinctive that it is a joy to put these on and listen to how music should be listened to.
p907
aVThe headphones were not very comfortable, but I continued to wear them because I had an ear ache and didn't want to use my in ear buds. The real problem became apparent when they broke. I hadn't had them a week when the thin adjustable part snapped. Complete waste of money, do not buy under any circumstance.
p908
aVwork pretty well, for the price(28$ you can't go wrong) note amazon rises and lowers the prices all the time. At first they hurt a little, but its not too bad, you can only wear them for so long and then half to take them off. they are seriously not worth 50$; the quality is no were close to be worth that much. they are stylish, but if you can afford to pay more, look elsewhere,go with another company, skull candy tends to be cheap in quality. They sound pretty great, although not the best pair of headphones (you get what you pay for). if your someone who brakes things easily i would Not recommend these; i knew in advance that the quality was questionable but also knew that if i take care of them i could make them last longer.
p909
aVGot them earlier this month. Love the quality of the sound, I love the DJ/Studio headphone style, BUT they break unbeliveably easialy. This is my second pair. broke in the exact same place as last time. The arms are very flimsy despite how the might look and feel. I STRONGLY recommend Adjusting the headphones to a comfortable size then coat the arms in super glue, then fill the ENTIRE area with hot glue. Then cover the hot glue with duct tape, preferably black. The wire is very thin and brittle, if an arm breaks it won't be long before it cuts the wire.On another note, these things get REALLY loud, and they leak. Everyone around you can hear what you are listening to, and you can hear them too. Even though they are over the ear they do nothing to block out outside noise and they might as well be speakers. The sound quality is amazing for the price. I spent a little under $30.If you do decide to do what i did with the tape and glue, make SURE you get them comfortable first, they might be comfortable at first, but the get uncomfortable real fast, i suggest making it slightly bigger than you think you should.
p910
aVok first im 15 and ALWAYS buy skullcandy and in a few months they either BREAK or stay the same but these only took a month for the leather muffs to come off. BUT they have an awsome sound quality and very good BASSnow the adjustment peice is starting to break not very happy with them
p911
aVyhis has been by far one of the best headphones i ever purchased... they're loud, comfortable and affordable... hooowever i only had them for 3 months and snap went the left side plastic adjustable peace... i wanted to cry that day and hell i wanted to even order them again because of the reasonable price... sure they bleed sound but you know what.. i never gotten any complaints and i wore them on the bus, train, and even the gym, these are a good buy if u have a small head since theat happened i purchased the Sony MDR-XB700 and i am in LOOOOve with them... they may be double the price but they are damn sure worth it
p912
aVHeadphones are very nice but not very loud at all I am in fact going to buy a new pair that are louder also if you wear hearings and sunglasses there is some discomfort which may lead to a headache besides that they look awesome one of the black covers though is already coming off from were it is tucked in on the back of the earphone. Would I buy these particular ones again no they aren't what I was looking for but I am picky I Also own another set of ear bud skull candy headphones which I love.
p913
aVThe sound quality is terrible--it's like I am listening to music through a tank of water.  Also, the sound leaks so everyone around me can hear the music I am playing even if my iPod volume is low. The design is great and they are very comfortable, and they also cancel the noise around you very well. However, if you are looking for clear sound, these headphones were a waste of $35 dollars. I suggest if you have Apple earbuds, stick with those; their sound quality is much better.
p914
aVSo, I had been looking to  purchase a pair of headphones recently. I was hesitant at first, but after reading the reviews I went for it. Since I recived them I haven't been able to take them off. I totally recomend this headphones for all music lovers out there.
p915
aVThis purchase was for my daughter.  When we first began searching for the headphones, I couldn't understand why she wanted them, and why they cost so much.  But then I began to see other teenagers with them and soon found out this was the in thing to have.  Once we found them on Amazon, they were much cheaper than the big name stores.  When she received, I have never seen her so excited.  Of course you know teenagers don't get excited anymore.  Anyway she loves them and she wears them all the time.  Excellent price, sturdy and long lasting, and a great gift for a teenager.
p916
aVI picked these up because they were pretty cheap, looked cool, and I wanted to try some over the ear headphones (I usually use in-earphones). My biggest problem with these is that they are very uncomfortable for periods of long listening. The ear cups aren't large enough for my ears, combine that with how even though the size is changeable for larger heads, they are really tight. Consequentially, my ears were really banged up after wearing them for a couple hours. The sound quality is also very mediocre, with it being relatively weak and tinny. Also, it blocks out enough sound to make it hard to listen to whatever is in your environment, but loud annoying sounds seem at times almost worse. Furthermore, the plastic construction seems a little cheap, though I don't know yet how easy they'll break. So in the end, I guess you get what you pay for.Edit: After a few uses of these headphones, the thin little piece of plastic you see in the picture between the head band and ear cup snapped when I lifted one ear to talk to someone. So I learned my lesson, don't ever buy earphones from Skullcandy, they're cheap pieces of crap.
p917
aVSo i bought these headphones thinking these would be nice because they are skullcandies. After about three weeks they broke! The volume and stuff still works and everything but the extension part you adjust to fit your head broke. i haven't used them in a week because they look like they are going to break if i use them more. I'm disappointed, the extension part is plastic so it just cracked and is about to break. the sound and stuff was nice, but there is no point in buying this because it is pretty cheap. I payed 50 bucks for these things and they dont even last.
p918
aVI do not recommend these headsets.  We purchased a new pair and the extension rod broke immediately. We purchased a 2nd pair and they did the same thing.  Bottomline, don't waste your money on these.
p919
aVthis is an amazing headset and i love mine. listened nonstop for hours once and felt minimal discomfort. the sound is great and the base is exceptional for headphones without a subwhoffer. very comfortable and stylish.
p920
aVThey sound great but the quality of the material is not so great. I've had them for 2 weeks and both sides of the headband have snapped in half. These are the second pair that I've had that happen to. I thought it was just me at first but the plastic is just not that sturdy.
p921
aVI bought these headphones about 6 months ago and have been very impressed with the quality of sound.  They are a little heavy but thats to be expected from full size headphones.  The music is crisp and clear without any rattle or distortion, i have owned several pair of headphones mostly from sony for my walkman but these are by far the best.
p922
aVThe first day i received my skull candy hesh headphones, I instantly loved them. They look amazing, they aren't the most amazing sound quality in the world, but they are well worth the money, my father has a $70 set of bose headphones. My skull candies blow them out of the water. Im a college athlete so im on alot of long road trips. These headphones are ridiculously comfortable, most of the time i have to readjust  every two or three songs, not with these puppies. I recommend them to anyone!
p923
aVThese headphones sound all right, they're more balanced to my ears than my Sennheiser CX-300 IEMs. They are definitely not worth $50 though. I got these on sale for $25 and I found that they sound more like headphones in that price range.1. To me they are extremely uncomfortable since they clamp to your head like vice-grips even after letting them stretch out, and they're pretty heavy on my small head.2. They sound better in terms of tonal balance compared to my Sennheiser CX-300 in-ear headphones. The mids and highs are laid back compared to the more forward bass and seem a muddy to my ears (the notes seem slurred and not very detailed). The bass is there and has a decent bass punch. I do have to compliment them on their soundstage. The soundstage for these closed headphones is definitely a lot larger than my Sennheiser CX300's. A larger soundstage makes the music recording sound more realistic, as if you were in a concert hall, so that's a good thing.3. The cloth carrying case that's given in the package is not very useful unless you're storing these headphones somewhere for a while. I use these at school and they're reaaally bulky since they don't lie flat nor fold. They are not very portable.4. The pleather ear pads are stiff and also uncomfortable. They do isolate some noise but not too much since the stiff pads do not conform to my head. In the back of the headphones' ear cups, there is a gap between my head and the pads themselves, despite trying to adjust the headphones around.I haven't had any problems with these myself, but when I move them, they do make a creaking sound so I'm not sure how durable these will be. For $50 I hope they last a while. I've had my $25 Sennheiser CX300's for 2 years without any problems yet.UPDATE March 24, 2011: I took a look at my headphones in the sun today and I noticed that the joint connecting the 50mm driver housings with the adjustable headband has a crack in the plastic on both sides of the headphone. It seems like this is the weakest spot of the headphones considering other reviews, and I can see why. At that specific spot, most of the flexing of the headband occurs there, which is a hollow plastic tube. Very poor design on Skullcandy's part.UPDATE July 13, 2011: So the cracks on the headband have now become even larger and my right ear piece is barely hanging in there. I'm looking for a replacement headphone at the moment since these are really loose on my head (due to the headband cracks).UPDATE August 9, 2011: Now both sides of the headband have become cracked to the point where I cannot place them on my head and remain in place. They slide off of my head since there is essentially no clamping force. I purchased a Shure SRH940 headphone and my review for that product can be found on its product page here:SRH940 Professional Reference Headphones
p924
aVIve already used these headphones for a week now, it really works well on music, but it sounds even better if you use your EQ on your ipod or your portable music device, it helps the headphones adjust to what you want them to sound like Rock,Electronic,Dubstep,Techno,Alternative,Country you name it these headphones work like a charm. My only problem seems to be the noise cancellation a bit, i can still hear a little bit, but that is only if i focus on that. I have not had these headphones break on me so far and they seem to work like a charm. It feels like i am a DJ and the sound is kept within my ears only, plus i can feel the bass on Dubstep and the sounds the way they were sopposed to be without the earbuds these are excellent. Plus for the price they are C+ headphones, meaning they are above average quality for a cheaper price than what they use to cost(60$), buy with confidence. One last thing be gentle with your headphones when sliding them down, because i keep noticing by the reviews that they say the Skullcandy headphones will break, but i bet that is because they put to much force adjusting the sides to their ears.August 2011-------------My Skullcandy broke sadly i accidently sat on the side of it, i had good times with this one, and i learned that these headphones are good but not great. I recently baughtSennheiser HD 202  II Professional Headphones (Black)I hate to say it but Skullcsndy looks good but is decent at best, but Sennheiser is a relieble brand like Bose,Koss, in which it can deliver on Dubstep,Bass and all of that plus it has good noise cancellation which Skullcandy barely had it. It is 20$ right now with HD type headphones, and i am liking it right now as i baught it, to me it is a steal. This is only an alternative if you do not want to pay the price for Skullcandy and want something that is cheaper and better.
p925
aVGreat design and shape. I love Skullcandy headphones, they are some of the greatest headphones out there! The Hesh headphones are VERY comfortable, fit nicely around your ears and on your head. The sound quality...eh, it's okay, not the greatest but it's still pretty good. It isn't completely bad but then again it isn't the greatest in the world. Very light headphones which can be good for some and bad for others. The good part is that they aren't that heavy when having them on or just having them around your neck. The bad thing is since they're light and made of some plastic, they could go out but who knows. They also come with a nice silk-like bag for you to carry them around in. I would say these would be the perfect set of headphones if you love to just listen to music to relax, get some steam out of your system, etc. These wouldn't be the kind of headphones for anyone who is professionally in the music business and need some of headphones to do work with; if you need something like that then look for the Skullcandy DJ headphones at the Skullcandy website or a nearby Apple store. But otherwise these are a good pair of headphones and again I would recommend them to anyone who just wants to jam out to music.
p926
aVPurchasing this product on Amazon.com was easy, since I don't like to order stuff thru the internet, it was affordable and had free shipping. I bought this headphone as Birthday gift for my grandson, he thinks it is awesome.
p927
aVMy 15 year old son asked me to order these for him. He said they were the best headphones that he ever had. They block out all sound, which bothers me a little since he can't hear me. :-). Great sound quality. If you are looking for an inexpensive pair of headphones that block out sound, they are perfect for you.
p928
aVi have bought 2 pairs of these headphones and they both broke. i took very good care of these headphones. after 2 weeks of having these headphones i will go to put them on and the left side will just split in half. its not worth the buy.
p929
aVI purchased these because they'd been recommended to me by a friend. In hindsight I probably should have gotten the DJ-style headphones, because they collapse and are therefore more portable. Although these headphones are very comfortable for the most part, they are a tight fit (width-wise) and tend to be snug on the ears. This is good in the sense that they won't fall off, but bad because they get uncomfortably tight very fast. Otherwise a decent product, for the price.
p930
aVI bought these back in the summer and was pretty pleased with them. The bass hits hard and they sound great as long as your not an audiophile.However, they broke after VERY light usage after a couple months. They're made of cheap plastic and the thin piece between the head band and the earphones crack easily. So if you plan on using your headphones for more than a few months before buying a new pair, look elsewhere.Also, they're horribly uncomfortable. They will squeeze the heck out of your head, so prolonged usage is usually associated with headaches.Good luck. However, I've yet to have a problem with their earbud headphones.
p931
aVI bought this set of headphones and I take VERY good care of things like this. I kept them in the little travel bag and never thrashed them around, etc. They are awkward fitting, but the sound is great if you like your bass. However, shortly after purchasing these headphones, the extendable plastic pieces that adjust the size started to crack and one just snapped entirely in half, making them unwearable. After adjusting them to the appropriate size, the plastic pieces didn't have the bend in them and they broke. This is not something that was my fault, it was a defect in the product. I felt that I should have spent the extra money and invested in a nicer pair of headphones. That is my suggestion to my fellow consumers. Hope this helps!
p932
aVThese do leak sound, but if all you're going for is style, these are the right headphones. They are also a little tight on the head, but it's really something you get used to (or over, after the first couple wears). Very durable. I'm not some sort of audiophile, but I still love these headphones. I had a pair of Sony MDR-XD100s before, and they were pretty much equivalent to these headphones in everything except comfort and style (they were way more comfortable, but less stylish). In the end, you really are just paying for the brand, which isn't necessarily a bad thing. Skullcandy never fails to shine in terms of looks.
p933
aVI got this skull candy and they broke after two weeks,had to tape both sides of the head phones after two week .looks like crap but they still work ,not happy ,the sound was great,but they broke on both sides above the ear piece,i would really like u to replace them.  u may contact me buy email  and i can send pictures  cooperlilly@aol.com Laura
p934
aVWhen I had first ordered these headphones, I was thrilled because of how great they looked, and how great the sound was. A month goes by of some less than average usage; they aren't used everyday, mainly within the house, and when I do use them outside, I always use the included baggie and make sure the individual earphones are not extended out. Never dropped them, no harsh contact, etc. So about two days ago when I'm pulling (lightly) apart the headphones to put over my ears, I hear a crack. To my dismay, the extension part of the left headphone had cracked somewhat, with only the center part not having fully cracked. They've been sitting at my desk collecting dust since as I'm afraid to damage them any more from normal use. Also to note, I do extend the headphones nearly all the way out. I did not think of this as much of a problem, as I had hoped the construction of the extending parts would be fine; I was wrong. Eventually I'll work up the nerve to use them again, but for now I just feel a bit ripped off at how easily they became damaged.Overall: Great style and sound for when they weren't damaged, which was about a month's time. Bad construction, which ultimately, if a product like this doesn't last at least nine months to a year, much less at least six months bare minimum of average use, the sound and style cannot make up for how soon mine became damaged. I know customer's usage will vary, and this will not happen to everyone, but I advise purchase at your own risk for these headphones.
p935
aVI brought these about a month or two ago. At first I was one happy camper as the sound quality was great - WAY better than my old Sony MDR-V250s to be sure! Before purchase I'd read some of the reviews warning about the weak plastic pillars but just blew them off. Dumb move on my part for lo and behold not two weeks later it happened to me on the right side! It hadn't cracked all the way through yet, mind you, but was clearly headed in that direction. The left side wasn't looking too hot either. I considered returning them, but riding the train home from work I saw a girl with the EXACT SAME model headphones as mine. She'd wrapped duct tape around both the pillars so I just decided to do the same. Didn't really want to go through the hassle of a return, and after all the audio, at least, is first rate...Bottom line...I really can't recommend these. Sure they SOUND good but for the price you pay, the construction should be much much sturdier. Neither my Sony MDR-V250s nor my XD100s have fallen apart like this and I've had both of those for far longer while paying way less!
p936
aVI bought these cuz i broke a cheap $10 set and i thought they were really big when i first got them. It was only because i wasn't used to these type of headphone,but that was easily forgotten with how great they sound. They came with a pretty nice little bag with the logo all over it and a sticker!Anyways, the point is the moment i plugged them in i had to reduce the volume on my laptop. I had everything set to the lowest volume and could hear just fine. they feel kinda stiff at the band that goes on top of your head,but i'm careful with my stuff,so it should last.~great sound~muffles a good amount~great for guitar practice~gets a little tiring on the ears,but you can get used to it~great design~be careful with the adjusting band and it'll last you
p937
aVFirst of all, all you audiofiles out there are dumb as hell nobody cares if these headphones aren't as good as your 300-400 dollar headphones! And if they break, CHILL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Skullcandy has got your back and will replace them...for life...free of charge. As far as sound quaility these headphones are pretty good. I listen to music...A LOT. And I listen to almost every genre, but I mostly listen to John Mayer,Maroon 5,Dave Matthews Band, etc.. And these headphones work excellent. Although they are not listed as sound cancelling they do offer some sound cancelling properties with music playing. As for appereance these could look better I think. They looked good in the picture, but the ears are pretty big, and you can look a little goofy. They do sit on your head good and they will stay there! I warm up for wrestling in these and they stay on good through that. The cord isn't too long and having the cord go to only one ear is nice. BUT you can't wear them around your neck very well. And they don't have swivel cups.Overall I would give these headphones a 4 out of 5. But if you are buying these on amazon I would recommend the Skullcandy Skullcrushers, although they do require a battery I found the sound cancelling properties better. Also they had better overall sound quality. They are much easier to carry around and the bass is much better. Also they have swivel cups.
p938
aVI bought these headphones 2 months ago, and so far, I love them! First and foremost, the sound quality is good. The only setback is that the bass is not as strong as I would like, but I prefer a lot of bass, so these would be perfectly fine for the average listener. I listen to pretty much every type of music, and everything sounds great. The design is comfortable, I've worn them for hours on end without any problem. The speakers fit over my ear, unlike other over the head headphones I have tried, and they have a snug fit without that "crushing" feeling some headphones create. Before I bought them, I read many reviews where people commented that the headband had broken, but I have had no issue with this. They have been extremely durable, I have taken them on many trips, and have had no issue. Sound isolation isn't the best, but this is not a huge issue for me. In a loud place, such as on a bus or train, sound isolation is not a problem at all. The only time I have had any issue is in a car or quiet building. Overall, I am very glad I made this purchase, and I am currently looking at buying some lowriders, which would be less bulky to travel with. But these will still get plenty of use, and I got them for a great price compared to some other brands!
p939
aVI got these as a christmas gift from my mom and they worked great out of the box. Half a month later the fake leather around the sound-output thing started coming off. I have only used these at home on my laptop for watching videos and music(i have not taken these out side or left these in places they could get damaged). Just a few minutes ago i was putting them on and the plastic piece that slides inside the headphone for adjustments cracked and now they won't work anymore. They lasted two months with minimal use. I'm no expert but there are definitely better ones out there for the price. When they worked everything was awesome. Now they are broken.
p940
aVAs you would expect from Skullcandy, the style of these headphones is great. The ear piece is more round and sticks out more than the picture lets on. The design and comfortability is great though. Great for someone who is looking to have a nice pair of headphones to match their style.When it comes to quality.. maybe not so great. I'm used to using Bose quality headphones/ earphones and honestly I'm not so sure these are the ones to try and compete. Now I'm not going to go into saying that these are the worst out there, because they aren't. Sure they get loud enough to enjoy. The bass is OK but don't expect to hear the deep bass described on the website. Everything else is heard pretty well, but it's just not as clear as I think it could/should be. There is no umph. Anyone whose has usedSennheiser Headphones,Bose Headphonesor evenBose headphonesmost likely won't be a fan of these. I'm sure not.For any kid(like most) who haven't been exposed to any of the named, these are a good choice.
p941
aVThese headphones are good especially for the price. The sound is good as well. They do get a little uncomfortable after a while and it could be better if it had a little microphone but otherwise, its a good product for a good price.
p942
aVI bought these from this seller and they are nice, but I never did any investigation on them.I got these a month ago and that plastic side is weak and it broke.And these dont have bass like I thought they would
p943
aVThese headphones are amazing! When I'm listening to my iPod, it's like the band is playing right in front of me! The bass is awesome and the sound isn't muddy at all. The only problem is that it leaks sound, but that's not such a big deal for me.
p944
aVGood looking, good sound.Loved it, until it broke. If you buy this,be very careful with it. The thin plastic part, witch reveals itself when you want to make the headphones bigger, is very sensitive. Mines Snapped just yesterday [15-feb-'12] and it has only been a week.
p945
aVThese are definitely great headphones, at least in my opinion. They are comfortable, the noise cancellation is great, they look nice, and everything else about them is nice as well. I honestly don't understand why everyone dislikes this brand, their headphones have never broke soon after I got them, as the reason why I've had to buy them over and over again is because I keep losing the earbuds, which is simply my own fault. I use these as DJ headphones (I've just begun DJ'ing, and this is currently all I can afford), which means I'm not sure how they would work outside (if they could be damaged in the rain, for example). I assume that they would work just fine because of their durability overall. The art work is very nice, especially on the over-the-head part. The ears are comfortable, canceling all noise around me. Overall, these are definitely worth the price and I would recommend them to anyone looking for a cheap, but reliable pair of over-the-head headphones.
p946
aVthis is really a good choice for those who like music. I also use it for some video shot ( sound) and it's gorgeous.. The sound isolation is perfect.. It's not the best that you can find ( Bose, or Beats) but for this price it's impressive !
p947
aVI love it it sounds great and is very comfortable i hear everyting in the song and the noise extra noise cancelation is excelent when i turn up the volume i can't hear anything and when their is no music playing i still bearly hear things
p948
aVI have only had these headphones for a couple of weeks, but they seem pretty good. The bass is pretty loud though. If you listen to rap then you're probably okay. I listen to Hardcore and Pop Punk and I have to mess with the EQ on my iPod so it sounds better. They look amazing though. There should still be a Scalabrine edition...Oh, whatever website they were from took FOREVER to ship. They took over a month just to leave the shop. It also took them over a month to charge my card.
p949
aVThese headphones can play really good sound. I have had them for a couple months now and they are still serving me great. they are big and soft and comfortable and can play really loud without people around you being able to hear it. I have been walking to school since I started college and so they also worked really well as ear muffs :) They kind of feel fragile at times but they haven't broken at all. Overall definitely the best buy of headphones I have ever gotten.
p950
aVThe headphones sound really good. Dont listen to the other people saying it is easy to break there not i mean there made of plastic but i use mine everyday and if u just give a little effort to protect them they will be fine.
p951
aVThe only thing is that the cups do not turn when you take them off and put them in your shoulder!, but great sound!, good quality materials, and the best that a product can have, life time warranty!, great price also!
p952
aVWell Im not a headphone expert nor interested in audio.I gave this as a gift to my friend and he told me that this headphone has a great sound quality. Actually when i first bought this, i didn't expect much from skullcandy, cuz some products are quite lousy. Well since my friend loves it i believe this is a great product within the price range.
p953
aVWhen i saw the price i couldnt beleive it.. but when i finnaly gave in and bought them, i realized how awesome these things were, they cut out all other noise, feel great on your ears, plus the design is amazing.
p954
aVBought these headphones after my pair of skullcandy ear buds went south. Used them for 6 months and was relatively pleased with them. They were comfortable enough to listen for about 1.5 hours, but anytime after that and they would give me a horrendous headache from the pressure of the spring on my head. They sound decent enough for the price, if only a little bass heavy. My biggest complaint is that after 7 months of ownership, the plastic in the size adjuster broke, requiring me to tape it fixed, 2 months later the other side broke. Since wearign these around campus I have seen 2 other people wearing identical headphones, broken in the same spot. I would not buy these again considering I know they will break in the same spot. Nor would I recommend them to a friend.
p955
aVUmm, first of all, they look kinda' dorky. I mean, they have a blue skull on each ear piece, so I think it is something that a 5th grader would consider "cool".But, I don't really care about how they look. I am all about utility. Unfortunately, I cannot wear these earphones for more than a few minutes at a time. They are too tight, and they squeeze my head. No -- if you are wondering -- my head is not an air-inflated balloon that is easily squeezed. So, it seems that there is a design flaw inherent in this product, in that the headphones do not mold to my head. And no, I am not a behemoth giant; I am a regular Joe. I don't want to jump to any conclusions, but I do have to wonder if these were even tested in the lab while they were being developed. I've tried for several days, and I've decided to return them to the store for a full refund. Ugh.
p956
aVI bought these on amazon and I think I payed $33 with free shipping. These headphones look great, and they sound really good! My only complaint is that they have absolutely no bass unless you're in a completely quiet room and you're listening intently to hear the bass hit.  These headphones came with a protective bag to carry them in, I carry them in my backpack everyday and they seem to be fairly durable. Overall, i'm disappointed in the lack of bass but the sound quality is really good, well worth $30.
p957
aVOk first of all the people that say these headphones suck, suck. I would say I am an avid music listener and always have headphones on or in. These have pretty sick sound quality. If you are expecting a lot of bass though you may be a little let down. Now I'm not saying that the bass sucks, but it was a little less than I thought it would be. Also they are a little fragile, but if you just take care of them you'll be fine. Finally, if you are looking for sound cancelling headphones these are probably not what you want. They do cancel the sound alright with music on but you can still hear background noise. Over all these headphones are a great buy for price and I would definately recommend these headphones to everybody!
p958
aVI think that the skullcandy hesh are great over ear head phones. They are comforatable, durable, and sound great. The one thing that I don't like is that they are plastic. But for $50 dollars ( I got them for $30 ) you get what you are paying for they are great head phones. I think that 'beats' are way too expensive so I found these and they seem almost as good. i have used both and I like the Hesh better. GET A PAIR. They also have great bass.
p959
aVI love these headphones. I got my husband the audiophile the Derrick Rose Hesh headphones for Christmas and when they arrived he loved them, but I too loved them so much that I ordered the Paul Frank's for myself, because I hate earbuds. My ears are so small they never stay in. These are great headphones, and I got them even cheaper on Amazon than on Skullcandy. I noticed that there are many reviews that say they hurt after a while, but I'm not having that problem at all. I'm thinking that maybe it depends on your head size, because to me, they're extra comfortable. I wear them mostly for my daily commute into Manhattan by train and their great! I don't blast them, but I can hear my music comfortably as well as stay aware of my surroundings. I get tons of compliments on them too. They're like a fashion acessory - and I do love fashion. The only issue I have is that they don't have the in-line mic. For those who say they hurt I say maybe try another one of the skullcandy line, like maybe the agent or the icon. They're over the head but not as snug as the hesh line. Hope this helps!! Electric Animals, I'm coming for you next!!
p960
aVBought these for my girlfriend. Bigger than I thought they would be, but still great. Always been a fan of skull candys so going with this brand was a no brainer. Sound quality is good and the travel bag is a good bonus. Will buy myself a pair soon.
p961
aVI've been waiting to find a pair of headphones that I liked because I can't wear earbuds (my ear holes are too small...). Anyway, when I saw these, I immediately picked them up because I like Paul Frank and I figured you couldn't really go wrong with Skullcandy, plus the colors were super cheerful and cute.The sound is fine and everything, but I used these to watch a movie on my laptop...and the movie was 2.5 hours...Anyway, halfway through the movie, I noticed that it was really getting uncomfortable. Then towards the end, my head was screaming to take them off because they hurt so bad! I was hoping for the movie to end quickly so I could throw my headphones away! It was something about the way these things fit around your ear or something, plus the pressure from the whole headset was unbearable. But it was just no fun. I noticed other reviews also talked about discomfort too, so I'm not the only one! Don't be fooled by the picture where the padding looks really nice and cushy.I am not one to exaggerate. When I write my reviews, I always try to be as accurate as possible to help others, plus I don't usually take the time to write negative reviews, but I felt these warranted one to save someone else the literal pain. The other downside is that I bought these elsewhere at full price, so I'm sad to see them for a better price here and I can't take it back because I already threw away the packaging... :( I really don't think they should charge this much for these particular headphones. I'm already going on a search for a different pair. I've only used these once. Such a waste. :( I gave it 2 stars because the sound wasn't bad, but on the comfort level, it gets a zero from me.
p962
aVPeople say Skullcandy headphones hurt, my Paul Frank headphones are beast! The thing is it depends on the person's ears. For me it was like an hour and a half until they started making my ears sore. I took them off for 5 minutes and their back on my head.
p963
aVI bought these because I was sick of the terrible quality that earbuds give, I wanted something more for home use but it turns out I cant really use these out of home much anyway.The sound is great everything is clear and I was impressed my the quality of the bass for the price! The only problem is that unless you are surronded by quite a bit of noise everyone can hear what you are hearing. I have even been able to use my headphones almost like portable speakers they are so loud off of the ears. So thats a negative but it is the only reason I gave the product 4 stars.They are a lot more lightweight than i expected but i also expected to be more metal details etc, but it was mostly all plastic which gave them a little more of a cheap feel, but hey they are 40$ not 90$ so you get what you pay for.
p964
aVi was looking for something different than just earbuds so i ordered these and they are nice and all but there are somethings that make it not so great1. doesnt block out noise well2. cant put them around your neck easily3. kind of tight on your head4. kinda big5. ear pieces dont swivelbut all and all its decent for the money i get alot of compliments but im ordering a set of earbuds for school use
p965
aVWow, I had a pair of skullcandy earbuds and they were awesome so I was psyched to get these pair of headphones, I immediately put them into my ipod and listened to one of my bass heavy songs and it was truly amazing with great sound quality. Definitely a good product
p966
aVPros:- Good sound quality- Looks really sexy ^_^- They're simply amazing headphones. I'm really satisfied with my purchase.Cons:- All of my skull candy products (3 earphones) have broken within a few months. So I'm hoping this won't happen to these headphones. Unfortunately, people have said they're very fragile and break/won't work easily.. So I'm just putting this up here as a warning. Mine are fine, though.- Very LITTLE sound leak. If you put the sound quite loud in a rather quiet environment, you'll be able to hear your music.But this is not really important to me. It is for most people. So I'm guessing this would be a con. This is probably due to the cheap plasticky sides of the headphones.Overall: I love them and I recommend them to music lovers. :)
p967
aVThese headphones are a good pair of headphone to get. They provide very clear sounding music. The only flaw really is that if your ears don't fit in them and you use them for long periods of time your ears will start to hurt. Otherwise great headphones!
p968
aVlightweight, easy to use, great sound quality and stays on my head.  I love these much better than ear buds, but of course, running with them is not an option.
p969
aVI bought the headphones about a month ago to bring on long bus trips. I treated them well and was only able to use them a couple times. One morning, I while I was adjusting them, thep plastic snapped. Under further investigation, I found the plastic used is very cheap and thin, and once you break it, absolutley NOTHING will fix it. I would suggest these headphones, because the sound quality is great and they're comfortable, but it's kinda hard when I'm back now to my crappy regular apple headphones. Skullcandy is too over rated.
p970
aVThe bass is a little lacking, but I use them for my guitar, and for that purpose the sound quality is unbelievable. I recommend them for anyone who wants an inexpensive pair of quality headphones.
p971
aVI ordered these headphones for my son as a Christmas gift.  They were exactly what he wanted.  He loves them.  I tried them myself.  Excellent product.  Great sound and great quality item.  Of course, the skulls design is a great attention getter. Everyone notices them.
p972
aVOur son definitely loves these headphones and he wears them often. Only flaw is that they drown out parents voices all too well. Or at least thats what he leads us to believe .....  :-)
p973
aVI just got these headphones yesterday and so far I like them more than Dr. Dre Beats...if thats possible lol. Sound quality is pretty good and I like the bass. My only problem with the headphones is that they're a little tight and makes my ears hurt...and they also feel uncomfortable when i put them on my neck.
p974
aVGreat...Once its working. I got it on christmas and on the 5th of january it decided to go mono and one side stopped working. It was annoying because of the time limit in which it was bought and stopped working.
p975
aVBought these for my 11 year old son who uses them with his ipod and with our portable dvd player. He loves the funky design and says they work great and they keep the outside sound out and the inside side in!
p976
aVI bought these headphones a while ago and I love them. I kept looking at the Beats By Dr. Dre but the price tag was just too high for my liking. For the price of these headphones you get a lot. The sound is very nice. I have listened to a wide range of music and they can handle most of it. The highs are a little muddy but if you get past that everything else is perfect. The headphones in my opinion are very comfortable. I listen to music for long periods of time with them and I do not get the headache that occurs with in-ear headphones. They seem very durable and they have lasted me through everything. I have taken them on a couple of trips around the world and they are perfect for the plane. Overall: when you get these headphones you can expect to be sucked into the music world and they look stylish. They were a great buy. Hope this helped.
p977
aVWell for the price, its decent. It hurts my ears and doesnt fit as comfortable as I thought it would. Now the thing that bugs me the most is the leakage of sound..but its still something you should consider picking up for the price.
p978
aVThese are some of the best headphones i have ever had if you are looking at getting them it would be a great idea. The only flaw i can come up with is they are all plastik that means they can break. there is also a short coard and a long one i dont know why they did that. but the sound quality is the best i have ever heard but these are also the first expinsive headphones i have bought. but in the end these are the best headphones i have ever had(:
p979
aVThese headphones are great! They are a great quality for the price, especially if you don't want to spend $100 on a really good pair. Sparkle Motion might be a little deceiving for the design (I thought it was a graphic that was glittery or something but it's a flat color vs metallic or glittery, but that's alright). Cord is a good length, and I like how it's wrapped in cloth material. Good choice for headphones.
p980
aVBasically, these headphones are 100% worth the money you'll be spending for them. They look pretty good, and they get pretty loud so even if you feel weird about having them on your head you can hang them over your neck and you can still hear the music- plus it's really cool.First things first, these headphones are not THAT sturdy. They are durable enough so that if you drop them or maybe even throw them on the ground, they won't break but be careful where you store it because they have been known to snap. The headphones are mostly plastic and there are a lot of moving/swiveling parts. A little bit of TLC will prevent these headphones from breaking- plus it comes with a cool little bag, a sticker, and a spray paint stencil.Next, these things are pretty tight. If it's your first time getting skullcandys or you're upgrading from earbuds/cheap headphones, these things have noise cancelling foam rings, and they snap onto your ears pretty tight. This is good and bad- It's good because it does cancel out some of the noise... When I'm listening to my music on normal volume I can't hear anyone unless they're shouting into my ear, but its bad because it can get uncomfortable. It's the type of thing you have to get used to. When I first put them on I was like "Darn, this is really tight" but after a few days I got used to it and now they're pretty comfortable. It also varies from person to person as some of my friends say that they are really tight and others say they're perfectly comfortable. Something else to keep in mind, they don't fold up like other skullcandys or other headphones for easy storage... They stay in the headphone shapeThose are the two main cons about this product, but it still gets 4.5/5 stars because the sound quality is aboslutely amazing. I listen to rock, pop rock, punk rock, alternative, metal, and dubstep (techno but VERY heavy on the bass) and this headphone can easily take any of these. One of my favorite things to do is to close my eyes, set my EQ to bass booster, and listen to the skullcandy doing work. It sounds absolutely amazing and the headphones handle the heavy bass extremely well. I brought these headphones to school and people were trying them out and they were mostly all impressed at the quality of the music.All in all, if you're looking for an afforadble upgrade to your cheapo headphones or annoying earbuds, this is a great deal. With only trivial problems and amazing sound quality, what more could you ask for from a pair of $35 headphones?
p981
aVI was actually inspired to get these headphones after purchasing a pair of Skullcandy Skullcrushers.  Those were a quality purchase and these headphones didn't disappoint either.  There isn't a person I give these to that doesn't believe they are comfortable and the sound quality is excellent.  One unique attribute of these headphones is that the audio cord is wrapped in nylon instead of rubber.  They come with a nice carrying bag for travel and the every component of the headphones is sturdy.  The designs on the earphones are attractive as well.These headphones are definitely a deal for the money and I can see myself buying many more pairs in the future.
p982
aVI got the Shattered Rasta, design is cool.Pro'sDecent sound quality and bass to the untrained ear.1 wire from the left side onlyFull over head paddingAdjustableCon'sTight after wearing them for a while. A while being 50 minutes+Not as much bass as I wantedFor $32 it's a good buy. They were too tight for me though so I sold the Hesh and got Skullcrushers.Skullcrushers are the better buy for $10 more on here. <--Insane BASS & more comfy
p983
aVI purchased the headphones for my teenage son.  He wanted headphones for christmas and these were exactly the ones he had his eye on.  They arrived quickly and in perfect condition.  I was extremely satified with my purchase.
p984
aVTerrible simply terrible. No midr-ange what so ever, flabby slow muddy bass the completely drowns anything else out. The fact that these things feel like they are going to burst into flames the second you touch them due to the poor build quality. They also make the person wearing them look like a complete ass. My point being that many many MANY other HI-FI options exist in the same price point, and if you spend a little more*and you will get what you pay for* you will be blown away that you ever considered buying these.Sony MRD-XB500-700 being one, and the Koss PRO DJ100 being another that simply annihilates these.
p985
aVI got this for my daughter for Christmas.  She absolutely loves it.  She likes the style, sound quality, and comfort.  I can't get her to take it off sometimes.  Thanks for having this in stock as I hate to shop at malls and such.
p986
aVThese Paul Frank inspired Skull Candy brand full ear headphones offer a cute look for fans of the artist but overall they should not expect any sort of significant quality in terms of both sturdiness and sound. The speakers wrap around the ear comfortably, and while they do feel sturdy enough, these obviously aren't the type of headphones that should be taken outside in the rain or dropped on the floor too often. The wire is actually a good highlight as it is wrapped in a soft yarn-like material and not your typical rubber, therefore it feels more like a shoelace and not so much a wire. This ensures that the wire will never become tangled or stuck in any sort of annoying twirls especially if you're the type that likes to wrap up wires when the item is not in use. Therefore, just take care of these physically as they may tend to scratch easily.Now in the area that matters - sound quality. Unfortunately, most of my rating was lower simply because of this. The headphones emit whatever sound you put them through, but for the most part things just sound too average and flat. There is no significant bass or overall good balance. The bandwidth is not Bose or Westone quality, so don't expect to be blown away. I mean, even in the least. Plus right out of the package, I noticed that with some songs, if the volume was even significantly louder than average, the headphones would make this small rattling and distortion type of sound, as if the speakers weren't strong enough to handle a higher than average volume. This is the biggest disappointment with these headphones. One would think that with speakers this big these phones would be strong enough to handle a good amount of bass without any distortion whatsoever. Then again, Skull Candy has always been notorious for their style of substance, and these headphones are unfortunately no exception.These are a good idea for a collector's item if you are buying them for a fan of the Paul Frank artist, but if you want to do your music justice, spend a little more on a quality brand, like Sennheiser, Bose, Westone, Sony, Phillips, etc. (Actually, some of these other brand names would probably offer BETTER sound quality headphones for a cheaper price).In the end, being a big fan of music, I simply cannot recommend these, or any other Skull Candy product.
p987
aVI am posting this here because Skullcandy won't let me post a NEGATIVE review on their site! I bought these headphones thinking 1) they're Skullcandy and 2) they are $50+, so they must be good. I was totally wrong! The headphones all around feel cheap! From the 'Made in China' label on the plastic to the other material used, they were NOT comfortable. The headphones were circular so they did not fit my ears. They also let out wayyy to much sound when I had them on. In other words, if you don't want to have people hear the music you are listening to, the volume must be extremely low.Do yourself a favor and avoid these!
p988
aVNot many complaints at all! Pros- keeps outside noise out very well, can even play drums outside and hear the music inside, also very warm in cold weather. Cons-only con they do tend to bleed music so you'll have to turn them down in libraries. But overall really good product, great sound quality, great bass, love it
p989
aVI bough these for my boyfriend for christmas, he says they are awesome and give s them five stars. they have great sound, quality, and bass. These are the best headphones we have ever had!
p990
aVThese headphones are excellent! I bought them at Best-Buy for $49.99, and, for the price, everything about them is great! The sound clarity is superb, and the bass is perfect. It is not over-powering like the Skullcrushers, or many other, more expensive, headphones. And these headphones actually grow softer with use.  When I first bought them, I thought that the padding was a little hard, but after owning them for 2-3 months, I must say they beat my old Sony MDR-NC7 headphones in terms of sound quality. Definitely one of the top choices for a pair of headphones under $100. I definitely recommended them!
p991
aVI got this headphones for engineering purposes because they are simple, NOT biased and NOT EQ'ed for studio monitoring. Listening to music though this guys is pretty awesome to be honest, bass in punchy, mids are excellent, and treble is crisp. I use an Apogee DUET for recordings, and having this headphones plugged into the headphone jack of the Apogee makes the sound much cleaner and clear. I listened to all the genres I could possibly think off, and they all sound amazing with this headphones.This might not be Beats by Dr.Dre, but for the price you got yourself some excellent monitoring headphones. If you are into DEEP bass or DEEP hip-hop beats... I recommend the Skullcrushers by Skullcandy (unless you want to drop some major coin on major studio headphones).
p992
aVConsidering I bought these headphones for $50, the sound quality is very good.  I also own a pair of $120 Able Planet NC Headphones and of course there is a significant difference in sound quality.  Do not buy these if you are looking for a pair of traveling headphones as they do not assist in reducing the low humming of voices or car engines.  However, they are good headphones with decent enough quality to play a wide range of music.  And I would agree with other reviews... I have never heard a non-powered headphone pair sound this LOUD when simply plugged into my iPod.I strongly recommend these headphones to anyone on a budget who is looking for a decent pair of comfortable, over the ear headphones.  Personally, I use them when I play the drums.  They cancel out enough of the noise from the drums and they're loud enough to still hear what you're playing (without spending over $300 on Studio headphones).
p993
aVCould not wait to get the package open and plug my ipod up so I can hear the type of sounds that was gonna come through.  Very hot joints I must say.  DWade is my man, so I had to get them.
p994
aVI got these for my daughter's 14th birthday and they have been a huge hit. She was using the cheap iPhone earbuds that Apple provides and even tried some of the noise isolating earbuds (cheap ones).  She kept losing and/or breaking earbuds or the rubber pieces that actually seal them into your ears.  My daughter is really into fashion.  So, when she saw the Paul Frank monkey headphones, she wanted them.  She's not really concerned about sound quality or even how sturdy they are.  But, I was.  After reading several reviews, I was a little concerned about how sturdiness.  After having had them for a week, the quality seems to be decent.  They aren't exactly built like a Mack truck.  But, I think if cared for properly they will hold up.  The cord seems to be pretty decent quality.  The sound is really good.  Definitely as good as I would expect for the money paid.  One knock on them is the plastic used for the cushions on the cans doesn't breathe at all.  So, your ears can get very hot and sweaty very quickly in these.  The look is very cartoonish.  But, it's perfect for a teenager or a pre-teen. She gets lots of compliments on them.  Overall, we are very happy with our purchase.
p995
aVI ordered these headphones for my boyfriend's birthday. I selected the free supersaver shipping and it actually got here early! The product was still in the package and is actually a Really great product. He loves them and so do I. I've even thought about buying a pair for myself. I would definitely recommend this product to anyone looking for great quality headphones.
p996
aVI ordered these headphones for my son.  He already had a pair of skullcandy headphones, but he wanted the extra base that these provided.  He is very pleased with my purchase.
p997
aVThese things look awesome. They also sounds awesome. They hold sound really well too. (no one else around you can hear what you are listening to) However the thing that kills this is its insanely uncomfortable. I have a very average sized head and ears but this thing did nothing but create headaches. I tried to push past it cause they look and sounds so nice, but in the end I could no longer take it.
p998
aVSkullcandy found their niche when they ventured off into their versions of designer headphones. Who would of thought to take such a simple product and fuse it with designs that probably will soon become (if not already) the JORDAN of headphones.I have purchased two Skullcandy headphones for my nephews, both HESH's, and my nephews absolutely love them! The great feature about these particular Celtic KG Hesh DJ Headphone's vs the HESH Paul Frank Blacks is that they have a mic switch that allows the user to mute the sound and hear what a person is saying without having to take the headphones off. (Which is not on the first pair of Skullcandy headphones that I purchased so that nephew is not too happy with his lil bro having an extra feature he doesn't have.)However, the important fact is the SOUND. Both Skullcandy headphones produce amazing quality for the money. The Skullcandy headphones are perfectly unmatched in this category and excellent for anything you need to listen to on a regular basis. From an iTouch or any mp3 player to the XBOX or a PS3; Skullcandy provides various models for you to bang out with and is truly the choice of the ear.COPYRIGHT TSTREETZ 2010
p999
aVI just got these awesome headphones today! They have amazing sound quality! It's like listening to a speaker when the volume is full blast and they are on a desk. I'm in college and really need headphones to block out sound as much as cheaply possible for studying. I have used them only for a few hours, but love everything! Everyone else loves the cute design! Despite that, my favorite aspect is the cord. Instead of being covered in some latex plastic stuff like most headphones, these are a braided cloth cord decreasing shock risk and increasing the longevity! I was surprised to see that these come with a satin carrying case as well. I give it 4/5 because I hadn't had them for very long. But I would Definitely suggest buying!Carmanita RavenFreshman at Converse College
p1000
aVI'm used to using the separate headphones where you rotate this awkward piece of plastic behind your ear because those are cheap, but I decided to buckle down and get some nice over-the-ear headphones because the original ones I'm referring to never seem close enough to my ears. I love the style and color; I feel like Skullycandy is all about expression. I read the reviews before my purchase and I took note that these leak sound (which is unusual considering the style), but I truly don't mind. I usually only wear headphones when I'm walking outside or at home, not in public places anyway. This product also comes with a pouch which is really neat; I just store these and my iPod in there so I always know where they are. I also love how the cord doesn't get tangled and ruined like most headphones! Whatever material they used for the cord is ingenious.
p1001
aVThe headphones are good listening tools but broke in a week. I sent them to skullcandy who then gave me a 50% store credit of my warrented item. There good 'phones but remeber to do two things: 1)Warrenty, 2)And put defective product when you're returning them for breaking.
p1002
aVThis is a great item looks good. I get lots of compliments on the  and the sound quality is great... the only problem i would say i have with this is that it is mostly made of plastic... i just hope it holds up through normal usage wear and tear....
p1003
aVThe first pair of these I bought fit comfortably. The sound quality was pretty good, but although the cups fit over my entire ear, they let in more outside noise than I wanted them to (used on my daily ferry/bus/street commute). Returned the first pair when edge of the vinyl ear pad cover started to come out from under the hard plastic cover on one side after less than a month (exchanged for a new set). When the second pair started to do the same thing, I took them back too - the clerk was unsurprised, indicated they got a lot of that with the Skullcandy headphones. Didn't give them a third strike, decided to try another brand instead.
p1004
aVi love this product i was unsure after reading other reviews how they were saying they break easily but then my cuzin bought them and i tried em out and they rocked there the best 50 doller headphones u can get i use them almost everyday the onley con is after wearing them a while they hurt your ears but otherwise they rock
p1005
aVThese headphones are EPIC!!! you can turn them up loud enough for everyone within 20-30 ft to hear and the sound quality is still very smooth and clear. the comfort is less than perfect, but what headphones aren't? overall, the best quality and best deal on headphones i've ever bought.
p1006
aVI love these headphones. They are very snug and good for simple music listening. There is no volume adjustment, so you would have to adjust the volume from your mp3 player or computer speakers instead. These headphones definitely take away all the extra sound around you.
p1007
aVExcellent product. And the service was amazing. It got to me in great condition and good timing. I am over seas on deployment and the package was still delivered thank you very much.
p1008
aVi bought them,used them for five days on the PC,didnt have the chance to hit the park with them...and guess what they just cracked on the side where you adjust the size of 'em...cool design pretty low quality.and the warranty service isnt that accurate if you're european..i had a cheaper model and they served me much better...i dont recommend these, try wesc or even phillips or the cheaper models these aint worth the bees...
p1009
aVThese headphone are absolutely great!! The sound quality is crisp and loud. I enjoy when I am on the subway and someone else is dancing and singing along to the music I'm listening to in my headphone. I also get a lot of compliments on my headphones alone.  Great look and a great buy. The only thing that bother me about the headphone was the material that it is made out of.  One week after I got them, the blue cover to the speakers came apart. Haven't yet tried to figure out a way to fix it but overall, the product is a great buy if you can keep it from falling apart.
p1010
aVThis is my second pair of Skullcandy Hesh Headphones. The last pair suffered from cheap construction as well as this one does, but for $50, you can't beat the sound, and the comfort. This aren't noise canceling headphones, they amplify, if you listen loud enough, others can hear what you're listening to. Other than that, my second pair, will see if they last six months, good computer mixer sound as well.
p1011
aVWhen I was considering buying these headphones, I was reading a lot of reviews on them that made me not want to buy them. People were saying they were the crappiest headphones ever & that they're a waste of money. Truthfully, these people are just plain wrong. They're expecting way too much out of $50 headphones. I think that these are pretty beast for $50 headphones. They sound amazing & the bass is awesome as well but not so overpowering that it distorts the sound. They also do an awesome job of blocking out surrounding noises. I know there are a lot of people who say these hurt your ears after wearing them for too long, don't worry about that too much. Just a simple readjustment will stop that from happening. The only thing that's a bad thing is that they do leak some sound. But that's not that big of a deal for me so to me, this product is flawless. Another thing: everyone is saying that these are made out of some cheap crappy material that breaks easily. Once again, wrong. If you don't yank them off your head & actually make an effort to take care of them, they should last a while. & even if they do break, Skullcandy will either replace it at no charge or replace it for 50% depending on what happened. So if you're not planning on buying these because of all those reviews that say this product sucks, you should just go ahead and buy them. You'd be surprised at how amazing they are & how all those reviews were just a bunch of bs. These headphones are just so amazing. My very first pair & I couldn't ask for anything better for such a cheap price. Oh yeah, they're also stylish as well (;
p1012
aVI bought these because of reputation.  I wanted a non-earbud type headphone to use while I worked in the office.  I found that these headphones..1) Leak a lot of sound.  Expect to keep them turned down pretty far if you are in a quiet office setting.2) They squeeze your head far to tightly.  After an hour or two of wearing, I get a headache.  And before you even say it, I have adjusting them.  I've even tried wearing them at max adjustment till they no longer touched my scalp at all.3) Brittle.  Is there any metal in these headphones?  The last straw was the arm snapping on them.  Upon inspection the cross section of arm is a very thin layer of plastic.  If you are going to make a device you put on & off your head day in & out.. at least make it robust?!  I've probably gotten less than 50 uses of these.
p1013
aVI really like these headphones, even though I just got them today. I picked Skullcandy for their reputation, and I wanted a solid pair of over the ear headphones with good bass and sound quality for $50 or below, and this is what I decided on. I'm really glad I picked these! They're pretty cool looking and the sound quality is awesome, lots of bass but not so much that it's too overpowering. They fit well on my ears, though they might hurt if your ears are either really sensitive or abnormally large, I guess. They seem pretty heavy duty for the most part, but even if they don't hold up (Again, I just got them), be aware that Skullcandy has a really awesome warranty where they'll replace them if they fail randomly and they will reimburse you for half of a new pair if you break them by accident, no matter how long you've had them. That alone is enough to make them worth the price, as you will never have to pay full price for another pair. Just be sure to write down the date you bought them and you're golden. If you are on the fence about these, go for it.
p1014
aVI don't see what all the negative reviews are for. I bought these to use when i mow the lawn mostly, because normal earbuds just couldn't over power the sound of the tractor. These do a great job! They're super loud, and pretty comfortable. But like the other reviewers said, they definitely leak sound out. Majorly.
p1015
aVOkay first of all i bought a paul frank hesh for my birthday i was ecstatic about buying this since it was skullcandy but when the package came and i put it on my ears it was hell it was  uncomfortable for my ear and the sounds leaked even at the lowest possible volume.to buyers out there who wants to put their money and time to something worth it i recommend you to stay out from skulcandy products they may look cool but they don't offer what you are looking for i recommend ifrogz headphones
p1016
aVBeing skullcandy, I didn't hesitate purchasing these at retail price (49.99). My old over the ear skullcandy headphones were incredibly loud and sounded great.I'm not going on skullcandy by brand anymore. First set failed in a few days and I had to go through a huge hassle exchanging them since I couldn't outright return them.These are extremely uncomfortable, especially after wearing them for long periods, and for the brand and even at the price they're simply NOT loud enough. The sound quality and bass is superior but the uncomfortable ear padding is complemented by painful pressure from the sound I don't usually get at such low volumes.I've been sticking with my $5 clearance Sony mega-bass ear buds until I can find a replacement for these massively disappointing headphones.
p1017
aVI was a little skeptic when I ordered these.  There weren't many reviews on these or the over NBA themed headphones.  But I have to say I am very satisfied with these headphones! The sound quality is great and they look cool!  The only little thing is they don't fit over the ears that well (my ears are average) which can be a little uncomfortable after wearing them for a while but it's not major at all.  Overall a great product I definitely recommend these!Update:Ive had these for a few months now and they still work great.  Although one of the side adjusters recently broke.  I didn't drop them or anything I was simply adjusting them when it cracked.  I was able to fix it with some duct tape and some plastic to act as a splint.  If you get these just be careful with use the plastic on the adjusters isn't that strong.
p1018
aVSKULL CANDY HEADPHONES ARE THE GREATEST. WE GOT THESE FOR MY SON FOR CHRISTMAS. HE IS A HUGE CELTICS FAN SO IT WAS PRETTY EXCITING TO SEE THAT THEY HAD CELTICS HEADPHONES. THEY FIT GREAT, THE SOUND IS AMAZING AND REASONABLY PRICED.
p1019
aVNot at all what I expected..... I mean the sound quality is good, but not exceptional. Definitely not worth almost $400.00. One mind as well settle for  the less expensive wireless headphones, which  has the same capability/quality as this one.P.s. BEWARE: your ears might hurt after an hour of having them on.
p1020
aVIdk whats the problem with these they sound great and all but you listen for 20 min or less and your iphone or ipad sude ly gets disconected without turning off the bluethooth it juat sucks im keeping them to see if they put an upgrade on the software to solve this
p1021
aVThe color and feel are great. The only complaint is the feedback that the headphones gives off. I also wish that the battery didn't continue to deplete when the headphones are not in use.
p1022
aVVery fairly priced on Amazon. Wireless works well and fits my 10 year old son, though not a snug fit. He also uses as mild ear protection for "loud noise" projects. He also has purchased Power Beats 2...but prefers these. ALwww.NordicICEgel.com"Prescription Pain Relief without the visit to the doctor".
p1023
aVbluetooth connecton sucks with these period! dont waste your $$ you want to be able to spend money and not have a problem in the world but these will cause a bit of a headache every time you change a song...
p1024
aVJust received these after waiting a ridiculous amount of time for shipping. Then they arrive and the same complaints i've read on here were viewed when i opened the package. The inner paet of the headset was all torn and could see the cream colored foam very clearly. Very poor quality !!! Considering what these cost, i had a lot higher expectations.  Don't buy them !! I'll be ordering Bose !!
p1025
aVFor the price you would think it would stay connected to devices via Bluetooth and cancel noise. You know, like the box says it does. If you thought that, you'd be wrong. It deserves zero stars.
p1026
aVI was so excited for these headphones! While the noise canceling feature worked effortlessly, the Bluetooth connectivity was awful. At first i thought it might just be my phone but actually Bluetooth worked for every other electronic I have. But the headphones would stay connected for one song and then if I tried to change it to a different song it would automatically disconnect. Then trying to get it to connect again failed each time. Not sure if I just received a faulty headphone but to spend $300 for these I expected so much more.
p1027
aVGot these headphones on sale on Black Friday for $100 off. I had the original post-Monster Beats Studios and I also have the Bose QC-15s. I travel often. In my experience, Bose noise cancellation on a plane is far superior. That said, this generation of Beats has done a nice job at closing that gap. The overall sound is better than the previous Studios and more balanced. I prefer them for everyday use over my Bose. I also found the I had an equal overall experience in a plane with my Bose if I based my cost benefit of these headphones on improved sound and noise cancellation. I gave my Bose to a family member and now use these Beats Studio Wireless exclusively as my only travel/everyday headphones going forward.The rechargeable battery has not an issue for me on long haul flights. The feature is also saving me money on AAA batteries. I recharge them every night. I do wish they auto shutoff if they weren't receiving a signal while on Bluetooth mode, or added the ability to work with out a charge and no noise cancellation.Bought and directly fulfilled from Amazon. Received a 100% genuine, non-counterfeit product.
p1028
aVExcellent sound quality, listen to a variety of music and it all sounds great, some complain of too much bass but with different settings for different types of music on my iphone I didn't have that problem, sound cancelling seems pretty good so far, have used them on my riding mower and the noise level of the motor is greatly reduced. Can't wait to try them on a plane. Fit, finish and overall quality is great. I would recommend this product.Pros: Sound excellent, comfortable, easy to setup and use.Cons: Expensive, can get a bit warm on the ears on a hot day, wish Crutchfield offered the flat black ones, i put a carbon fiber look skin on mine to keep it from getting covered in finger prints,
p1029
aVWell what do i say.. It's definitely good looking. Audio quality is good but that is expected. Wearing it for a while kind of feel a little bit uncomfortable. For this price range, I expect everything to be absolutely excellent. It functionally does it, but didn't surprise me.
p1030
aVMy son bought these with his Christmas money and he loves them. His mother also loves them, so that might cost me more money in the long run. We will see. I haven't been able to wear them more than once since he keeps them with him all of the time, but they did sound great. Love the bass levels in them. Nice and clear. Bluetooth cuts in and out randomly (hence the 4 stars and not 5), but overall not a major issue.
p1031
aVThese are fxxx awesome!! I gave it to my friend to try who is in sound quality and he was shaking his head with this put on and some test bass song :) It just happens! Battery goes like 7-8 hours for me on single charge. Delivery form amazon was fast, as usual!Cons:- Comfortable overall but clamping force is good enough in my case, may be my head is big
p1032
aVThese are not an authentic Beats product.  The bluetooth function went out on my pair went out and when I went to apple to get them repaired they told me that these were a knock off product.  Up until the bluetooth going out I thought they were the best headphones Ive ever purchased
p1033
aVThey were everything I expected. The bass is good the noise cancelling is great and the sound quality is unparalleled. The only thing is that sometimes the Bluetooth connection gets iffy. Like disconnecting after each song so you have to connect your charger to a Mac or windows 7 or better and update the firmware from the beats website which is pretty easy. Over all I have no complaints
p1034
aVDelivery: Prompt, received within two days of orderingPackaging: Factory sealed box, just as you would expect if you bought them from an Apple StorePerformance: The sound is phenomenal. As someone that listens to all types of music from classical to rap, to rock, these pass the test on all genres.Comfort: Little stiff at first, but that will lessen with wear. The padding on the ear, and fit is is ideal.*as others have mentioned make sure you go to the Beats site and down load the latest firmware as it will update the Bluetooth and fix the connectivity issue*
p1035
aVBeats has a good sound, but not to put it on for long time although the pads are soft and comfortable.I had a problem with my Beats it keeps lose connection with my iPhone 6s every time I have to restart the beats,.I think it was defected pairs, The sound isolation is very bad people besides you can hear clearly what are you listeningI have returned back my beats . Because I was not satisfied with this headset.Thanks Amazon for great customer service and support to return this product easily
p1036
aVExcellent buy love the range and convience of this item. Only issue I have had is disconnecting or going to sleep on me after about an hour. But I just reconnect and it's fine
p1037
aVPurchased for my daughter she loves them. They are definitely loud and crystal clear.I think the price is a bit high for headphones but..... when you really want that one specific item...... the price... is the price.
p1038
aVThere for my girlfriend. She really seems to like them. She works out with them for the most part. I don't know if I would spend that much on myself I'm hard on things.
p1039
aVBought brand new! Headphones came in original packaging!But the charger cord that is supposed to be included with the headphones was not in the box.Also the left ear has a hard time working. I only seem to get great quality noise out on the right ear.If you want to invest I suggest this brand, but I would go in the store and buy them. Not online.
p1040
aVThey do not stay connected while listening to my iPhone 6 plus . For every song I listen to I have to connect them again! What a waste of my money!!!
p1041
aVGot them as a Christmas gift for my girlfriend. She's very happy with them. Good product with good sound. Not heavy with good mic for calls and easy use.  Almost totally cancels noise which if it did would be great. I'd recommend as a buy. Also, color was dope.
p1042
aVthese headphones are my favorite pair of headphones that I own. They are very stylish. I love the Bluetooth connectivity. The only problem with the Bluetooth is that sometimes when it is your pocket and you turn your head away from the phone, the connection drops for like half a second. But other than that they are amazing.
p1043
aVThey're fine. Seems the wireless headphones are all in the same price range and these serve their purpose for me. I tested both the Bose Soundlink Wireless and these and here's what I found:BEATS work better with an iPhone than a Macbook. DOES NOT CONNECT WELL TO A MACBOOK!!! Not that they won't work with a Mac but they tend to prefer to connect automatically to an iPhone OVER a Mac over bluetooth and it's kind of a pain to have them connect to my MacBook Pro. Not a huge issue, just pretty annoying.BOSE I found connected better to my Macbook. Or iPhone. Was strong with both and connecting was easy breezy. I also think BOSE had a longer range, but I didn't test it to be sure, but it does seem that BEATS drops the connection pretty fast.BEATS is a bit better for bass sounds, and Bose has more depth / range of sounds.My tip? If you're willing, go to an Apple Store and buy both and test both out, playing the identical songs on two different devices and see which sounds better to you. Personally I stuck with Beats mainly because I use these for electronic music and the BEATS had the EDM range I was looking for. But BOSE had a different range. Plus I just liked the look of the BEATS more. But honestly, each are fine. I just stuck with this one because I liked the colors.
p1044
aVThe kid loves them.  They don't hurt his ears, have good battery life, and he doesn't need a cord except for charging.  Prior to these, he had the smaller "On-Ear" version and they hurt his ears.  We returned those and got these.  Excellent choice.  For reference, the kid is late teens.  He uses these for music, phone, gaming, etc...
p1045
aVPros:Great sound.  Nice and deep.  Bass is very good.Not too much like the Skullcandy Crushers.The protein leather on the earpads are very nice and soft.Cons:Not the most comfortable.Ears get hot because they did not leave enough space left between the ear and the leather.The ears cannot breathe and gets hot pretty quickly.The ear pads are very soft and cushy and so it is still more comfortable that the ATH M50X.The wireless convenience is what  you are paying the premium price over the ATH M50X though.The build quality does not inspire confidence.  It still has a plastic rattling sound from the folding joints.A $300 headphones should have a much better quality than this.  This is nowhere close to how well ATH MT50x feels in your hands.The active noise cancellation is very muted.  It probably adds around 25% in addition to the passive ones you get from covered earcups.As opposed to like 85% you would get from the Bose QC25.If Bose made the QC25 wireless, you might still get this becuase most likely Bose would price that at something ridiculous like $450.Bose's wireless headphones do not have Active Noise Cancellation yet for some unknown reason.=====================Update:  The Bluetooth connection kept dropping off with my iPhone6 plus.Thanks to other reviewers on Amazon I found out that there was a firmware update released by Beats to address this.You have to go to the website, download the sofware and connect your headphones to update the firmware.After a restart and reconnect with my phone, it was fixed!
p1046
aVFor being wireless the sound quality and noise cancellation capabilities are great. My only issue with these headphones is the Bluetooth operation; it's terrible. It's very difficult to connect to your iPhone, iPad or any other device I've tried, especially if you're trying to connect to multiple devices.
p1047
aVTheses headphones came as a complete surprise to me the first time I checked them out. I knew I had to buy them right away. The bass is so much better than the older Beats headphones. The earcups are extremely comfortable for long sessions. The bluetooth connectivity issues have been resolved as well. Battery life is decent enough to last at least 10-12 hours. The only downside would be the weight of these headphones.
p1048
aVFor a wireless set, these are great.  The sound sounds a bit overly digitized, but it's not overly heavy on bass like most Beats products and its Bluetooth connection seems very strong and easy to execute with an iPhone, iPad, and Macbook Pro.  I love the color of this as it's not your basic black and it gives a nice, sophisticated look.
p1049
aVWas worried that I'd have some connectivity issue since I'm not an Apple user. I have a Dell XPS 13 (2015) and Note 4 and haven't had any issues at all. Connecting to my Note 4 via bluetooth was simple. Not a problem whatsoever. Getting the headphones to connect to my Dell XPS 13 was a little frustrating at first and after about an hour of frustration I realized I hadn't ran the most recent updates for my computer yet. After running the update everything connected perfectly and haven't had an issue yet.I know Beats aren't necessarily the best sounding headphones but I love them. The fact they are wireless is perfect. The battery life is pretty good. I charge them about every 4 days and use them fairly often throughout the day.The thing about these Beats headphones is that they are extremely comfortable.
p1050
aVMy grandson was so surprised to get this wireless Beat's headset for Christmas.  He is a freshmen in high school and enjoy's them on the bus trip's for away basketball games or at home playing computer games.  He likes not having to be connected to the wire and can use these hands free.  I'm happy with this purchase.
p1051
aVPlain and simple.1. They weren't meant to last and break just like any other apple product (probably so you'll buy more or whatever).2. They aren't worth the cost3. They're just pretty to look at and use as an accessory The longest I managed to go without using/replacing a warranty for these headphones is 6 months. The bluetooth sucks. Constantly disconnecting from my phone and tablet (might have something to do with them being Android phone and tablets). These headphones work nice enough but not well enough for the amount asked.  I don't suggest anyone buy these headphones. This item is incredibly overhyped. Were it around $100 to $150 I'd probably understand people buying them.
p1052
aVThe sound quality is great!  The biggest reason these where bought is for the noise canceling feature.  They are NOT noise canceling.  They only muffle out sound.  You can hear all outside sound, which is very disappointing given the extreme cost of this product.  We thought our first pair which was bought at Christmas was defective in some way and sent them back for a replacement pair.  Second pair that was received was exactly the same.  I feel the item description should be changed.
p1053
aVI rode the fence trying to decided if I needed these with all the other headsets I already had. Well, I am certainly glad I dropped the hammer on these. First I should explain how I listen to headphones. I use an app called EQu on all my apple devices. This is an equalizer which enables me to mold the music. I don't like a headset dictating to me what my music is going to sound like. The headphones provide the canvas on which the music is painted and the equalizer decides the intensity of the color painted on that canvas.These headphones are some of the best I have yet used for the way I listen. There is and incredible latitude of frequency and it all produces clear sound. The accuracy of that sound is always debatable but it has to be there. I can adjust my listening to what is playing and not have to worry about the capability of the headset to handle it. This is really the first time I have had this kind of listening freedom.They fit a little tight but that will probably loosen up or I will get used to it. The finish is well done and very classy. I got the flat black ones.You adjust them on the surface of the left ear cup.  It is all vary intuitive. Push up on the upper portion and the volume goes up. Press down on the lower portion and the volume goes down. Front and back changes your selection. Tap the center for hold again and it plays. Tap the cup when you get a call and it answers it. Tap again and it hangs up.These are highly rated, highly priced headphones. If you are seriously going to listen to your music you have a lot to choose from at this level. It is important to decide how you listen. If you want good base and good highs these are great. If you use EQ these are excellent.
p1054
aVBought these for my boyfriend for Christmas to replace his beats solo headphones. He loved them and said that the sound was great and they felt far more comfortable than his other beats. The noise cancelling works great even when you don't have music playing!
p1055
aVAmazing shipping guys, and the product was perfect as if bought from the Apple Store. It's REAL beats headphones and comes factory sealed.The headphones also sound amazing and the battery is great as well. Highly recommended coming from a cell phone store owner that places many orders from many vendors. Great great great headphones.Would order again.
p1056
aVMake sure you get the beats updater to install firmware WHEN you do get connection issues. I experienced connection issues immediately after purchase similar to many buyers but since installing the firmware, the headphones have been ok. Will update if anything else changes
p1057
aVI bought these to use at my gym, 24 Hour Fitness, where, to my dismay, the company has recently initiated a highly-irritating, advertising campaign on their TV monitors that includes playing insipid pop songs at high volume. These headphones do the trick. They completely eliminate the gym "music" and my music sounds great through them. They fit very snugly -- I wear them not only on the gym floor but also while racewalking & running on the gym track and they never budge.At first, I was a little bemused by the control system, fumbling around getting them up and running on bluetooth with my iPod Nano. Finally, I realized that when you turn them on, it takes a second for that to happen and the tone to tell you that it has. I had been double-tapping the button, erroneously turning them on but then back off. Now I'm fine with that. Initial bluetooth connection is easy and the headphones automatically connect with the last bluetooth device you used them with, so now I just turn on the Nano, then the headphones, and music is playing. Controlling pause / play / fast-forward via the headphones works fine, as long as I remember how many quick pushes on the button does what. Not really intuitive, but maybe that's just me.Can't speak to durability as I have only had them a few weeks but at this point I highly recommend them, at least for gym and home use. I don't think they would be appropriate for outdoor running any distance, where you really build up a sweat, as they fit tight all around your ears, thereby encouraging sweating and then would become a reservoir for it. So, if you are a heavy sweat person, maybe look for something else for workouts. I get mine only a tiny bit sweaty working out in the gym and I just wipe them with a slightly damp paper towel.Seems to me at this point that my iPod, on bluetooth, uses battery much faster than the headphones. Last time I recharged the Nano, the headphones were only about a quarter way down, according to the indicator lights.
p1058
aVOrdered the headphones, but bluetooth was not working, it just turns off by itself on the meaddle of movie etc..., so i exchanged them and received a new ones with the same problem.
p1059
aVI've been wanting a pair of Beats since they first came out. I've heard many negative reviews of beats, but I've yet to regret buying these. They work great. The packaging is fantastic! The moment I put them on & heard my music through them I knew that I did not want to use another pair of headphones except for these. I've bought many headphones in the past but they cannot compare to these. Through my review I can sincerely say, beats has to be the best headphones you can use to listen to music.
p1060
aVOriginally, I had gotten them and the Bluetooth kept shutting off and I kept getting a buzzing noise through them. I tried resetting the headphones, checking to see if it was fully charged but the problem kept re-occurring. I was able to get a hold of apple and they walked me through on how to update the firmware on my headphones. The customer service was excellent and they reassured me that if the problem persisted, I would receive new headphones.  After the update I have had no problems. I am very happy with theyse headphones and the customer service I received!
p1061
aVJust a day after the delivery, these headphones kept on disconnecting from my iphone. I tried to download the updater but it kept on saying that it is getting interrupted. One good thing out of all of this though, apple care really helped me and are now gonna replace the beats. So, if you have any issues with connection , be sure to update it (didnt work in my case though).
p1062
aVI usually don't venture into the electronics department, when considering a gift for my husband, because he already has everything, and he is very picky!  But, just one week before Christmas, I asked him what he thought about the beats headphones, and to my amazement, he didn't know much about them.  I didn't know much either, so I began my research, reading reviews and watching videos.  Since he loves everything Bluetooth, I settled on this model in black, and Amazon Prime got it to me just in time for Christmas.  Well, my husband loves these headphones!  Every few days, he tells me of a new discovery.  For instance, he is impressed by the clarity, whether he is talking on the phone or listening to music. He loves how well the noise cancelling feature works, and that they are so comfortable to wear, he could easily fall asleep with them.  These are great headphones, and the perfect companion for his IPad and IPhone.
p1063
aVI bought these headphones about six months ago and I keep them at my work (a desk job).I have two cracks right above the ear pieces (one on each side of the headphones). One side's is larger than the others. The plastic is so low quality on these headphones that they crack just from putting them on and taking them off of your head. I think I might have accidentally "dropped" them 1 1/2 - 2 feet onto the ground (from my chair) one or two times. Either way, I watched the cracks start from the tiny stress marks on the headphones to full-on cracks just from every day use.P.S. I tried sending them back into Apple and get them fixed under the warranty. Apple claimed that the damage to my headphones isn't accidental and that they won't repair them under the warranty.
p1064
aVVery disappointing construction quality. Only 1 year warranty. High price for repair. After a little more than one year my ear cups are falling apart. Obviously Beats doesn't admit it's a poor quality construction problem and asked me more than $199 for the repair! Buy something else!
p1065
aVThese are actually really good headphones, but there are a few things you must understand before buying them.1. Audiophiles trash the hell out of beats, but what they don't understand is that they are meant for/marketed towards a totally different audience, and serve a completely different purpose than actual studio headphones. These headphones are meant for the power music listener/media consumer who enjoys a very full bodied sound to their content, not a sound engineer who is spending their time analyzing and tweaking sound frequencies in a digital audio file. These headphones are not "precise" at all... but understand that precision doesn't always equal a pleasurable listening experience. In fact, to the average joe, highly precise studio headphones will sound boring, and often times dull. Beats products provide a very rich and "bass-y" listening experience, which gives your music a sense of warmth and depth. This is done by tweaking the EQ frequencies, but they sound great nonetheless. Now, i agree that the name "studio" is extremely misleading, as these are NOT studio headphones. But i guess Beats' marketing department feels different.2. THEY ARE VERY OVERPRICED FOR WHAT THEY ARE. Truth be told, there are headphones out there for less than half the price that will give you the same/better listening experience; but understand that thats not what you are paying for when you buy beats! Beats has spent countless hours/money on marketing their products, and they have very successfully built and maintained a brand image like very few companies before them have ever been able to do. You are paying a premium because it is considered a privilege by society to be seen wearing beats, and it makes you the "cooler" person in the room. Its a fashion statement; much like a Louis Vuitton purse or a A&F; T-shirt. These headphones are not worth $380, i would even venture to say that they are not worth $280, but if you want that "beats image", thats what you are going to pay for.
p1066
aVThe sound is great! I've got a big fat head so they kind of hurt at first. I left them stretched out over desk fan that's a little wider than my head for a few days and they fit much better now. :)
p1067
aVI really like these headphones, I listened to them first at a best buy and though I liked them then I didn't feel they were worth 379.99 after all they are made of pretty much plastic!,  When I seen them on amazon for 264.99 which imo is a little more reasonable for what you get it was a no brainer!, the bluetooth is great I dont notice any significant sound quality difference between wired and bluetooth, the battery life is great and the sound is what you would expect from beats, also the noise cancellation is great, it doesn't cancel everything but Its enough that if you are listening to music the background noise will go unnoticed...... Overall Im satisfied..... My only gripe is for a headphone that is advertised at 379.99 retail, I would think they would make them with a better quality material to give them a more premium feel.....
p1068
aVI read alot of you people complaining anout these incredible head phones. most people Kill there's due to there own neglagence, and usually proceed to point a Finger at someone else!  Anyway beside personal abuse frpom unimportant people i have owned a pair of studio 2.0's over a year ago, and they still work great!!!! The key is take care of them and they will take care of you. thanks..PS--  BESIDE'S THE FACT THE IPHONE IS A CHILD'S PHONE, BETWEEN THE AGES OF 4-8 YEAR'S OLD.  IPHONES ARE SO FLAWED, DO NOT BLAME DRE'S BEATS. EXCUSE ME "APPLE" BEATS, WHO BY THE WAY HAVE NOT MADE ONE SOLITARY SINGLE IMPROVEMENT TO THER "BEAT" COLLECTION!!!  ONE MORE =THANKS STEVE -JOB'S FOR DIGGING YOUR DIRTY HAN'S INTO 80% OF USA AND CONVINCING THEM TO BUY YOUR RIDICULOUS PRODUCT FOR OUTRAGEOUS COST! REAL DOUCHE! NETWORK IS WEAK & FLAWED TOTAL "FUBAR" THANX STEVO!!!
p1069
aVUPDATE:So after do a little research I found out if you have a computer (yes an actual computer and not a tablet) you can actually hook up your headphones to your computer via USB and download the Beats Updater and update to the newest firmware and it should fix the issue.  In the Beats instructions they mention nothing of this and who would have thought you would ever need to update your headphones.  At any rate, the headphones are now staying connected and now I would recommend these for people to buy even with the pricy price tag.https://www.beatsbydre.com/support/how-to/firmware-updates-beats-updater.htmlOriginal Review:I wish there was a star less than one.  I would save your money.  These headphone are pretty expense and for that they should work.  The wireless is disconnecting from my iPhone non-stop.  I went on the Beats webpage to trouble shoot and they said simply just to reset the headphones.  Well that is all good, but you have to do it all the time.  I can't believe Apple would even sell this product since it doesn't work well with their products.  For almost $400 these headphone should at the very least be able to stay connected to your device.  I was actually surprised by some of the high reviews.  I'm guessing people spent a ton of money on the headphones and were too embarrassed to say they were crap, much like the people who buy Dyson vacuum cleaners.  Save your money!!
p1070
aVI have had beats headphones, but for some reason the ones I purchase from Amazon has been quite the disappointment. The reason for buying the wireless headphones was to be able to use the headphones via bluetooth, however, after pairing the headphones it would just disconnect and I could not connect it back unless I turn off and turn on the headphones which is annoying to do every five minutes.
p1071
aVI was initially very happy with these headphones. One of my friends got a pair first, let's call him friend A. Followed by me. Then another friend, let's call him friend B. All within a week or so. I say this to make it clear that my issues aren't isolated. I want to give one other piece of information. We all use them similarly. At work in an office 9/10.The sound is very impressive as is the noise cancellation. In those two respects. In my opinion these headphones were and are still near perfect. After 2 years. The batteries still hold a great charge. With typical use you can go days without charging them.Now for the issues. Within the first 11 months, they were great. Then one of the parts where the headphone folds with the studio logo on friend A headphone just shattered. At that point they looked like a pair of nunchucks. While not as extensive, something similar happened with friend B and his were not longer able to fold.The cover for the cushion on my Ear pads began to separate shortly after exposing the foam. I then had a similar issue as the friends above where my headphones don't fold as they should.At the time these headphones were $300 with maybe $10 off here or there. The expectation was that these would be headphones that last a long time. It's definitely not the case.Within the first year of warranty. These headphones have been great. Beyond that they deteriorate rapidly. I can't in my right mind recommend them.We did order some replacement parts to give them a bit more life, but for the price the build quality is seriously lacking.
p1072
aVI love them because of how they look, but I think you can find better sound quality out there. My makeup rubs off on the white padding of the headphones, but can somewhat be cleaned off. Battery lasts for a while and good price
p1073
aVThese headphones sound great, period. I really wanted to get them to work for me. If your anything like me when you can't get your headphones connected it drive you crazy. I spend ten solid days with these and had enough aggregation that I decided to actually write a review. Here we go....Got these on Christmas from my wife, connected them that night and listened to some jams while coloring in my new adult coloring book....perfect combo, I know. Everything was going smoothly until the next morning. I woke up with the urge to toss on the headphones to take the dog out and walk around the house getting things put together....wouldn't connect. Turned the headphones on and off, bluetooth on and off, even went to my devices (iphone) and clicked connect/disconnect. I ended up having to forget the device, then connect them again....twice. Finally I got it working and by that time my wife could see the frustration was building. The same thing happened several other times during our short relationship.That being said, I wear bluetooth headphones for about 12 hours/day while I'm working and I know how to connect a pair of headphones, it wasn't user error. I rely on my headphones for my job, I don't want to waste time getting them connected multiple times throughout the day. If I'm not listening to some jams during the day I'd go crazy!The last straw was when this happened two days in a row, the EXACT same problem.Fast forward a couple days after the initial connection issue, maybe day 5 and 6. I'm pumped about trying these things out on the treadmill so I get on and start running. The zone is perfect, great pace, great bass..."started from the bottom now we here"......that's all you can think about. Songs over, I'm more than a mile in and don't even remember what happened. Time for some 2Pac, wait where is the music?? No sounds, NOTHING. I could hear it coming on, that different silent pitch you hear, but no music at all. Force closed my apps, turned headphones on/off, bluetooth on/off, everything, hard reset on the phone.....all while running....nothing worked. I had to listen to the music on my phone speakers the rest of the run. This happened two days in a row.I wanted to love these, I really did. I had wanted a pair for a very long time and wouldn't ever buy them for fear I wouldn't like them. I'm perfectly happy with the LG 730's...they've lasted me over a year and have great sound quality for what I use them for. I would imagine these would get 5 stars from me had I wanted a headphone that I plugged in.I'm not proofreading this.
p1074
aVI purchased these headphones from Amazon and have been a loyal Beats owner in the past.  In fact I had the old original studios so I was excited to get the newer ones, especially being wireless.  When I first put them on they sounded okay (using Galaxy S5).  I really had to turn the volume up pretty high on the device for them to output adequate sound.  A few days later I took the headphones to work and after about an hour of listening they started to hurt the top of my head.  The band used is a little thicker and is made of this rubbery material.  I thought to myself as much as I love the looks and the wireless feature of this headphone I can't wear something that is going to hurt my head.  Because of this discomfort, I decided to return my headphones and get the Bose QC25.  The Bose QC25 are lighter and more comfortable after longer use and also have better noise cancelling.  Before I shipped these headphones back I wanted to test the difference of sound quality between my Galaxy S5 and my iPad Air.  Like stated earlier, the sound output from my Galaxy just was not what I had experienced with Beats in the past.  However, when paired with my iPad the sound quality was magnificent.  There was a huge difference.  I am unsure of what is causing this issue, but it is something to be aware of.
p1075
aVThe sound is very clear and they sound great i was impressed at first BUT they do distort sometimes when you turn them up which is a bit disappointing, besides that these are worth the $265 not only because of sound but these days you are considered "cool" just for being seen with them. One interesting thing that i noticed is that they sound EVEN BETTER through bluetooth than the wired connection which is a pleasant surprise. Only thing in question for me will be how long they will last because I've only had them for a month. Had a small issue with connection dropping to my macbook and iPhone 6 when i first used the headphones then i realized that you can update the software on the headphones and the connection hasn't dropped since. There are cheaper headphones that sound just as good or better BUT they aren't BEATS so of coarse u get no cool points for owning them so these do good across the board.
p1076
aVFirst Impression:I have an original Beatbox by Dre that I absolutely love and expected the performance of the Beatbox to translate over to the Beats Studio 2.0, especially since the Studio is a much newer product. Boy was I wrong. My first impression when I put these headphones on and turned them on was, these must be defective. The best way to explain the noise produced by the "active noise cancellation," (keep in mind I was in a silent room using the headphones) is to imagine a scene from an old western movie where the wind is blowing really hard and making a whistling noise. It's not just a faint noise, but an awful whistling noise that made me want to take the headphones off immediately before I developed a headache.Sound Quality:You know the plastic headphones with the circular foam on them they try to sell on the airplane? Those blow the Beats Studio 2.0 out of the water! The whistling and white noise from the "active noise cancellation" distorts the music even more than it already is. The noise cancellation slightly dampens the surrounding noise. As I type this I have the headphones on and turned to about medium volume. I can still here some guys lead pencil he is writing with and can here him turn the page of his book. I am sitting about 20 feet away from this guy. I tried to give these headphones the benefit of the doubt, but when I played some Dr. Dre through them I almost fell out of my chair in disbelief. The bass sounds as if there is a piece of notebook paper between the ear and the headphone that is being slapped every time a low note is hit. I had my friend try them on without telling him any details so I could obtain an unbiased opinion. I put on a heavy bass track and handed him the headphones and said listen. He listened for about 3 seconds, looked up and almost started crying from laughter. He couldn't believe how crappy they sounded and said, "cheap wal-mart headphones sound better than this."All in all:In all honesty I got a great kick out of these headphones. They really lightened the mood around the house. Everyone was able to get a laugh in. Needless to say I will be sending back these "headphones" (I don't think they should even be called headphones they're so bad) and purchase a pair of Bose Quiet Comfort 25.
p1077
aVGot the gold pair for Christmas and tried them out on my return trip home. I could hear every word of the flight attendant's safety speech with the volume turned up to a good level. I think a pair of ear muffs would cancel noise about the same.They also hurt my ears and my head. They are very very heavy and push down on the top of my head and pull my ears down. I had to take out my stud earrings to be able to wear them, and even then they werent comfortable to wear for a 2 hour flight. They're fancy looking but when worn (I'm an adult female), I felt like I looked as if I was trying to channel princess Leia... in other words silly.All that aside the actual audio quality was nothing to write home about. Certain types of music rich in bass will get you the most out of these, but I found a lot of white noise in the acoustic, folk, and classic rock that I listen to.Overall certainly not worth the $289 price tag on Amazon. Though with the level of discomfort they caused me, I probably wouldn't buy these at any price.
p1078
aVOk, I will try to be as comprehensive as possible, and update it as the earphones age. First off, some background: I use these at work in an industrial setting. There is a considerable amount of background noise, and that's what enticed me to spend $260 on some ANC headphones such as these. Picture the noise of an airplane, times about two.First impression: they definitely seem well-built, you can tell the plastic isn't cheaply made, and the unfold to the regular shape with a satisfying snap, with no worries that they'll fold up on you while wearing. They are very comfortable when wearing, without too much pressure against my head, and without feeling like they're going to go sailing across the room if I bend down to pick up a penny.First use: in a high-decibel setting, I was initially a little disappointed. I wasn't sure what to expect, but I was really hoping for an instantaneous ultra-quiet oasis to pop up, surrounding me in peace and serenity with my best music playing quietly and in such exquisite detail, that all my problems melted away. But seriously, they just seemed decent and stopping the noise, though the music quality was fantastic.After heavy use: the more I played with them, the more I found the proper positioning in order to keep any outside noise from leaking into the cups, after that, the noise cancelling was truly phenomenal. It got to the point that if I took them off, I was overwhelmed at the noise that it was preventing from getting to my ears. They stayed comfortable for decent amounts of time, though I did feel the need to adjust them every hour or so in order to give my ears and the top of my head a little break (they seemed to press very lightly on the furthest protruding point of my ears, only a minor inconvenience over my 8 hour shift). The battery was impressive, I still had 25% left after my shift. And the best part: no wires to get tangled up in! I could set my phone down and plug it in and forget about it. I did run into a small quirk regarding the Bluetooth connectivity. It would occasionally decide to disconnect for no particular reason, though it wasn't often, and I just had to turn them off and then back on to reconnect.Value wise, I'd say I wouldn't spend the MSRP on the apple website of $350, but $260 on Amazon was on the high end of reasonable for the quality and features. I previously owned some Jaybird BlueBuds that set me back $160, and comparatively these phones were much more high-quality, with much longer battery, and not to mention I didn't enjoy having buds in my ears for long periods of time.Overall, I am very impressed, and I look forward to pushing the performance of these high-quality earphones.
p1079
aVLooked for days trying to decide on these, or the Bose for my son.  He is 15, and a dancer, and also is beginning to mix his own music.  My opinion is that the Bose are probably the better headphone, however, it's about the person that is going to be using them.  My son loves, loves, loves these headphone.  The noise cancelling is pretty cool, I find it handy when all of the kids are in the room with me.  The are a little heavy, and would probably be a little uncomfortable with extended wear.  My son would say two thumbs up though!
p1080
aVmy boyfriend LOVES this ... it doesnt hurt his ears like the other beats beause this covers around his ear giving a wonderful studio sound of the music. being that is wireless he brings it to boot camp and the gym hands and hassel free!
p1081
aVMy son loves his Beats Studio wireless headphones. They did come slightly squished near the charging connection. Not that big of a deal overall an amazing guy compared to retail prices.
p1082
aVI purchased this last july while i was towards the end of my "a" school on fort sam houston. With all the moving around i did i never got to open my package until today which is like 5+ months after. To my surprise instead of getting a wireless headphone i purchased i had these regular wired beats instead. Im really upset since i did not get what i bought. But i realize it is my fault for not checking my actual item when it arrived. At this point it is too late to return the item.
p1083
aVBroke after 4 months of use. Bluetooth connection not the best would lose connection multiple times no matter how far you are from the device. Noise cancelling ok could have been better. Not worth the money
p1084
aVPerfect headphone for me. And I didn't know it comes with jack adapter, allowing me to use it when plugged on my iphone or computer. It allows me to use it with the microphone and carry phone calls. No more needs to have multiple headphones, this one does everything for me. Just perfect for me!
p1085
aVDrops blue tooth constantly on all apps/music but is very bad when using the beats with youtube.  Have only had them for a few days and are very unhappy with them.  They are terrible with Apple, and that is VERY bad because Apple purchased Beats and they are not very compatible.  Did the update on the Beats that was supposed to fix the problem with blue tooth dropping but then they stopped working altogether.  Got a hold of Beats direct and tried to troubleshoot them and I was told to send them back to get a return/refund or send them in for repair.  I only had them for 3 days.  Amazon is sending me a new pair now.  I will update this post as needed after I get the new ones.  New ones are here. Same issue. Will be returning them for Bose.
p1086
aVI have read reviews that say that Beats are overrated. Well these fit great. i can wear them for hours. They connect to any Bluetooth device that I've tried to connect them to. And they sound great! The highs are crisp, the lows are deep. I also use them with my PC for gaming. I don't need to use a mic, so these work perfect. I'm not sure if the mic would work in chat or not. However, it works great for phone calls! Phone calls are easy to answer and sound very crisp. I love these headphones!
p1087
aVI like these headphones, but there are some caveats.First, they're great looking. If you like the over the ear aesthetic, I think Beats does it best, especially the black-on-black slickness of the version I picked up. They're stylish without being obtrusive. I'm not the type to want to wear this sort of headphone in public, but this version of Beats is so cool and slickly made, I don't think they draw the wrong kind of attention whatsoever.Next, they're comfortable to wear. While some of these products can irritate the ear, or make them downright sore after a while, I haven't had that issue at all with these. The ear cups are a soft, plus leather, and the fit is spot on.I only get about 15-20 feet worth of range out of these wireless headphones before sound begins to drop out and get choppy. At most, the signal feeds through one wall. I'm not dinging them for that, because it could be a bluetooth transponder issue, or maybe just a problem with that technology to begin with. Either way, the signal is clear when I go from my living room to the kitchen and back, and that's all I'm looking for.Sound quality is fine. Other reviewers go into this area at great length and it's just as, if not more, subjective than style can be, so I'll leave that up to the individual buyer to investigate at length. In my experience, as an average consumer of media, these headphones sound just fine and I've got zero complaints in that department. They're as loud as I need them to be, and as clear as I could hope for.Battery life ain't so great. I don't know the actual span, but if I'm sitting at the computer watching a movie and playing some games, it FEELS like I get maybe 5, 6 hours tops out of them before they need a recharge. However, if I'm sitting at my desk any longer, not only would I go a little stir crazy first, but I could easily solve the problem by plugging them in and charging while listening wired. Not a big negative, but be aware that battery life isn't out of this world great, it's just adequate. It's fine.Last, and here is where it's a mixed bag, comes the construction. I have only ever worn these headphones around the house, and they go on a dedicated metal stand when not in use, so wear and tear is minimal, but I had an issue with durability within a month of buying them around August of 2015. The sound suddenly cut out one day, and for weeks afterward sounded muted and distant. Additionally, one ear was markedly worse than the other, though each clearly had a problem. For headphones at this price point, I wasn't exactly thrilled. HOWEVER, I live near an Apple store and, as always, their customer service was wonderful. They took the headphones, mailed them into their service center, and within three days I got a call saying the problem was found and couldn't be fixed, but that they'd be sending me a brand new pair, free of charge. Two days later, my new Beats came in, and in the 3+ months since, they've run beautifully. Tech gadgets fail, I'm used to it, so I judge manufacturers more on their response than on dinging them for putting out a bad egg or two from time to time. As long as I have no bad experiences with this new pair, I'll be very happy with my purchase. I'll come back to edit this if something changes
p1088
aVGreat quality beats headphones as is quite known. Very comfortable and easy to use. Slight problems I faced were, if you are playing a video stream on you laptop for example and you have connected your headphones via bluetooth, if there is a delay in the video and it stops and starts several times, the bluetooth connection with the headphones will be lost. Overall though, the bluetooth option gives you great freedom to walk around the room or the net room while listening to your music, movie or audiobook.
p1089
aVI give 3 stars only because of the pricing - if they were $100 they would be a 4 star item.  The sound quality is solid, meaning they sound good.  They aren't $1000 DJ/reference headphones so do not expect to get your socks knocked off, but do have a good bass response and are wireless.Some people say they have issues with bluetooth, others' say that they actually sound better in "wireless" mode.  I can honestly say that I don't really notice a difference, besides I feel like I hear a very quiet high kHZ distortion when they are silent and paired (could be my imagination but I have a pretty good ear).I do not know what qualified someone as an "audiophile" but I listen to music all day, worth with DAW's (Adobe Audition, Logic, etc.) and video production, so have quite a lot of experience with different sound gear and levels of quality of audio sources...Bottom line - if you're like me and just can't deal with another wire on your desk, and have the cash to spend, go for it, they sound pretty good.  If you wouldn't mind a wire and a price conscious buyer, look elsewhere for a wired pair for half the price that will sound just as good.
p1090
aVI wanted these because they are wireless and too large for me to lose. The only problem is that the headphones seem to disconnect from my phone often and I'm not sure why. Initially I thought they were dying but I have since learned how to check the headphone battery percentage on my phone and that is not the problem. Sometimes when I attempt to skip a track the headphones will actually turn off. Normally I can just turn them back on and keep going but I for the price of these headphones I have higher expectations. If I had paid $60 I would probably be more willing to let the disconnecting issue slide. I did purchase the warranty and will update the post once I have filed a claim with them.
p1091
aVReally nice headphones but they often disconnect from my phone after switching between YouTube and Spotify. They get really loud but lose quality towards higher volume. Durable and amazing battery life, just make sure you shut them off after use.
p1092
aVMy college age daughter wanted nice head phones for Christmas. I wanted to not buy Beats brand, because everyone has them. I bought five other high end types from Amazon and these Beats Studio wireless. It wasn't even close, the Beats were in a league of their own on comfort, and the sound was great.  The ability to eliminate outside noise was best with Beats.  They are also the smallest, lowest profile headphones as well.
p1093
aVGreat product a little bit tighter on my head then I would like but all in all works great noise cancelation it awesome. Im a nursing student so this is a life saver. It is probably most comfortable for people without a large head
p1094
aVThe noise canceling on these bad boys is amazing. was next to the engine on a 3 hour flight and couldn't hear it the entire way. If you are into laud music the bass is out of this world, like im bumping in my car. considering buying a second pair just for style. worth the buy.
p1095
aVI used to love these, but now I hate them.  The latest Apple iOS software update (9.2) causes these to continuously disconnect from my phone.  They are good for one, maybe two songs, and they drop.  They are useless.
p1096
aVI just exchanged my second pair of Beats. Same problem both times: the lining came apart from the foam. Infuriating. Especially in light of the fact that I did not travel with them, did not walk around with them, and only used them while sitting down and in conjunction with my desktop; not harshly treated at all. Another issue I had was that the mini-USB charging cable had to find an extremely small sweet spot in order to charge. I also did not like how they fit, though I suppose that's a subjective problem that not everyone will have. And finally, there is a ridiculously small number of features compared to other models. Look elsewhere, you can do much better.
p1097
aVThe package arrived earlier than expected, and I am content with that. When I unpacked this package the headphones was missing one of the three protective stickers which should have been on the audio input\u2014based on my previous beats headphone purchases. The only conclusion I may have is that these are used headphones, instead of new which is what I paid for. However, aside from this speculation, I am pleased with the eye-appealing device.
p1098
aVSo far so good, I love these and they are very good at blocking out surrounding sounds. I use these while cleaning the house and occasionally when getting ready to wind down and go to sleep. The sound is very impressive and the bass is quite powerful. At first I wasn't so sure because the music sounded very "drowned out" at first. I would recommend tinkering with your phone's equalizer and sound settings to get the sound you want, especially if you have an android like I do. I did and finally got it to the way that I want it to sound. The controls in the instructions say that the most features can be used with apple devices, but so far I've been able to use the same controls with my android  (skipping songs, backtracking and taking calls). The only complaint is have is when taking calls I have to have the phone up in front of me for the other person to hear me. This can be pretty annoying especially because I get quite a few calls and gave to run to my phone when using the wireless feature. The ear cups are good and I have not experienced any problems-yet. I hope I can be one of the lucky ones who don't have the faulty ear cup issue.I used to have the power beats 2 and hated them because they kept slipping off or pushing my glasses with the rubber earpieces and making them fall off my face. Obviously these have been great and I have had no issues there. If you are like me and wear glasses I know you can also relate to the dull soreness that some headphones give you when they push on your ears against the eyeglass earpieces for a period of time.So far, good purchase and worth the price!
p1099
aVNot happy with the quality of the product. When connected to the iPhone and checking a voicemail there is a delay and popping noises.  I returned it and the product did the same thing.  This was after updating the firmware on the products.  The headphones are very tight on my head.  I'm a small petite women.
p1100
aVDON'T BUY IT ! It will be very comfortable for few minutes(5-10 mins). After 5 to 10 minutes, your ears will start paining, the headset will slowly start compressing both the ears and you have to remove it to get rid of the pain. IT DOESN'T WORTH MONEY. My friend told me not to buy it, he told that you can't wear it while travelling, wearing it be will very uncomfortable after very few minutes, but I thought it will comfortable for me as I have smaller head than him. But, I regret after experiencing the real pain of wearing it.Also, never buy products from AMAZON, I guess they are big time scammers. They didn't credit my Amazon Credit Card reward points worth around $70, when I placed the order the invoice showed my Reward points in it and the Order went successful. But, the next day when I logged in to track the status, my Order was cancelled and there was a button to Retry. I clicked the retry button and then the Order was successful again, but this time invoice didn't show my reward points. I immediately called the customer care and the representative was talking nonsense and didn't understand my problem, I asked her to connect me with the Supervisor, the supervisor told me that the reward points will be Credited once the item is shipped. I believed the guy and thought the final invoice will show my reward points credited.But today, when I checked my Credit Card statement, I was SHOCKED. They charged me couple of times worth $102 for AmazonPrime membership, which I never subscribed. Also, they didn't credit my reward points and charged me the full amount of the product. I thought to return the product to get the full refund, but their return policies seems to be not customer friendly. I will call the customer care and see how I can return the product for the full refund.I don't know what prompted me to come to this STUPID website to purchase items, it's BIG NUISANCE, calling customer care multiple times and calling bank to dispute the charges etc. I should have walked in to some electronic store and purchased the item to have the peace of mind.Thanks, Lokesh.
p1101
aV12/30 day one lol came very well packaged and secured no damage in shippingBeen hearing about the box design and its very well made as well like ive read and heard update coming soon
p1102
aVThese are nice headphones and they work well and sound great. I do believe they are overpriced like so many other things these days. Nothing like paying extra for the name!
p1103
aVFor somewhere around $300 these are a really good option. Very solid sound, easy to connect to your devices, comfortable for at least a few hours, and great looking. I've only had them for a few weeks so I will update the review if anything changes but, so far, these have been great.
p1104
aVBought this for my son for his birthday AFTER Best Buy tried to sell it for $95.00 more!! I'm glad I did my research!!!  He love it!! The sound is AMAZING!!
p1105
aVI was skeptical about this purchase in from the jump. The price was almost $130 less than what apple and other retailers charge for these headphones. The reason, I believe, is that these are older stock. My reasoning is simple. When the headphones arrived, I had Bluetooth connectivity problems. The headphones wouldn't stay synced.I was completely oblivious to the fact that headphones could have their software updated. I downloaded the beats updater app from their website, and completed the software update to the headphones. It was surprisingly painless, and felt very apple like, and appropriately so.Now the reason I believe these are simply old stock/overstock... the updated software contained verbiage related all the way back to early versions of iOS 8. At the time of this review and purchase, the current iOS version was iOS 9.2. Clearly the reason for the connectivity issues was the needed update. It worked, and I am very pleased with these headphones.As far as sound quality, that's subjective. I do prefer these over the older beats models, as the sound is much more flat and not quite as bass heavy. Build quality seems to be good, and they have a metal band instead of the previous models plastic headband.
p1106
aVIF YOU HAVE AN IPHONE DO NOT BUY THIS, the Bluetooth technology on the iphone when paired with this causes disconnects when skipping songs. Apple brought Beats but the forgot to keep the bluetooth hardware technonlogy in sync. Works better with newer android device and doesn't dicconnect bluetooth.
p1107
aVGreat packaging. Sleek design. Good performance. Nice color scheme. Very soft ear piece. However, it may not last very long if you are not careful with them. I think they can easily rip/tear.. I like them, however I don't think it is worth the price. You are basically paying for the name and the looks. I would honestly choose something else. But these were a gift from my boyfriend.. I would never spend $300 on a pair of headphones. I did not really need these because I have the blue tooth jaybirds already which I would highly recommend over these. These have a good sound and good noise cancellation, but I'm not into the whole I need to be like the crowd and wear beats as a fashion statement... I just use these at home..
p1108
aVThese headphones were a Christmas gift for my girlfriend and it has not even Ben a week and they already broke. Other than that I got to try them and the sounds it's good really good base and really loud. Wen I was listening to music I couldn't even hear anything what everyone was saying with the music or no music so noise cancellation works well.
p1109
aVFirst headphones in 10 years! The sound these produce are awesome compared to other headphones and earbuds I've used in the past. Having no wires to get in the way is also a great feature. Especially when walking the dog.
p1110
aVI had gotten these headphones for Christmas and absolutely fell in love with them! But then my little cousin threw them to the floor and broke completely!!! The right headphone piece broke straight off!! Luckily, my sister bought me a new pair! I was happy and relived but still mad about the last pair. When I opened the box and started to hear them they were perfect then I put them away where my little cousin could not reach and then when I was about to use them again the plug in the headphones had sunken in!! I'm so mad! I had very high expectations on these headphones and they did not meet at all (besides the sound quality of coarse). These headphones are pure dissapointment. Oh and did I forget to mention that this was in under 2 DAYS?!
p1111
aVWill NOT connect via Bluetooth with iOS 9.2.  I realize that this is probably a software issue, however iTunes now owns beats hence the bad review.  This is unacceptable.  Better and more thorough OS testing should have been done prior to the release.
p1112
aVThe constant buzzing noise from the noise cancelling feature was absolutely terrible. Do yourself a favor and skip past these and but the Bose QC20 or QC25. Can't go wrong with either of those options. These are the coolest looking headphones I have ever had (matte black) and I happily returned them for the Bose option because of the overwhelming difference in sound quality.
p1113
aVSo much more comfortable than the beats solo2. My only issues/questions are: 1) headphones keep randomly disconnecting which the beats solo2 didn't do and 2) there's background noise (like white noise) which is really only noticeable when i'm not playing anything, but i don't think that should be happening?
p1114
aVThey're better than regular headphones but not that much better and, MOST DEFINITELY, not at all what they're made out to be.  Given the huge price, they do NOT deserve the reputation that they have (they just know whom to give free ones to and advertise for them).
p1115
aVWorth every penny. Great sound. I assume it's bias music wireless controls are due to Beats being owned by Apple. In other words, Andriod may face some loss in Beat's music controls opposed to Apple users.
p1116
aVThey look cool, the build quality is there, but overall they are pretty bad. Heavy on the bass and they disconnect quite often. Just sitting on the couch with them connected to my phone and they would randomly disconnect and I would have to pair it back up with my phone. Probably happened about 12 times within an hour.
p1117
aVThe only reason I still own these is because I was too lazy to return them. As wired headphones, they are passable as $100 headphones; in other words, they are completely over-rated. As wireless, they are total crap. They constantly drop the bluetooth, especially if you accidentally touch the forward or reverse function. Another example of a product hyped by a celebrity, that is all hype, no performance.
p1118
aVdo not buy this brand products! It is the third product that I have of this brand and all have some defect! bad product. bluetooth does not work. it stopped working a year and a month of buying it. the warranty is only for one year. the service costs $205. In addition, the sound quality is bad.
p1119
aVSound Quality is terrible compared to cheaper headphones, and mine had broke after only 2 days using buying this product. I was giving another chance for beats to redeem themselves. That was a mistake
p1120
aVThese headphones were the missing piece in my life. This will change your travel experience. I never knew that headphones could sound this good but its just incredible to see what technology has come to and these headphones can testify to that. I look forward  to traveling and using these headphones on a daily basis.
p1121
aV2 studio beats, $700 and 1 year later and im still without headphones. The speaker malfunctioned the first time, second time the fabric on the headphone is tearing apart. They are not built to last especially not for the gym
p1122
aVpurchase this product to replace my wirless solo 3yrs ago cause the fold arm was broken on one side...problem on this one is bluetooth connection will cut off everytime u switch from app to app on my iphone 6s....for exp i was listening to amazon music , want to swic=tch to i-tune music or you tube or movie app the headphone will not transfer and cut off....need to trun off and on both devices to connect them back and cut off again when switch...so i tested with my hubby's ip6 still the same ...bluetooth will only saty on "one" app use only......my 3yr old solo have no problem at all ...sounds crazy right...older tech had less issue ....now i hv to return this garbage and step back to think about to get another solo....newer generation ....i thought apple bought the beats shouldn't have those "new" problem..! now im stuck using my old solo wireless with a duct tape arround on one side of the headphone....i really laugh at myself now...and scare to buy any beats now....comon beats...or apple ...!
p1123
aVThe Beats Studio Wireless headphones are totally overrated.  I purchased the Sony MDR-ZX770BN headphones from Costco, and order the Beats Studio Wireless headphones from Amazon for side-by-side comparison.  I had no problem with paying more for better quality.  Needless to say, I kept the Sony because it is indeed the superior BT headphone.The build quality of the Sony and Beats is about the same. However,  the Sony MDR-ZX770BN is much better in terms of sound quality, weight, and fit.  In fact, my fiends that tried the two headphones side-by-side also ended up purchased the Sony headphone.
p1124
aVBest headphones I own . I have Sennheisser HD-650 wired and HD 280 Pro wired . I bought these for Bluetooth connection and let me tell you I'm impressed . Tried a couple Sony models took them back. True Bass, Treble, comfortable, built sturdy, easy user friendly controls  and quiet signal with effective noise reduction here sound better than Bose Bluetooth (cheap materials) headphones. Expensive but at 264.00 it's a great headphone for Bluetooth listening or wired. I pair with Apple TV gen 4 and IPhone 6 and they sound great . True bass not overdone . Buy em!
p1125
aVsuperior sound with a comfortable around the ear fit. crisp sound quality without the wires, love it. they do come the cords you can plug in to be able to use for a phone call if you want. I use mine all time when I want to get lost in the music
p1126
aVThe cushions squish down quickly so then the speakers hurt your ears after a couple weeks, and they're very brittle overall and won't last 6 months. Speakers sound great but the rest was poorly designed or manufactured.
p1127
aVHeadphone quality is of high importance to me. Why? Well, I am into music production and need to hear bass, treble, etc as clear as possible. Loud bass with optimal accuracy is what I needed -- Beats Studio Wireless was able to provide that for me.I did not know Bluetooth headphones existed until I saw these, quite honestly. And, let me tell you -- these babies last wirelessly a LONG time.Noteable likes:Dual-mode Adaptive Noise CancelingBluetooth (reaches pretty far)FoldableAttractive (walking around campus in style)Dislikes:Price - You do get what you pay for; A fantastic pair of headphones. However, my paycheck is greatly missed.
p1128
aVNoise cancellation doesn't work very well.  Outside noise isn't suppressed, it's modified to sound like you're in a jar.  These were too expensive for that feature to not properly work, will be returning them.
p1129
aVIt's easy to see why these are deeply discounted at Amazon. From my experience, they are still significantly overpriced. The one Pro is that sound is excellent. Other factors make this a non-starter. The headband is cleverly designed but has almost no padding so after just a few minutes it becomes uncomfortable unless one chooses to stick a kitchen sponge between one's head and the headband for comfort. Active Noise Reduction might as well not even be there. It just does not work. Bose has it all over these for noise reduction so if that is a big factor, look elsewhere. From my patio with music playing through these I could hear noise from two houses away. Where these really fall apart is on Bluetooth. I found when I changed tracks or playlists, I would hear a soft click and notice on my phone that the BT connection had been dropped. The only cure was to power cycle the headphones. If you skip around a lot, you will be power cycling a lot. On average, every third skip would shut down the headphones. To get the sound so right and everything else so wrong is a real mystery, but at this price, the shortcomings cannot be dismissed. I bought these from Apple and returned them and came to Amazon and bought a Sennheiser set for a lot less money and they do deliver on their promises.
p1130
aVA honest review,  I own a pair of wired head phones Schneider Hd 510 which sound amazing their discontinued now,.  payed for them $60 great deal. These Beats Wireless headphones sound like crap hooked up wireless with my computer or tv , lots of static ,.. the sound shhhe shhhe sound,... im sitting on the couch 8 feet from my computer or tv on the couch, normal setting right,. I listen alot of Trance melody and vocal trance music that has very low delicet sounds that the head phones DO NOT acknowledge that they even exist. I recently fell in love with some new songs that I discovered through spotify, and listed to them on my cell phone while at the gym, and started to notice that the song sound was way less beautiful y melodic ,.then when I listened with my wired pair,.. the song sounded way different and dull on the Beats pair.So I thought about whats going on and thought that maybe surtin songs sound better then others so i listened to RAP music and country music and they sounded normal coudnt notice a difference. SO, I think the sound that trance music is it has a huge range in frequency,.. the Beats headphones cant reproduce those sounds nor recognized them, though German made Schneider could have possibly a more larger frequency range,.. I checked on both headphones spec's and in fact the Schneider are more sensitive.So if you listen to Hip hop, rap, country ect youll see no diffrence between wired and wireless, though trance music youll be upset and wont enjoy the moment of trancing out.
p1131
aVTerrible product and apple warranty is a joke.  Normal use at work and I was placing them on my head when they cracked in under 3 months.  Material was faulty and without even looking at it they said it was my fault for over extending.  I placed them on my head only there was no over extensionHeadphones still work you figure they would just swap out the plastic, but they said no and it would cost $200 since its not covered under the warranty.  I buy most things Apple but after that customer 'support' I may not in the future
p1132
aVHoped to like these head phones but, in the end, I returned them.  Two major issues... First the sound is flat and really no better than any other ordinary headphones I've tried.  There isn't really any dimension to the sound.  I think you can get the same sound for under $100.00.  Secondly, for me, the head band is very tight.  I wear a 7 3/4 hat and the ear cup pressure is way too tight.  Would always begin to hurt after wearing for only 10 minutes. Check out lower cost headphones and I think you'll find equivalent sound and greater value.  Sorry to the folks at Beats...
p1133
aVIt's very convenient.. the noise cancellation is decent.  My only issue is wireless phone calls.. others hear an echo like voice, plus the bluetooth connections makes a "chew chew" sound frequently in the background.  I don't hear it during regular music play.  So, for phone call usage in wireless mode, I would give it a 2 star!
p1134
aVI love music, and great quality sound, after many pairs of headphones, these are easily the best, and worth the money. If you don't want to shell out the big bucks, check out Ausdoms
p1135
aVHeadphones are great. I had to send my first pair back because it wouldn't stay connected thats a bummer but I really like the headphones. Took them to the apple store before I sent them back, hopping that they would treat them like there other apple products but thats not the case. The treat them like any other 3rd party accessory although they do offer a repair option that they send the headphones to a place that fixes them. If it was any of their other products they would have reached in a drawer and pulled out a replacement pair.
p1136
aVThese are nice headphones, and I love the option to go wired or wireless.  However, they don't really fit "over ear" and the noise cancelling when not listening to anything does not work as well as the Bose headphones.
p1137
aVArrived super quick and I got them at a great price for my boyfriends birthday. I have the solo's and I thought these studios would be great for him. We are fans of Beats and I would recommend this product to a friend.
p1138
aVNot as good as the wired, bass is very distorted and loud, but sound ok at a low to medium level!  I would not recommend if you like your music at a high level!
p1139
aVI just got it like an hour ago. It looks amazing but the connection is horrible. The connection between my phone and the headphones cuts out every song. I have to turn the headphones off then back on to connect again, every single song. Wtf man I got the wireless to not have to deal with anything
p1140
aVI've been this product for about 20 days now and I must say though the sound and base levels are up to my exceptions. However these headphones are not meant for long hour usage and are very uncomfortable and heavy. You can feel the heat if you wear them for more than an hour or so. I've also tried the Bose SoundLink Around-Ear Wireless Headphones II compared to beats these headphones are way lighter and comfortable. The bose headphones has way more clarity but lags behind in the base department when compared with the beats.
p1141
aVI can't tell you how much I absolutely LOVE my Beats Studio Wireless. I can leave my iPod in my gym pouch and walk around everywhere without having to deal with the wire. It has a long reach with Bluetooth too.
p1142
aVThe ANC screws up. Too much noise from ANC itself. What's worse, the ANC doesn't cancel noise well. Especially if you compare it with a BOSE.And the foam of my one doesn't recover after a long time.It doesn't work with my computer using Bluetooth. (Which works with other Bluetooth headsets well)When using Bluetooth (with my phone), the sound quality is worse than a $50 headset (by wire)So I am going to return it.
p1143
aVSound is like a mixed bag..some songs sound great due to the bass and the rich sound but some sound horrible especially when the bass starts to vibrate as if it's torn. Looks great with better than average sound
p1144
aVAfter due diligence finally i ordered one of most costliest headphones. Beats packaging has a conspicuous Apple stamp. Once open they feel a bit heavy but sound wise i do not have much complaint. I first bought it from Fry's and salesman their said "Sir go for Bose, Beats it just overrated and over  priced". I can not comment on that but i tested Bose once as well somehow piece which was there on display was not good on Bose.Overall this is good, some things which i want beat to improve is- Weight- Bluetooth connectivity between multiple devicesOverall i am satisfied with the product so far. It's just 4 days old for me.
p1145
aVI just got it delivered yesterday, and chose metallic sky color. The sound quality is good, but the color of the headphones shown in Beats site is different, I chose metallic sky to have a techno look but I see bronze and burned look over the Headphone. Not satisfied with the purchase.If this is original piece, either color is defective or its cheating. Please have a look at both the pictures and decide yourself.Attached are the picture, I am thinking of returning.
p1146
aVThese things suck. Buy the Bose. Unless you just want to look cool, then buy these. Bluetooth disconnects randomly.  Speakers crack when bumping that Rap. The noise canceling barley works at best. Buy the Bose. Wish I did.
p1147
aVI love listen to music with BeatStudio Wireless. I can listen to music without cable a lot of time. This product is really crazy. If i were you i could buy this one. I have one\u2764\ufe0f\u2764\ufe0f\u2764\ufe0f
p1148
aVAfter just a few short weeks these beagn to fall apart. When we contacted Beats they informed us the serial number was no good. I think Amazon sold us FAKE Beats by DRE $299.99 for FAKES is a joke and now can't return.
p1149
aVLoved these when I first got them. Great sound, design and very comfortable. In less than six months both earpads are falling apart and very confusing as to which replacement earpads fit this model. Also, the volume of the left side was less than the right. I thought my hearing was going until I tried other earphones and they were all balanced. Of course, for the large amount of money paid for these, there should be no such issues. Wanna look fashionable and waste a lot of money? Then buy these.
p1150
aVThe reason for 3 stars is for these following reasons:1- They feels heavy2-They do not feel to confortable on my head neither over my ears3- The bluetooth functionality does not give you good sound quality (you may experience some distortion)4-The material feels breakable.What I love:1- The color2-They look
p1151
aVhad it for 3 days and so far, with a firmware upgrade, it is working fine. audio quality is pretty good but unfortunately, it isn't very comfortable. My ears start getting painful after 5mins... It is a tat disappointing as a result.
p1152
aVThe wireless Beats Studios are some of the best headphones I have bought and are overall a great buy. Having the beats now with a wireless feature is very handy and you never have to worry about losing the cord or getting it all tangled up in your headphones. The Bluetooth that links the phone and headphones, connects really easy and is never a hassle. The sound and bass that the headphones project are astounding. When you want to listen to your music in piece and quiet, and put the world on mute, the noise cancellation that the Beats have are amazing. If you want the headphones to cancel out more of the outside would, ANC mode increases the cancellation of the noise outside of the headphones and makes the daily commute quite. The headphones are really light and easy to carry around, and the durability of the Beats is stronger than ever.  The negatives of the Beats are really minimal. The price is kind of high for just a pair of headphones, but once you get the experience to use them, the price shouldn't be a problem. If you use the beats for quite a long time, you ears start to get a little irritated and you might just want to take them off because of it. The Beats website says that the headphones will last you up to 20 hours, but if you use them constantly and for long periods of time like me, it's feels like it last for about ten hours, but maybe that's because I get so into them!! But other than that, these headphones are hands down some of the best and are worth every penny!
p1153
aVI've owned these since July 2014. Don't trust any of the 5 star ratings.I bought these mainly for the wireless bluetooth and the name assuming the name would be higher quality than other brands. At $380 clams, these headphones should not be falling apart after 1 year, especially with how little I use them. The pleather is completely separated, not torn, effing separating. I am so annoyed that they are falling apart based on how little I use them; mostly road trips and airplanes. Also, the bass does not compare the the original beats that were made by monster. I get more bass out of apple earpods than these. Also the headphone wire is on an angle, so I have to use an extender to use it with my iphone case. Also, the cups don't cover my ears 100% which causes pressure on parts of my ears, almost like they designed them for children sized ears. Plus they're heavy as hell, horrible to wear longer than 4+ hours. I cannot recommend these headphones or the brand, I feel totally ripped off. But I do like the rechargeable battery via microusb, that is really convenient.
p1154
aVArrived with a ringing in the left speaker. After about a month this speaker began to completely go out. After two months the left speaker fell off of the headset. Since it was more than 30 days after the sale the seller wouldn't take them back. One of the worst purchases I've ever made on Amazon.
p1155
aVThese are the best headphones I have ever had the chance to experience. You dont wear them you experience them. I highly recommend these beats. They hold a long charge, block out tons of background noise and make everyday tasks more fun by putting a skip in your step.
p1156
aVThese are what everyone buys for a reason- They look great on and sound awesome and they are LOUD! Bose headphones are not loud enough at full volume where these I never turn all the way up. These seem to have toned down the bass from earlier versions I've had. I think they are just about perfect. They are also the only ones that work (other than the Studio wired version) where the noise cancelling and over the ear style eliminates wind noise while biking or doing anything where the wind is whipping past your ears and also goes loud enough to compensate for very loud environments. This new subdued matte black color is a much needed improvement. I took off a star for comfort- I cannot wear these as long as I can most of my other headphones. These squeeze your head and are not expandable with force as the padding will pop off and you'll likely damage the hinges. Also the ear cups are not deep enough and will put pressure on your ears. ...but for my intended purposes (windy sports and loud environments) they work amazing.
p1157
aVI was VERY torn between Beats and Bose before making this purchase. I bought the Beats, mostly because of the cyber Monday deal, and I am now returning them. I'm switching to Bose and here's why...These Beats have a terribly annoying hissing sound when there's no music or when the volume is low. Apparently, the white noise hissing sound is how it achieves its noise cancelling feature. I wouldn't mind if I only heard the hissing when silent, but if you play a Jack Johnson song on very low volume, you will hear the hissing loud and clear. It's awful. I tried my friend's Bose headphones and they have absolutely no hissing sound.If you can put up with the hissing sound, then these are great headphones. Otherwise, just go for the Bose
p1158
aVBest headphones I have ever owned also the most I every spent on em either. I usually use earbuds an have to deal with wires getting snag or them ripped out of my ear love the wireless. Very comfortable as well
p1159
aVComing from a Bose noise canceling headphone that sounded pretty good, this is a big step up. Sounds much better and the noise cancelling is pretty good, bluetooth works great, connectivity is super responsive. Overall great, i believe this is the best headphones on its class on the market today.
p1160
aVI bought them used and the headphones worked flawlessly for about a week then out of no where it snapped on one side I was upset. So I super glued it . I recommend u don't buy it used.
p1161
aVTried them all out at the store. Found the best deal on Amazon. The studio beats are far superior. Got them for my son for Christmas. Pretty awesome gift!! Happy I bought tem
p1162
aVGreat quality on audio. Range is correct on 30ft. Instructions though, not very user friendly. But overall great. Comes with hard storage case, instructions, sticker, charger cabel, audio, and call/talkback cable (make and receive calls).
p1163
aVlistening to my audiobooks is just like having my own reading actress/actor next to me, and all lectures are so real, makes me feel in the auditorium while the professor is giving the course. No more wasting time. Also helps me in developing my multitask skills. Thank you kindly
p1164
aVThe sound was great (this is coming from someone who only used apple ear buds, so keep that in mind) but they did not feel good to wear. My head isn't tiny and I also have bad sensory issues and couldn't wear them for long periods of time. The top of my head would start to hurt and so would my ears. I tried stretching them out, and that worked for awhile, but now one side doesn't produce sound. So if you have sensory issues, I would look for something else.
p1165
aVJust had a chance to compare these with two other expensive headphones, listening to well-recorded acoustic jazz music mostly. Gotta say, these Beats sound awful. Guess I'm a different customer than most writing 5-star Beats reviews here. Way too much low end, very imbalanced sound stage. Maybe there's something wrong with this pair?
p1166
aVFairly good sound (bass heavy as we all know Beats are). The noise cancellation(ANC)  is the best I have seen in wireless. To compare, I have the Denon AH-GC20 (great sound and comfort, terrible ANC). I also have a pair of wired OPPO's which are incredible sounding and the most comfortable headphones I have but they aren't wireless and lack ANC. By far the best noise cancellation are my QC20 headphones. They are simply incredible and I won't travel without them but they are wired. The one thing that made these a three star instead of a four star is the comfort. They hurt the top of my head. I really wish they were more comfortable and I would keep them. The bluetooth was ok unless I was talking on the phone with them. Then, for some reason, they had issues. Might be my phone so I wouldn't hold it against the Beats just yet.
p1167
aVPros:BeautifulBluetooth or wired connectionGreat sound quality (coming from a non-audiophile guy)Nice to wear outside in the winter monthsVery nice packagingCons:Uncomfortable after only short period of timeCan't use headphones in wired mode after battery is deadThese headphones are great! As always, Beats provide a beautiful product. Very stylish indeed. But that's only one aspect. The sound coming from these is simply pleasant. I did notice I don't need the volume as loud when listening to a movie or music. I think partially due to the noise cancelling feature and the fact it encapsulates the whole ear. Well that and I'm sure there's technical advances in the drivers.Another feature that I love is the Bluetooth. I don't always have it on. Mainly because it does run through the battery much faster. But it's nice to know its there when I'm out walking around or don't want to be tied down with a cord.Now a huge downside is the comfort of these headphones. I couldn't believe how tight these headphones are after weeks of use. I certainly thought they would loosen up after some use, but no they didn't. It's so bad, that I find myself almost tapping out in submission to the headaches they give me. Perhaps a break after a couple hours is needed. But I'd like to be the one to make that call. Not the pain of just simply wearing headphones.Overall, I do enjoy these headphones a lot. I only wish they were more comfortable when it comes to how tight they are. Otherwise the cushions feel very nice.
p1168
aVLooks absolutely magical.In terms of comfort, I'd say these can last around two hours before i need to give my ears a break. These newer generation beats also have less bass than the older gens. The "around the ear" cushion is also a bit smaller in terms of circumference as compared to the older gen beats.In terms of sound quality, these are definitely superior but, ill be honest, it wasn't anything spectacular. I can definitely study with these, blocks out some sound but I can still hear the muffle when people talk.Oh, and the wireless is a nice touch too if you're into Apple products.
p1169
aV-- Overall --As a pair of wired headphones, it is pretty good. As wireless/bluetooth headphones, it is mostly unusable. The noise cancellation is mediocre.-- Sound Quality --Rich, full and immersive. It is exactly what I expected. It is good. Nothing much more to write.-- Wireless Functions --The Bluetooth UI is terrible. There is really no other way to put it. I have been using it with my Nexus 5X and am disappointed. All functions are on one invisible button over the left earpiece, and is rather unusable. The design (from what I feel is a misplaced sense of minimalism) reduces the functions to single, double and triple clicks of the same button for different things. As one can imagine, reducing simple functions like skipping over a song into a difficult-to-master special-move combo out of a martial arts video game can be rather distressing. The teeth. They gnash. To top it all it randomly drops the bluetooth connection. Your phone suddenly bursting into song, in public places can be embarrassing.-- Noise Cancellation --I am not impressed. I generally use the noise cancellation function at work. I have been using plantronics and sennheiser headphones and have been very pleased with them. In comparison this one is rather bad. Hardly manages to kill the hums and drones in the workplace.
p1170
aVNot the greatest for a person seeking bass on the music. Packaging very presentable, the materials of the headphone quite descent. Audio: too many highs, mids, and a lack of low freqs. The headphones will do great for a person that listens to hip hop, pop,  or other music that doesn't include essential bass. Noise cancelling not the greatest.Great headphones for the looks; for a person who knows how real music needs to sound, the headphones aren't worth the outstanding price. Not a beats hater, purchased them, returned them the next day and still looking for that specific headphone that will exceed my expectations.
p1171
aVThese are over priced, poor sound and construction quality "headphones" by a marketing company that never intended to manufacture decent headphones in the first place.  If you want good headphones, go buy from companies that know what they are doing - AKG, BeyerDynamic, Grado etc.  Save yourself money and headache and buy quality headphones.
p1172
aVfirst i was in doubt,but when i received the item i was so very happy it works good,thank you hash tag now i can say that you can be trusted on your products, and to all amazon buyers i strongly recommend hash tag for your electronics needs.thanks again.......
p1173
aV--- Beats Studio Wireless Titanium Review ------ IMPORTANT ---Make sure to update the software on these when you get them. Plug them into your computer. the software is found on the Beats by Dre site (Google it). I also tweeted to Beats Support as they had to generate an Apple serial number for the device in order to add it into my "My Support Profile" page. This Apple serial number is only recognized by Apple and Beats support, so the serial on the device would still be needed for third party warranties. I hope this helps.They fit and sound great. However... and this is a big however. The matte finish on the pair I got was VERY splotchy. I hope the replacements are better. The noise cancellation is cool, don't expect it to block out voices. It will block out background noises well (air conditioner, etc.).[EDIT] I got the Titanium version and they are perfect. I love the fit and they sound great. For the price $130 off of this writing, you can't beat it (pun intended). IMO, stay away from the matte black.Changed stars from 4 to 5.
p1174
aVWas not hard to connect quite simple, as I read the box it said only IPhone I was about to cry LoL, It works on Android! It's comfy, rocking with style and sound very nice these are my first pair of beats, I got color Gold/Champagne. At the moment I am satisfied, hoping they will last. I have a Samsung gs6 edge plus.
p1175
aVgood sound from these headphones but are not very durable. As others have stated the ear cushions can start to peel off after a few month of use and I got about 6-7 hours of use before charging again.
p1176
aVGreat headphones, the ANR was a little funky at times but overall a quality headphone.  I ended up returning because they were too small for my head and ears which caused pain on long flights.  I bought these specifically for travel and to make my long trips more enjoyable which they did not. For light day to day use they were amazing and the bluetooth calling worked exceptionally well.
p1177
aVdeep bass. super rich, clean sound. better the than my Bose QC15. they fit really well and tight so they don't move around when moving around or working out. champion of headphones.
p1178
aVI own Bose, Samsung, Jam, JVC, Sony, and a bunch of cheap headphones.Yes these are expensive headphones but they are worth every penny.+ The sound quality is unmatched.+ The navigation is easy and responsive.+ The noise cancelling is super.+ The charge time was surprising. I thought it would take longer.+ The play time on mine is great.+ I wear them the better part of every day and they are extremely comfortable. I can walk around my house with these on and never have to worry about loosing connection.+ The ear cups are extremely comfortable but the seam in mine separated on one of the ear cups. The 1-year warranty covered the repair. You must have a receipt to prove the purchase date.FINALLY:  Keep the receipt for the 1-year warranty. If something does happen in that year, call the warranty number and a FedEx box will be sent to you to pack the headphones up and return them free of charge. Beats does stand behind their product which isn't always true with many products. The people at the center are so nice and helpful.
p1179
aVBeats are only there for branding that is it,the truth.If you want a better pair of headphones the audio technica Ath M50's And the sennheiser urbanites are the way to go.The build is ok but the sound quality is meh and doesnt even surpass sennheiser 30$ headphones
p1180
aVWould give a negative star if it was available. Great Sound - no debate on this. Extremely fragile - won't last a year. Then you're left with a very expensive pile of plastic junk. Avoid this testimony to poor durability and go with something else.
p1181
aVI think Beats started to cheap on their construction and quality. Makes sense with the price drop. I used some Beats studio wireless over a year ago and was impressed with the sound clarity and performance. I turned the music to the max and the headphones handled it with ease. These same headphones I just got are no where near what I experienced in the past. They started to crackle and rattle at about 75% volume. I thought maybe it was the connection so I tried plugging it in. Same results. I thought maybe it was the source so I tried different devices and different songs. Same result. I thought it must be a faulty pair of headphones so I exchanged them (which was a breeze, kudos to amazon I received new headphones in 1 day and it was Sunday) I was excited to get a new pair so quickly, not so fast... Same results. I am returning both pairs and will likely look into a pair of wireless Bose headphones as I know Bose has a great reputation for sound quality. After all isn't that important?
p1182
aVWell crafted, performs as advertised and fits comfortably.  Time testing will tell a better story as the previous Beats headphone I owned suffered mechanical breakdown and the ear cushions started splitting; assumed that my sweating may have caused some of the problem.  In any case I love the item, I would say it's about 25% over-priced.
p1183
aVAfter having these for a couple of months I must say that they are the best headphones I've ever owned.  I have the beats studio wired, awesome...amazing sound, feel great, but need to replace batteries and wired.  These headphones sound...can't even believe how great they sound.  And so comfortable.  No connection issues, battery lasts forever, isolates almost all noise...I love them.  I have the powerbeats2 for the gym because these are just too hot (I tried lol). But for walking, working around the house, just wantin to chill...these are the bomb.
p1184
aVPhenomenal piece of audio engineering and product design. This generation of Beats cements the products as not just a feature of ostentatious behavior, but a marker for those who truly love their sound. Sure, you might feel a bit guilty buying these...but it is so worth it! You hear the little nuances you have been missing out on for years -- this is an investment to rediscover the music you love so much!
p1185
aVBackground hiss is too noticeable for a product at this price point. I have the first generation Studio, so when I read comments in reviews about the noticeable hiss I was thinking it would be like the very slight hiss that is noticed in the first generation from the amplification + noise cancellation circuitry. Not so, unfortunately - it is quite a bit more noticeable. When switching back and forth between my old Studio and the 2.0, I couldn't even notice the first gen hiss in my kitchen (probably not a quiet enough environment), but I could totally notice the hiss in 2.0.In addition to the unacceptable hiss level, I can't approve of the direction that Beats has gone with the tone in the new generation. It's not just gen 1 but better / clearer / tighter / etc., and with wifi and recharge ability and better build - it's really a completely different sound. If you liked the first gen, don't expect this headphone to be first gen but better. They don't really compare from a sound point of view. You should approach these headphones from the perspective of buying a completely different pair of headphones - you can throw your experience from gen 1 out the window pretty much entirely. At that point, you may then just as well consider alternatives like the Sennheiser Momentums or other candidates in this price range. I find the sound of Studio 2.0 to be cramped, boxy, too mid-rangy, and at times unpleasantly shrill / ringing in the mid range. In comparison, while the first gen admittedly has some issues with muddiness or boominess in its bass, it still overall sounds more open and spread out than this 2.0, and easier to listen to for long stretches. I could tell immediately from listening to 2.0 that the sound would be fatiguing - even in short listening I was wincing at some piercing / ringing notes.The first gen Studio really opened my ears up to a whole new experience of music - classical, electronica, jazz, rock, you name it. With 2.0, I feel the Beats Studio is no longer worth considering as this product category of relatively affordable, semi-audiophile grade headphones has filled with better alternatives. They blew their chance, in my opinion.
p1186
aVI did some research on wireless headphones and CNET rates these as number one so I was definitely leaning towards these headphones. I went to Best Buy to try them out and saw these new JBL Everest Elite 700 wireless headphones for $299 that are exclusive to Best Buy and the JBL website. I decided to go with those because they have a ton of cool features including an app to adjust the amount of ambient noise the headphones allow in. They were built well and JBL is known for having top of the line products. I was hesitant because they didn't fit has well as the studio wireless and the look of the studios is better in my opinion. The frame of the JBLs sticks out too much making them very wide on your head. The studios fit great and still were very comfortable. I am not a sound hound so to me both headphones sounded great! The JBLs ANC worked while playing music and other things but the studios do not which I think is really weird. After using the JBLs for a day I realized that I just wanted a pair of nice headphones that sounded good, felt comfortable, and looked good on my head so I decided to take the JBLs back and get the beats studio wireless. I have not regretted this decision. Now I feel that the JBLs have a better build quality and way cool features that a lot of people will love! Since they are a new headphone though I don't feel they got the design right and maybe down the road they will but until then the Beats Studio Wireless are the best looking and best fit headphones that I have tried. I even owned the original studios when they first came out and these new design ones are a vast improvement. I did not give these headphones 5 stars because the noise cancelling feature is not as user friendly as others, my box did not come with a cleaning cloth like it was supposed to, and the case should have pockets or enough room for the extra cables and charger to fit.
p1187
aVExcellent overall. I bought this headphone to fill a specific need: I required an aesthetic, robust wireless noise cancelling gym headphone that packed some punch and had great sound quality. From all my searching I did NOT want to buy a Beats product, but through my search I could not find a product that met my specifications as well as this one. This is absolutely the perfect gym headphone! I can do muscle ups with no movement of the cans on my head, I can blast music at full volume without affecting anyone, I can go several days without charge, and not having to deal with wires is a gamechanger. 9/10
p1188
aVPretty good, but for the price i expected better sound quality.  A bit muddy at times but bass is present if that's what you're into.  With EQ tweaks it sounds better.  I think the wireless capabilities and styling are it's best feature.
p1189
aVPiece of s***. After 3 months, the folding hinges got loose. After 6 months, the ear pads fell apart. it is now 10 months later and the left speaker hinge has broken and they are totally irreparable. I am buying sennheiser. I have at least gotten several years worth of use out of them, and they are better quality.
p1190
aVSound quality is great, especially if you like some bass.  The finish is nice, and the white battery gauge LEDs look great with the color as well.  As others have mentioned, the ear pads feel cheap - cheaper than any other premium headphones I've owned (Bose, Nokia/Monster).  The noise cancellation has a bit of a hiss - especially when it's quiet.  Overall, it's a nice looking and sounding set of headphones, but it also gives me greater appreciation for the quality of noise cancellation of the Bose QC15s I have at work.
p1191
aVHi I got my headphone today. and I paid for 264 dollars to get the new one, but when I got it, there is no plastic film on the cover. and there is not any sticker on the bluethooth part of the headphone. I have seen alot unboxing videos, and they all do have plastic film on the cover and sticker on the headphone. whats more, It is not charging well. which mean is, it can't not be charged. The whole thing is like a used. but I thought I was buying a new one, and there are three cables in the box, one for charging, two for listening to the music and mic. but it didn't suit the picture on the box, it is like a charging cable puting in a music cable box. The whole thing is just like a used. How can that be possible? I ordered a new one and come to a used.  I already did the replacement, and hope that I won't get the used again...
p1192
aVI love these things.  It took my duecebag bag to another level.  The worst part about wearing them in the gym is I can hear people talk about how sweet they are.
p1193
aVGreat headphones for the gym but not that great for phone calls.  Call quality seems worse than when I just use my corded iPhone cords plus it's a bit confusing to answer calls with.  Overall I'm happy with the purchase because they are great for the gym or working around the house but was hoping they'd be better for making/receiving calls.
p1194
aVTerrible. They do not work wireless.  Waste of money.  Scam!!!  Paid for wireless and did not get that!!  These were even rated five star and guaranteed 99%.
p1195
aVThese headphones are so great! I love that I can wear them without the cord and move about my business without any issues. The only drawback I would say they have is that sometimes connecting to my MacBook or iPad is quite difficult, it takes a couple of tries before they can connect and work but other than that I  have no complaints!
p1196
aVI see a lot of long reviews here with all kinds of good information to help someone pick what they want.  I'll keep it simple.  I've got the Bose QC 25's and I've got these BEATS studio wireless.  The best sound, noise cancellation or not, is the BEATS.  Period.  In an airplane or loud places maybe the Bose are better....  But straight up sitting in your apartment just chilling trying to block the world out and chill to whatever it is you listen to....  Hip hop, country, jazz, soul....  For a guy like me primarily Trance.....  The BEATS beat the Bose QC 25's.  Sorry Bose, both are amazing headphones but it's not just the advertising being so highly budgeted for BEATS.  They just sound better.  I have to charge my Apple Watch nearly every day too....  Ain't no thing.
p1197
aVGreat headphones. Handle bass very well and are loud. Very sturdily. My only complaint is that I can't get 30 ft range at all. More like 10ft for me lol so that is annoying but other than that hey are fine.
p1198
aVI cant belive I spent 400 dollars on this 6 months later one side  of the headphone is not working and also  the  leather  holding  the right side speaker peeled  off  like are you serious  the quality  on these suckkkk  don't get it im telling you spend your money on something  that will last you longer specially  300 dollars these days are very hard to get
p1199
aVAfter my Bose QC2's finally gave up the goose, I decided to look for some modern cans. These Beats fit the bill in terms of style and sound, but the comfort was lacking.  I could only where them for 10 minutes before I got a headache. I would say that my head is probably above average in size but these phones were pretty uncomfortable after little time. Also, the white noise from the noise canceling feature is a little distracting and quite noticeable between tracks.This was my first Amazon return and it was simply amazing!  Super easy electronic process and no issues with returned funds.
p1200
aVSo first off one star deducted for price. $300 is just too expensive. YES, they are good headphones, but not worth that hefty price tag. I do like how it has a snug comfortable fit on my ears and cancels any noise when you have it on. The sound quality is very good and crisp and clear. This is my go to on planes and when I just wanna block out relax and listen to music. I'll admit I don't use it as much as I thought I would as I only travel every so often and it is quite big for just walking around and even going to the gym. I try to utilize it as much as I can, but I think it's bulky for everyday use. That is my opinion.
p1201
aVMy Beats were purchased as a gift through Amazon.  I recently had surgery and didn't wear them for 4 weeks.  When I took them out of the case, plugged them in only to find that they no longer charge.  I have owned these right at 2 months used them for 4 weeks or so.  Almost 300.00 earphones that last 8 weeks, hardly seems right.  Boooooo!!!When they did work I loved them, now to go through the warranty dept, should be fun\U0001f44e\U0001f3fb
p1202
aVListening to just a few wireless headphones in the stores but reading about dozens lead me to the ultimate question in the universe: What are the best headphones for my needs?  In a short answer the definitive conclusion was the Beats Studio Wireless Over-Ear Headphones. In a long answer the overwhelming conclusion was based on several things. One of which was sound. The reviews were in and the actual listening concluded these are best of the best including the lows, the highs, and the midrange without effort or struggle or false harmonics that some have suggested. I didn't see any high-end headphones where I was going so I took what was available to the masses in regular electronic stores.I've played a variety of music which includes instrumental, dance, jazz, hip-hop, soul (listening to Joss Stone made my ears melt [in a good way]) and a slew of vocal jazz.  Most of the music was 192k up to ~900k Apple m4a lossless and the subtleties are profound! No need to turn these bad boys up very loud because of the noise cancellation which I found pretty good in a very low decibel space. Once I try these out in a noisy environment I am sure the subtleties will change and I will be forced to either turn them up or just deal with it.Besides the quality packaging (better than Apple I'd say hands down), the quality of the hardware are sturdy and durable compared to a pair of HD280 Sennheiser wired headphones just gathering dust now.  Bluetooth capability (Link Quality) to the mac and iphone and ipad are steady at 3.0 (Transmit Power) and 0.00 errors (Retransmission) per Bluetooth Explorer (from the Apple Development downloads - IO Hardware Tools). The controls and functionality of what is available works cleanly with sustenance and quality. These will last a long long time.  I am one happy camper!  And now on to the movies!Updated: 11/22/15: Listening to a few movie and tv shows were pleasant to the ear for many reasons. The clarity of the words were clear and noticeably without harshness or unnatural voice harmonics. Midrange and lows were tight and with no muddiness or harsh booming fluttering sounds indicative of over zealous or under powered speakers. From earlier stated there is no need to crank up the volume to gain anything perhaps on the fringe of voice or sound. Everything is present and clean. The lows never rattled or disbursed fluttering effects which is a new level for Beats from what I gather on earlier first gen headphones. And listening to much more Rap (lots of Eminem) and Hip-Hop was very clean and very studio like allowing me to focus on the lyrics and tonality of the rhythm.
p1203
aVAfter a few weeks of use, I am incredibly impressed with these headphones. I've had two pairs of Beats in the past, both of which I returned due to the poor sound quality. The balance, clarity and mix in these headphones really is fantastic - gone are the bass-heavy days of old, with much clearer highs and mids. The only slight disappointment (and the reason for 4 stars rather than 5) is the noise-cancelling - if that's what you are after, I would stick with Bose.
p1204
aVI bought mine from apple store on January. and after 10 month the seam of the leather got open. I was surprised it is glued instead of stitched. the leather is low quality and it gets open because it is glued. apple store said they will fix it but not replacing it. and they said after one year warranty is over I will have to pay $199 for any repair. It is very costly product and broke so fast. I used it only on my desk at work not even gym or workout. The design is really cool and the sound is great. But now I'm worried if the seam gets broken again I will have to throw it away because I will not pay $199 to fix it. I hope Beats will start to stitch the leather components and use better quality leather material.
p1205
aVBought after reading multiple reviews. I expected base centric sound, I did not expect the discomfort of smallish round ear cups that either need to sit on the outside of my ear, where they hurt but don't push in on the ear canal opening, or over the back of the ear where they do push in, affecting the sound quality reaching my eardrum. Additionally, the range of the Bluetooth is more limited than other brands - it starts cutting out at 25 feet of unobstructed distance from the source, be it an iPhone, smart TV or receiver. Back to AKG or Bose for wireless.
p1206
aVThe sound is good. The Bluetooth functionality is terrible. I expected so much more out a nearly $300 pair of headphones. I have had this product for less then a month and I can't count how many times I have had to reconnect these headphones to all of my devices. I tried only using it for my computer and still have to reconnect it all the time. Maybe I got an unlucky pair that doesn't work the way it should, or maybe Beats skimped on the wireless functionality, which is the ONLY reason I bought these in the first place. I'd buy a different pair if I had to do it again.
p1207
aVGreat sound but they constantly disconnect. Even if I move my head, the sound sometimes cuts out. Forget about the 30-foot guarantee! I can't even stand up without being disconnected. And it's something a full charge doesn't fix. For $280 I would hope for a pair of earphones that blow my mind, and not disconnect whenever I turn my head to take a sip of soda.Saying all this, the sound quality is 7/10. I've heard better but these are still pro and give rich, deep bass.The noise-cancellation function isn't all that great and it's what is being sold here for so much. I'd give that feature 5.5/10.The wireless capability is an absolute fail. 4/10.I would still recommend these to a friend. After they've fixed the wireless disconnecting error.
p1208
aVThese feel comfortable around my head, no headache. I primarily wear these when I work out and have had no issue with them. People gripe about the price, but nobody is forcing you to buy them. Great price on Amazon and a great product
p1209
aVI almost had to get  anew ipod, because it kept locking up on me.  But ever since I spent the $$ to buy a wireless like this, problem solved!  Makes no sense, but not only is my ipod fixed, I don't have to worry about wires and sweaty stinky arm bands!  GREAT INVESTMENT!
p1210
aVExcellent sound. Heavy on the bass, but still clear on the high end. Not muddy at all. As a recording studio owner I'm a critical listener and enjoy listening to music at home on these. The added feature of noise cancellation is an excellent bonus. Only negative I've experienced is that it's sometimes difficult to pair with my devices.
p1211
aVThe materials felt cheap, with many of the edges not lining up perfectly. Also, the sound compared to my old Bose SoundTrue was nowhere near as good. Love how they look from afar but once I received them in hand I was severely disappointed. Returned.
p1212
aVDo not buy if you want the bluetooth to work. Brand new out of the box, the sound in one ear using bluetooth is completely muffled and distorted. I thought maybe it was the song or something until I plugged them into my laptop and the sound was balanced in both ears (and i did a quick google search to find that many people have experienced the same issue. So i thought, maybe it is my computer's bluetooth. but I connected the headphones to my iPhone through bluetooth and the sound was again muffled in the right ear. I would STRONGLY suggest spending your $300 elsewhere. I specifically sent my working "non-wireless" beats back because I figured it would be worth the  extra money to have the wireless feature. terrible idea. now I have to adjust the sound when they are connected through bluetooth and again if I want to use them plugged in normally.
p1213
aVTHE WORST HEADPHONES EVER!!!After 4 pairs (yes FOUR!!) we are giving up on purchasing these headphones EVER AGAIN!!  Each of them have broken in exactly the same place because they are so cheaply made.  Trying to get them repaired is an exercise in frustration and a true test of anyone's patience.  Whatever retailer you purchase them from even if you purchased an extended warranty, will send you to the manufacturer for repair who will charge you $199 to repair them.Can't say we didn't give them a fair shot!
p1214
aVLove my beats.  Great sound with the flexibility of wireless.  You will need to read the other reviews for the technical specs.  I don't have the best hearing, so can't grade the highs and lows, bass etc.  I primarily use mine for watching shows and movies on my iPad.
p1215
aVGreat sounding headphones pretty decent bass expecially when you listen to bass boosted songs. The only bad part is even if you use the cord to connect it to your phone you have to charge it when it dies :/
p1216
aVThis was my first Beats, felt in love for them!Great sound, good battery quality, Wireless....I would buy them again!Only thing I don't like is that it use the battery even if you use the cable (probably for the noise reduction effect) but it's probably supposed to be like that (but if the battery die you can't use them untill you'll recharge them...).
p1217
aVThe sound of these headphones is great.  The issue with these is the leather covering the ear foam.  I have had these just under a year and have had them returned 3 times due to the seam on the ear pad pulls apart exposing the foam.  I finally returned these in exchange for a refund.  The product is defective on the ear cups.  I don't know if Beats has addressed the issue with the adhesive on the seams of the ear pads.  Buy at your own risk.
p1218
aVI bought my online and love them. The sound quality is amazing. I see some reviews about durability I wear my almost everyday to and from work for just about 7 months I've seen no signs of damage. I take care of them and put them where they can't be bothered while at work. The only problem I have with them is the microphone is very, very, very sensitive at times I switch to handheld. But other than that worth every penny. They connect to my Note 3 and now Note 5.....
p1219
aVI bought these headphones for the bass (I'm all about that bass, bout that bass jk I hate that song) and it definitely delivers.  Two big problems in my opinion: 1. Ear cups aren't deep enough, so your ears touch the hard plastic under all the pads; sometimes really uncomfortable.  2. Blue tooth occasionally disconnects from my mac book pro; I don't know which side is causing the problem, but they're both expensive as hell, so this shouldn't be happening lol.Good sound quality. Less than ok build quality.  I still look cool with the beats branding though, right? lol
p1220
aVGreat while they lasted.My headphones are only 2 months old and I just noticed that the left ear is already sounding a little muted compared to the right.  There is also a weird popping sound coming from the left every time I turn off and on the device.  Not sure if I will buy another.  They were good while they lasted.  They just didn't last very long.
p1221
aVAwesome headphones. ANC so you don't get a disturbance from your environment. The gold and white color or champagne and white is awesome looking, and looks great with my beats 27 inch touch screen computer. They sit on the hanger next to the monitor that comes built into the monitor. But in all honesty I know there are better headphones out there on the market for cheaper that would weigh out to Dr Dre Beats. But I mostly bought them so they would match with my computer. Now I have the set. Beautiful look seems to be made of good quality products. As long as you're careful with them and take care of them like a two hundred and $99 set of headphones should be, then they will be just fine I assume. Will be doing a product review in a year to tell how they wear over time.
p1222
aVPurchased in June of 2014, My Husband stated using them in November 14. With occasional use, they died on him a few weeks ago. No power, not even with the cables attached. Not worth paying $379 (lasts years price), nor the current price,  if it's gonna die on you in less than a year. Sound quality is very good but that's it. Apple care will offer a free replacement within a year of purchase and a 100 dollar discount off the current retail price (basically $199). Hope this helps someone.
p1223
aVAfter a long debating and has tried many difference BT headphones i gave a Beats another try on their new Studio Wireless Model.The sound quality is really bad and not accurate, the sound is more like a humble heavy bass but very lack of balance mid and high tone.Compare with my Sony MDR-ZX770BN, the Sony sounds way better and true balance on every aspects and features for half of the Beats price.After 2 days testing, the sound quality really bother your ears and become headache.The bluetooth connection is drop sync with my Iphone 6.The headphone will return and totally not worth the money. It is more for fashion type headphone but very poor quality sound.Quake up Beats. This headphone are way too over-rated. You pay for $300+ for the heaphones equal the value of $100 tag.
p1224
aVAs a woman I really wanted the smaller ON-Ear ones, but my fiance talked me into getting these. Boy, am I happy I did!! I can absolutely see how the on-ear would hurt, and for women who wear earrings it would just push them into your neck. The sound is amazing. I bought these because we are on a plane at least once a month it seems like, and these cancel the noise wonderfully. It allows you to hear what you want to hear.. and nothing else. Definitely recommend the,!
p1225
aVI love this item but it appears Amazon doesn't sell more of the USB charging cables. The ones listed I don't believe are the real deal based on price compared to Apple and based on reviews. Come on... Pick it up Amazon...
p1226
aVI'll admit, I bought these from another retailer (Best Buy).  Still, I felt compelled to review these headphones and get the word out.  I bought them from Best buy because I knew that I wanted to try them on first before spending that kind of money; and I wanted them in a color that Amazon didn't have in Prime.  Once they met my ears, I was hooked!The beauty of these is in the noise cancelling.  They can get quite loud if you need them to, but often times, I find myself not needing to "crank" them due to the noise canceling.  Perhaps this is how they deliver such clean, crisp, accurate sound?The only slight drawback is that they are a little bit difficult to pair with a windows computer.  An "audio cable" is included for those kind of situations but, these are supposed to be wireless headphones.  Who wants to use a cord?A month later.....  I would still buy these headphones.Further note, I even use these in the car.  I have the Studio Wireless, my partner has the Solo Wireless, and we gave our old wired headphones to the kids.  The price of these new headphones and a couple creative mounts = individual audio / video in the car (using our i devices) that would take THOUSANDS to build into the car.  These are a must have for varying tastes and age ranges in shared spaces.
p1227
aVThe headphones are comfortable and I enjoy the bass but I am quite tired of my music being interrupted by disconnection. I'm considering a return. I'm able to play a minute or two of a song before it disconnects from the bluetooth and I have to reconnect them. Boooo
p1228
aVLoud background noise like a washing machine on the spin cycle, even in wired mode.  Sometimes when in wireless mode, audio output has lag from video image on TV, despite being only 10 feet from bluetooth transmitter. My old Bose headphones (wired) have no sound distortions when connected to the same setup. Returned item after several days.
p1229
aVI finally got my hands on the Beats Studio wireless headphones, but i was severely disappointed by the quality put out by Beats. First and foremost, the sound quality was nothing like the reviews stated. As a sound enthusiast, the quality was diminishing as it served to be just average in regards to the high and low notes. Although mid-rang was decent, the sound quality overall was underwhelming. Beats continues to scam people with these ridiculous prices but fails to back them up with good quality sound, Second, when i opened this in the mail, the cushioning on the headset was falling apart, i dont know if this was just mine but it still proved to be a pain trying to stick it back together. I am thoroughly disappointed in packaging and care that beats gave when sending my headset out. Finally, this headset gives a lot of leakage in sound, when out in public these headphones are of no use, because it is as if you are playing sound from portable speakers. Overall, i would recommend not purchasing these headphones. Save your money, and go buy from another brand.
p1230
aVI wasn't overly impressed with the quality of speakers for the price these headphones are being sold at. Also i didn't like that the headphones completely covered my ears it made me feel a little claustrophobic when using. These headphones are hot when you go outside on a warm day or if you so happen to be in a warm environment. The wireless option was the only nice thing that i liked about these headphones. I decided to stick with my other Beats (Powerbeats) bc they just seemed like an easier option.
p1231
aVI got the studio wireless in matte black. The headphone sure looks classy. Sometimes the price drops 100 bucks below the list price and again go back up, I was lucky to get hold one of those windows. The sound is awesome, I am listening to all my favorite songs with this one and they seems as new. There are lots of music which I was missing earlier which I am able to enjoy now. The balance between bass and treble is perfect. None of them is too much. It also has adaptive noise cancellation (ANC) in wireless which is a major win over other competitor products.There are a few reasons though for which I am not giving 5 stars:-1. Comfortability - I expect it to be more comfortable with the price I am paying. After longer duration I feel some heat around my ear and sweat accumulate around the ear cushions and sometimes the headphone switches off automatically when I do workouts wearing it.2. Battery life - Though in the description it is giving 8 hours listening time but if I turn on the ANC it hardly last 4 to 5 hrs. But it has a quick charge up time. In this price range the battery expectation was a bit more.
p1232
aVThese are amazing. Not like any other headset I've tries! Be ware that there's a volume button on the side of the headset. It took me a good while to find out this and it makes a HUGE difference in the sound experience. Props to this seller for delivering this product as presented. Trustworthy.
p1233
aVThis product is not for audiophiles.Now that that point has already been laid out, I will recommend this pair of headphones to people who are looking for:1. Bluetooth/wireless2. Noise cancelling3. Comfort4. StyleThis may not be the best product for each of these categories, but its the only one that seems to offer a good combination of these 4.Connectivity is not as superb as other headsets, but if you're just planning to connect this with your phone which would always be at your side, then there should be no issues.I use this on plane rides often and the noise cancellation works well enough to silence the occasional noisy child in-flight.If you listento music mainly through the popular streaming services, don't really see any issues with the sound quality. Heavy on the bass, so it may turn off some people.One gripe I would have is the durability of these things. A year into my first pair, some internal cable probably snapped and the bluetooth connection kept dropping whenever the headset gets moved slightly. My fault though as I haven't really been the most careful owner, sometimes just throuwing them into my bag without putting it inside the case and all.
p1234
aV1) Beats wireless headphones sound worse with bass sounds. Monaural sound which is not noticeable on wired Beats headphones.2) Ussr cannot walk around the city with them with streaming audio or the audio will stop for a few seconds before resuming. Once paired the bluetooth connected headphones can lose their connection to your iPhone. The sound is too intermittent.
p1235
aVThese headphones sound, feel, and look great! I used to have a pair of Bose QuietComfort 15s that I loved, but I love these even more. I'm not an audiophile, but I think the sound is equally good \u2014 rich, warm, and appropriately bass-y. More importantly, these headphones are wireless (if you want them to be), and they are rechargeable, while the Bose went through AAA batteries like fiends. I highly recommend these!
p1236
aVPositives+ Snug Fit+ Good Frequency Range+ Compact storage with the ability to fold+ They look goodMiddle of the road+- Wireless, no cables but does require charging+- Noise cancellation, it reduces the outside noise, but hurts music quality by pumping out a frequency+- Rubber skin contact, most headphones use this but there are some with more comfortable cloth optionsNegatives- Sound quality, the bass was overbearing, muddy and sound clarity was horridAll of the convenience features were great, the headphones are easy to store, comfortable and there are no cables to get in your way while working.  But the good stops there, to me the most important aspect is sound quality, and the Beats Studio Wireless do not deliver.  I tested the headphones on all kinds of music; hip hop, EDM, rock, classical, good dynamic mixes, poor flat mixes.  I was appalled at how horrible these headphones sounded, especially for the price.  They do have a good frequency range, you may hear bass frequencies you've never heard before and be impressed.  But don't let the frequency range fool you, the problem is with clarity.  A few times I had to take the headphones off for making parts of songs unlistenable.If you want headphones that are convenient and don't care about sound quality, get these.If sound quality is important to you, look elsewhere.  I recommend the Beyerdynamic DT 770 PROs.  (they have the same amount of noise cancellation but don't transmit a frequency to your ear, therefore retaining sound clarity)
p1237
aVWow. It took me a year to find the perfect wireless/Bluetooth headphones and should have bought these in the very beginning.I always snubbed my nose at the Beats by Dre brand and went with other headphone brands in the same price range. I thought the Beats were just gimmicky headphone products marketed towards the urban/hip-hop community (although I listen to hip-hop). And I always said you\u2019d never see me wearing \u201cthose beats\u201d headphones LOLThe issues I had with other wireless headphones was a mix of things. For me, size, build quality, controls, comfort, and last but definitely not least sound quality must all be excellent. Pretty much all of the other wireless headphones I tried didn\u2019t have much bass, and/or they were too big, or lacked easy controls.I looked at the Samsung Level Over wireless headphones, a couple of different JBL\u2019s, and they hardly had any bass at all, and two other brands I can\u2019t remember. I then tried several in-ear bluetooth earpods including Plantronics, Bose and JBL. All had terrible volume, bass or overall sound quality IMO.I even tried the SMS by 50 headphones (the ones with that small adapter), which actually sounded decent but was way too big for me to wear frequently in the gym. I also tried the SMS Audio sport headphones, and the volume at its highest setting (both on the headphones AND the phone) was way too low, and overall sound quality was very disappointing.I ended up going back to wired headphones for a few more months, but got so fed up dealing with the cord when I work out, so I finally gave in and purchased these Beats by Dre Studio wireless.For Bluetooth, the sound quality to me is by far the best compared to all of the other wireless headphones I\u2019ve tried. I was actually really surprised that even the volume could even be turned up higher than my WIRED headphones! I\u2019m no audio expert, but for me music is more clear, and it just sounds more \u201ccrisp\u201d overall. And the bass is right where I need it when I\u2019m hitting those power lifts LOL. Overall, the sound quality is right on par with my wired sport headphones, if not a tad better. ESPECIALLY for Bluetooth.The beats were also surprisingly comfortable. The over-ear pads were probably the most comfortable out of all of the other headphones I\u2019ve tried, and I like not having to stick earpods into my ears anymore.Oh and as far as looks, I like the all-matt black version of these headphones that don\u2019t have the big red \u201cb\u201d LOL (I **hate** headphones that have huge visible logos on them. I like things understated).My perfect type of headphone overall.  Sorry Dre, I should have listen to you Lol
p1238
aVI have owned these headphones for a little over a month. Overall, I am really pleased with them. Before I proceed with actual features, I must say that the packaging is nice. Presentation/branding say a lot about a company, though the product can still suck! I even keep the box.The headphones have a great look.  They appear to be well constructed. When I first put them on, they were really tight around my head. Even after six weeks later with moderate usage, they still fell a bit snug. So far, this does not bother me, but it may for some.The pairing with my mp3 player and computer was simple, so no problems there. The sound of the music from the headphones is great for my liking. As others have commented, the sound is bass heavy. If you do not prefer a lot of bass in your music, then these may not be the one for you. The sound of the music is crisp and clear. I was hearing stuff that I did not know exist in songs.The headphones feature noise canceling aspects as well. This feature is okay. You will probably read a lot of reviewer who compare these to the noise-canceling headphones by Bose. I did try those on in the store and I would agree that the feature on the Bose\u2019s headphones did a better job with noise canceling. Now, there is a feature where you can use the noise-canceling aspect only. The Beats try to have that balance between music and the outside environment. I hear very little outside in my environment when the music is playing and a bit turned up. Nevertheless, the noise canceling features is fair and it should be good in most environments. This beats are a bit weighted as compared to the Bose.Another aspect to note is the time you have before you have to recharge. I would agree with the up to 12 hours of wireless usage that are advertised. I can get over 10 hours of usage. You have the option to connect with a cord for longer usage but once they are dead, you will have to recharge them.The aspect that I am worried about is the plastic coming off inside the ear cups. I have seems pictures of this from others and it is not appealing. So, durability is a major concerned ; I will monitor this through time. The headphones are not waterproof, so I am not sure if sweat or other wetness plays a role in this malfunction.So, with me being a month in, I am pleased. I would hope that one year later, I will still be able to say the same thing. These headphones are not cheap and are high end in quality (hopefully) and sound (if you like or can tolerate bass).  I use my headphones about three times a week for gym workout and when on travel, which is not too often. I try to keep them dry and in the harden case that you can place them in.With one month of usage, I would recommend these headphones if you can afford them, adjust to the snug fit, can tolerate the heavy bass in music, and need/desire a moderate noise canceling set. Let us see if my review changes in the coming months.
p1239
aVFor the better part of the last 3 years I've been through about 4 different headphones as I've been longing for 1 pair of just great headphones.  I started with a pair samsung ear buds that shipped with my Galaxy.  Clearly, I needed something better and so after some research I bought a pair of Audio Technica's ATH-50S that have the straight cable.  I ABSOLUTELY LOVED them minus the fact that they came with a non-removable 11' straight cable.  So after using them for about 6 months I begrudgingly sold them for a pair of Audio Technica sport earbuds.  Again, I fell in love.  After using them for about 6 months I realized that ear buds after long use became extremely uncomfortable.  I needed to go back to over the ear.  After a recent trip to Vegas where I got extremely lucky at the roulette table I bought a pair of these Beats Studio at the airport Kiosk.  I'm currently in love and happy again.  These are comfortable, the sound is extremely well balanced and the highs and lows hit as expected.  The build quality feels pretty premium to me.  The one knock that I have is that if the rechargeable battery were to ever permanently die then these headphones are useless.  The reason for that is due to the noise cancellation which require power.  Beats, due to value on aesthetics opted to forgo the battery pack which is usually attached to a wire and went with an internal rechargeable battery.  Barring that, the set is near perfect for me.
p1240
aVThese headphones are awesome.  They are not perfect but they are awesome.When I compare my new Beats Studio Wireless with my Sennheiser HD-650, the Beats are slightly bass heavy, but the bass is tight and the range and clarity is very good even at high volume.  It has a tight, punchy and clean club sound that I like.  I also get that sound using Paradigm Studio speakers with a Velodyne DD sub.  I like the Beats Studio Wireless a lot.
p1241
aVBought both the Sony MDRXB950BT and the Samsung Level Over with this guy, I was in the quest for the best "wireless" headphones and ended up keeping the Beats Studio Wireless as the sound is much louder than the other two plus if you want more bass, this is better.I've also found a tweak to bring out super bass by turning up bass and turning down treble all the way using my phone's equalizer, then turn on the volume to the max and you get this awesome, club-like super bass.  This would not be possible if the volume on these headphones didn't get loud as it is.Sound quality is actually pretty good so long as you are listening to high quality MP3 files, Pandora on high quality setting is also okay.Just make sure to tweak your sound using equalizer on your phone.  If you have rooted Android, you can use Viper4Android.  Once you tweak the sound, you can really turn these into super bass headphones.Just awesome product, the loudest wireless headphones out of all the ones I've tried plus the most bass.  If you are a bass head like myself, this is the best.
p1242
aVI'm currently using this headphones right now as week speak on my imac computer. This headsets live on my head. I take them everywhere I go. Sounds very good and I uses it for my Samsung Galaxy phone, Synthesizer Piano Keyboard, and sometimes while gaming. These are by far the best headsets a man can ever buy. The bass on this product sound premium and the music I listen to as a music when I'm learning songs is crystal clear without a strain also with the help of noise canceling. I would recommend this product for all music lovers out there.
p1243
aVI was fairly skeptical on buying a pair of Dre Studios as the original headphones...let's just face it was god awful. The old beats studios at 40% volume would leak out like no other. These pair of babies sound much more crisp, bring the heavy bass but not way over the top like the originals and just look a whole lot better. Highly recommended!
p1244
aVGot my beats today and still testing it around....1. First thing I noticed after opening the box was that a part of the foam on the earcup was dented because the other ear cup collapsed onto it probably for a really long time (probably since it was made in the factory). But the dented foam seem to slowly get back to its original shape and that really shows how great its quality is.2. I noticed the band is very stiff when compared to my beats wireless (that I own for like 2 yrs and is now discontinued), I remembered my old pair of beats used to be like that when I just got it. So now, I just want to recommend the people who just got it or going to get it to be extra gentle to it for a while and wait til it softens or loosen up to avoid possible band breakage. I know its a very expensive pair of headphones and we'd expect a lot from it but... let's admit that although its expensive its still not perfect. At least I know that the only reason I sticked to beats is because of its stylish looks.3. The wireless connection isn't quite smooth on the first try. Haven't tried it again cuz its now charging. I really hope that nothing goes wrong with the Bluetooth functions in it cuz I had to send in my first pair of beats wireless (discontinued) about a month after I got it cuz the bluetooth function died. Luckily beats send me a new one which I find them to be responsible. Not bad not bad. Though I did heard about the poor customer service beats/apple provide for some people which I have no idea of but do think that's possible...4. Overall: I recommend to be careful to these beats headphones especially ones with wireless features. I do think they are fragile, but honestly, its a $300+tax worth pair of headphones, and that's a price exclusively available on amazon. Its about $400+tax in bestbuy, staples, target... you name it. I treat it like glass made gold (at least in the beginning I do). So if you be gentle/careful to it (so it doesn't Break), its actually a pair of good looking (stylish), good sound quality, known/famous pair of headphones (with some risk which obviously I'm willing to take...). Worth considering pair of headphones.PS: will be updating if anything new comes to mind.
p1245
aVI'll say it off the bat.  This may not be the most awesome sounding cans that I own.  But if you're not an audiophile or prefer lots of bass heavy music, you will like these headphones.A couple of things really stood out for me:1.  The price was good and better than what you get at the Apple Store (no surprise there)2.  These headphones are pretty plush and comfortable.  I can wear these for quite a long time and have no issues.  Wearing it with glasses on is also no problem. B3.  The Bluetooth connectivity is flawless.  It's simple to link to your phone and turning the headphones on and off without any issues is nice (unlike my wireless jaybird earbuds which seem to disconnect constantly - which is beyond annoying)4.  The sound may not be upper echelon, but when it comes to listening to dance and rock music, I like how those genres really sound good when I use these cans.5.  The gold color looks seriously awesome.If you're looking for a versatile set of wireless headphones that look great and have decent sound, you totally can't go wrong here.
p1246
aVThe headphones are beautiful and they sound great WHEN I can keep my wireless connection. It randomly drops the connection in the middle of a song even if the phone is right there within range. For what I paid for these headphones I expect better quality.
p1247
aVSo i priced matched these at Best Buy a couple of months ago and I'm so pleased with my purchase. If you are a listener of hip hop or r&b; then buy these.
p1248
aVpros:  looks.cons: head band can get uncomfortable, bottom part of pad was was sewed to tight so the pads have a wierd fold, high pitched noise always in background, and a speech delay in videos, and overpriced. BEATS ARE NOT WORTH IT UNLESS YOU LOVE THE LOOKS.
p1249
aVBeats Headphones by Dr. Dre! I'm in! This was my first thought when the first round of headphones were introduced, unfortunately, I re-learned why I shouldn't become influenced and manipulated by marketing to purchase anything. The style was cool and new, but more importantly they sounded like crap and I hated them. I don't want my headphone to sound like a car rolling down the street with so much bass you could hear the truck rattling.  I wanted sound quality so I sold them and purchased a pair of Bose. With technological advances I wanted to upgrade and experience even better quality so I began researching for the best pair to enhance my experience with music.  Here are the candidates I considered: Parrot zik 2.0, Sennheiser Momentum 2.0 Wireless with Active Noise Cancellation, Bose QuietComfort 25 Acoustic Noise Cancelling Headphones, Sony MDRXB950BT/B Extra Bass Bluetooth Headset and Beats Studio Wireless Over-Ear Headphone - Matte Black. I spent hours watching reviews and going over the pros and cons of each before narrowing down to Parrot, Sennheiser and Beats. After internal debating I was leaning toward Parrot but their out dated blue tooth capability was a deal breaker. Sennheiser ringing in at $500 was more than I though necessary. Beats were left standing, and needless to say I was apprehensive. After listening to them at a store I was very impressed by concerned that they were somehow amped in their enclosed display cabinet. And I was glad to learn that Monster was no longer associated with Beats. So, lets give this another try.When my new pair of Beats arrived I was happy but not as excited as I had been the first time around. I carefully unwrapped the impressive box and charged them. When I finally put them on and it play I had an instant eargasim.  They sounded exactly like I had hopped they would. Clear, crisp and and properly balanced. I could hear the little idiosyncrasies within songs and the bass was right on point and not disruptive. They are comfortable and sturdy and I'm beyond excited by the many hours I'll spend under the spell of my favorite artists.Hope you enjoy as well.
p1250
aVSynopsis: Very good sound, noisy noise cancellation, ear cups not roomy enough, finicky connections. Unfortunately had to return them.Sound:  I really liked the sound of these.  I have a number of wired headsets (in, on, and over ear), and these were as good as any in terms of sound.  Good base but not overwhelming.  Everything was clear and not muddy at all.Sound, Pt. 2 (Using these with an iPhone): When I use the iPhone's built in Music app (with music in AAC/M4A format) they sound great with very little (if any) discernible difference from a wired connection, so these headphones definitely support AAC over Bluetooth.  When using the Amazon Music app the sound was nowhere near as good (becomes more obvious if you listen to Amazon Music for a spot that sounds wrong, then listen to the same spot with wired headphones).  My guess is that all Amazon Music is encoded as MP3.  It probably works great on a device that supports AptX, it doesn't on the iPhone.  This isn't a fault of the headphones but of the iPhone and Amazon Music not playing nicely with each other to get the music to sound good over Bluetooth.  Real bummer. I like Prime Music.Noise Cancellation: It did cancel out some noise, particularly lower frequency constant sounds; however, there is some pretty substantial hiss. Also, there are periodic soft beeps when nothing is playing (i.e. if you just want things quieter).  They aren't very loud, but to me it was enough to distract.Fit: Initially, these were very comfortable.  They are a bit snug but the very soft cushions keep the tightness from being uncomfortable.  The downside to the soft cushions is that they give enough so that my ears touched the inside of the headphone covering the speaker.  I bought these for all day wear (at work) and after several ours the pressure and slight rubbing on the tip of my ears caused them to begin to ache. I have what is probably a tad smaller than average head with smaller than average ears that don't lay flat on my head but don't stick out more than average either.Bluetooth Connection: Usually, it worked great, but if the phone and headset were separated by much distance (not in the same room but still in the same house) the connection dropped and I would have to manually reconnect them (i.e. turn headphones on and off or make the headphones discoverable and go through the menus on the iPhone).  Sometimes the connection was a bit wonky: I would get a call and the music would keep playing while the call would come through on my phone.  Disconnecting and reconnecting would fix this.  Finally, these DO NOT support multipoint (i.e. connecting to two devices at once) and DO NOT support NFC pairing.  With them being a new version this year and expensive they should support both.
p1251
aVNot worth $280....I used it for 1 hour and my ears become warm.... And the headphone are not comfortable at all.... You can't use them without charge... I bought Bose wireless and they have an option connecting with cable if you don't have charge unlike these bears wireless...I would say the last you can spend on this pair is $100-$150 not more than that
p1252
aVLove them, using them now with the music on my phone, calls, verbal texting, and tuning out the better half?  Have had Bose for the last 8 years, cord getting a bit freyed, ear muffs flat.  These are wireless, equal or superior sound, slightly cheaper and more comfortable.
p1253
aVI somehow regret buying this over the VMODA M100, this headset is on par with my other $100 headset - the Omega Wireless Gaming. The sound is absolutely scattered all over the place, no bass, no feel. Should have bought the VMODAs T.T
p1254
aVThese headphones have amazing sound quality. Whether I'm working out, riding my bike, or just playing games on my computer, the noise cancelling feature of these Beats immerses you in whatever you are doing and promotes a deep sense of focus because all you hear is your music. I would definitely recommend these Beats to anyone who would be fine with paying for them!
p1255
aVVery high quality sound! Whether I'm working out, riding my bike, or just playing games on my computer, the noise cancelling of these headphones immerses you into whatever your doing and promotes a lot of focus. I think that these Beats are great and would recommend them to anyone, if they are willing to pay.
p1256
aVOk, let me begin by saying that i buy whatever I like, not what the Reviewer's or majority of ppl say. Most ppl don't like Beats Electronics, now I know why. I personally have the PowerBeats2, and I LOVE them. But I needed something with more bass and gave me the erection I need at the gym (while pumping some IRON).So I came across these beautiful majestic Dolphins. Oh by the way I listen to mostly EDM genre. I watched a camal ton of reviews before buying these cause this ain't Hooker cheap. So I got this few days ago and I was pumped and ready to head the gym. BUT!! Upon listening I realized my head is about to explode, not because of the sound quality (which is not worth your hard earn money) I'm talking about the active noise cancellation. I felt like my ears were being sucked in to a black whole. Even though I really like the looks and the comfort of these and was trying my best to like them (believe me these are very comfortable and look Lamborghini good) BUT, I just couldn't take it anymore. I'm not done, the sound on these are not even great, specially the bass. When I'm working out I want to be able to feel like I can pick up that heavy 10 lbs dumbbell and push out 10 reps, not stuggle to do 5 maximum. Honestly boys and girls I'm returning these ASAP, it's not worth the money. If this was $200 then yea it's pretty good for that price but $270 ( btw I got these cheap compared to what they were originally $370 or something, WHAAATTTTT??)ConclusionGet sennheiser momentum 2.0 (wired not the wireless) instead. I know, they are a bit more expensive but believe me when I tell you that you won't regret it.
p1257
aVI've got three different ones of this headphones and they're all defected, the left side volume of the headset is much louder than the right side when you set the voice to maximum, I've tried all three of them on all types of outputs, iphones, Android devices and a mac laptop and got the same result everytime, I don't know if this seller's stock is defected or what but I've tried another headphone from a friend of mine and it didn't have the problem and it was the same model and everything, I cancelled my order and I'm going to buy one from else where, the headphones if they were working properly are great and the quality is amazing and the battery life is great.
p1258
aVIf I could give ZERO stars I would. My Beats headphones have a manufacturing defect: the seam-line in the ear cup separated showing the foam, and fell apart 2 months after the expiration of the 1 year warranty. This is called "planned obsolescence" and I shouldn't have been surprised that Beats created an expensive product that falls apart, and set their business workflow so they wouldn't have to shell out replacement parts or product. This is not normal wear and tear, check the pictures, the headphones are fine. I can't buy another earpiece, and Apple customer service told me that they wouldn't replace it. Apple said that the only option was to "repair it for $205 including shipping". I can buy a new pair for almost that price, but I won't. Don't buy these headphones. The product is horrible, Beats is a horrible company, Apple has become a horrible company.
p1259
aVI like them but I think the right speaker was blown upon arrival, not for sure because I haven't listened to anyone else's to try to match the quality of the headphones. Other than that I like them.
p1260
aVTried these at the Apple store, actually decent. Still overpriced. You can get headphones that are better than these in the 100 dollar price range. Do your research, it's worth it.
p1261
aVAbsolutely great! Now when I don't want to hear someones annoying voice, I just put these bad boys on and the noise cancelling and great audio blocks out there stupid sounds. Easy cleaning too. While I was spray painting something (Don't Ask) some paint particles got on the headphones and I was able to clean them in seconds and they still look brand new. I recommend!
p1262
aVLOVE These. I don't now why I waited so long. These are great for a 1 hour gym session. My ears do sweat a little but I don't mind.  These don't fall off during deadlifts.  Love these
p1263
aVCase The case is a very durable padded nylon. The zipper seems very durable too.Over-ear pads I have medium to medium large ears and the ear pads are snug. After an hour I have to take the headphones off because my ears are hot and uncomfortable.Bass and soundThere is an audible hiss due to the noise-canceling feature. Music sounds great, but video games and tv do not have rich sound.Noise- cancelling wirelessThis is the best feature. I vacuum with my headphones on and the music comes in nice and clear over the vacuum. Headphones are not great for running and I would suggest earbuds if you are a runner.Battery lifeI get 3 hours of battery life, and the rechargeable battery is a great feature.
p1264
aVThey're $380 headphones. I got them brand new for about $260 on here. They're awesome, tbh they aren't worth $400, but they were DEFINITELY worth the $260 I had to pay.
p1265
aVYes on every level imaginableIt is a genuine headphonesOne of the aux cables included is color coded to the headset, though the other is standard red. BUT who cares its bluetooth
p1266
aVWireless Studio Beat Headphones These headphones are one of a kind and made perfectly for music lovers that like their music loud. The headphones have a noise cancellation where they block out all noise around you so you can only here the music. The headphones have very good sound built into them with a great bass also for those of you who like that. The Beats headphones come in all different types of colors and you can customize your own beats to make them just how you want! The most popular thing about these headphones is the fact that they are wireless and Bluetooth. Wireless is a big thing these days and people are looking for that and these are the headphones for you. They are great because the wireless connection holds up to 30 feet from your phone. You can set your phone down and run down stairs real quick to get something and still be listening to your music when your phone is up stairs with no Bluetooth connection problems.On the headphones it tells you how much battery life is left. The battery life is very good and more than you will ever need for one day. The battery life on the headphones last 12 hours of Bluetooth connection. If you plug your cord into the headphones they should last about 18 hours of played music. The headphones are also very easy to charge. All you do is plug them in at night and they are ready to go all day for you! On the other side they are a little pricy but well worth the money because they are awesome headphones and wont let you done. They are also a little on the bulky side but when you are done using them they fold up so you can put them away. When you have the headphones on your head you cant even tell that they are on your head because they are so light. These headphones are a lot better than ear bud headphones because they wont hurt your ears after you are using them for a long period of time. If you enjoy listening music and like a good bass or sound then these headphones are for you. The headphones aren\u2019t made specifically for one type of music it\u2019s made for all types of music. They work awesome and wont let you down.
p1267
aVBeats Studio Wireless Over-Ear Headphone is best fit for you listen to music while exercising, studying, or just performing everyday tasks. When listening to music with this $279 headphone, you will feel like you are in a concert. You can get the best quality even though you are in a crowded place. As it blocks all the external noises you can use it to take a nap at public place too. The color of the headphone is blackish so, it does not look dirty. I have been using it for six months and it is easy to carry because it can be rolled up into a small bag. The headphone is durable and sturdy as well. As the ear cups are flexible, you feel relaxing when you put it on your ear. You can use it continuously for five hours without feeling it because it\u2019s so comfy. It doesn\u2019t hurt your ears like other headphones.You can feel free to roam around and have the listening going on as the Bluetooth stay connected to 30 feet. You can even listen to it, when your audio devices are plugged into charge. There are small buttons on headphone to take calls, skip songs, and change the volume right from the headphone. Wireless Headphone has Adaptive Noise Cancellation, a rechargeable battery, and re-engineered sound which would made you feel special. The Bluetooth connection lets you enjoy your music wirelessly for up to 12 hours or up to 20 hours when plugged into your audio device. You do not need to worry about carrying the charger and wires with you. You can listen to music with this head phone when you are exercising, biking, studying at library, and even cooking food at the kitchen.If you consider that you get Bluetooth capability, comfort, and long battery life, this headphone is worth the price.
p1268
aVHaving been an owner of the earlier generation of Beats Studio Headphones; purchasing the updated wireless headphones with a black matte finish was a no brainer. I couldn\u2019t believe, being a first time wireless headphone owner, how free I felt not having a cord that tied me down to my phone, laptop, or iPad. These headphones are perfect for a student on the go and for anyone working out at the gym.PHYSICAL: The black matte finish is subtle; yet, very sharp looking. The headphones are professionally built; very sturdy and smooth movements of the ear flaps. One of the things Beats really improved one with these headphones is the padding around the ears. They set comfortably and don\u2019t move around much, so you don\u2019t have to worry about them falling off your head. Having glasses, the pad on these are very comfortable and don\u2019t push too hard on ears or frames. Overall, these headphones have a sleek, comfortable, and attractive design.AUDIO: The sound of these over-ear headphones is second to none; I can hear everything the producer intended the listener to hear, its quite remarkable. The padding of the ear-phone part is noise canceling, meaning when you put them on you can\u2019t hear much other than what is coming from the speakers. With the great sound and noise canceling headphones it is worth every dollar of what is now $264.29.I definitely recommend these headphones for a student on the go and for anyone working out at the gym.
p1269
aVBeats headphones were built to produce live concert sounds. So if you listen to music while exercising, studying, or just performing everyday tasks, these wireless headphones are for you. They not only stay on your head and hug your ears tightly while performing physical activity, but they also keep you focused with little to no distractions, making it useful to students, athletes, or just plain music lovers.Simple to use:Upon receiving the slick black box that opens like a book to reveal the products, you will find a microphone cable, USB charging cable, power adapter, instructions, and the headphones. The directions give you a step-by-step guide to work the headphones. Any age group that is familiar with technology is able to function the product.Comfortable:They are light, strong, and flexible to custom fit all head shapes. The headband is heavily padded, as well as the ear cups. You will find the ability to use the beats studio wirelessly contributes to comfort enormously; the Bluetooth allows you to roam 30 feet and lasts for 20 hours.Upgrade your listening experience:The creators want you to feel that you are at a real, live concert. You can expect that the music genres that sound best through these headphones include: rock, hip-hop, R&B;, electronic, and pop. Though it depends largely on the song, the treble response creates quality sounds. If you want to cancel all external sound, the adaptive noise canceling feature completely puts the world on mute which increases the experience of the Beats Studios.Affordable:The price of $264.29 for the wireless Bluetooth, high quality sound, lightweight design, and other mentioned aspects of the product make the headphones worth the price. They come with a one year warranty, but they are built to last long when taken care of.In the areas of comfort, simplicity, sound quality, and the price, you can expect positive evaluations. If you are searching for that concert-like sound and high quality, popular headphones, you have found them. Hope this helps you make a decision on the product.
p1270
aVI purchased these wireless headphones for overseas flights. They did the job in noise cancellation. The sound quality is great, as well. The bass highlights the type of music to which I typically listen. However, I got these on a great sale ( $100 discount for grey/titanium color) and would not have paid full priced for these, as there are likely better quality headphones in that price range.
p1271
aVI purchased these because I wanted a decent pair of wireless headphones.  These are decent, but not great.  I upgraded from a pair of Audio Technica ATH-MX30x ($69), thinking the sound would be quite a bit better, and in some ways they are much better, but in some ways they are no better.  The base is a little sloppy (not tight), the mids are muted (sound distant), but the highs are fantastic.  Overall, they don't sound incredible, but they do sound very good.  There are things I wish were better, and I am not sure the sound quite meets the price tag, but there are very few good wireless headphones on the market, and I personally really want wireless.These can be listened to in wired mode.  Many reviewers have said they sound better in wireless mode, and I have also found that to be the case.Pros:  Well built, great wireless performance, great battery life, comes with lots of cable (Yes they are wireless)Cons:  Mediocre overall soundConclusion:  One day a decent pair of wireless headphones for half the price will be released.  Probably best to wait.  Stick with wired right now unless you can't live any longer with wires.Update:I have now had these headphones for approximately 5 months, and I could not be happier with them.  Once you adjust the equalizers on your listening device, these sound fantastic.  I imagine my ears have largely adjusted to the sound of these cans, but when I listen to other headphones now, I just don't think they sound as good.  I would strongly recommend these headphones to anyone.
p1272
aVBeats are the whipping horse of the audiophile community. They are well meaning people who want to educate people on how putting effort into good sound can really make your life better. And they may have a point:1. Music just before the digital age was lossless CD's. The only bottleneck was your headphones2. Then when the digital revolution started, ripping CD's to MP3's was commonplace. Rip speeds were slow, 128Kbps was the common bitrate to save time3. Pirating was also commonplace, napster. Shoddy rips everywhere.4. iPod launched with the iconic Apple Earbuds that sounded like screaming babies fingernails scratching chalk.5. Pandora launched was highly compressed music to save bandwidth.6. Bluetooth launched to highly compressed signal traveling to speakers and headphones.It's been a rough 20 years for quality music. Radioshack is gone, Circuit City is gone, and a lot of generalized tech stores has bitten the dust. teenagers simply have grown up around poor sounding music. They probably don't even know what bass is or have ever experienced it.So they walk into their Best Buy with their Apple Earpods around their neck, walking up to a Beats demo booth, with high bitrate MP3's at key moments  of a song ready to play with the hit of a switch. And yeah, they are absolutely floored. Despite messy bass, most teens probably thought they heard the sound of God.And that's why beats has been beneficial for the audiophile community. They are the gateway drug to better audio. To finally get people off from bundled in ear pods. They charged overpriced, stylized phones that were iconic, and it should have been a boon for the audio community to keep pushing people forward. But some resented Beats for being so successful, while their beloved brands have a moderate consumer base. Their complaints weren't wrong, but their head was in the wrong place.With the revisions, including the Beats Studio Wireless refresh here, they've improved the sound signature. I was listening to these at Best Buy and did a quick comparison to the Solo 2's, and the Bose models. I also own Sennheiser Momentums (audiophile endorsed). These cans have a really exciting pop to them. They will not make an audiophile happy, because they are not neutral sounding like the Momentums, but they are simply fun to jam out to. A guilty pleasure. The bluetooth is an added convenience that has come a long way in sound quality. AptX which is popular compression to improve sound through bluetooth, gives the Beats Studios a near indistinguishable sound from a wired connection. Streaming programs like Spotify have improved their bitrates, and if you subscribe, you can get their premium sounding bitrates (320kbps mp3 I believe), which will let these headphones do high quality work while on the go.So don't despair. People might be spending more money, when they could purchase nicer and uglier cans. But at least they're not tied to the dreaded ear bud bundles, and maybe when these things inevitably break they'll be interested to see "what else" is out there. The counter culture nerds are probably already throwing their wallets at Sennheiser or V-Moda.So accept this attractive, and rather fun sounding piece of equipment for what it is. A pricey but pleasant introduction into the world of better music, and just leave people be who purchase this model. In fact, i'd encourage you to give it a listen, you might be surprised how far they've come.
p1273
aVYes they look slick, O.K noise cancellation, great battery life, comfortable and I love that they're wireless.  They also have pretty decent bass provided you listen to a lot of bass heavy music but overall the sound quality isn't few hundred dollars worth.  The deal breaker is the fragile headband on this thing. It cracks so easily its infuriating.Got a pair a little after Christmas 2014, at the time they were almost four hundred dollars and by around June 2015 the plastic around the hinge started cracking and splintered away, leaving the earpiece hanging loose. This happening after light in home use and being babied was appalling.  The Apple store switched it out for a new set. A little over a month later as I was taking them off I heard a crack.  Surprise surprise, same area around the hinge between the headband and ear piece.  I was told that my first replacement was a special case and was given an explanation of a sketchy warranty that didn't hold up to logic so they sent me another (that I will not be keeping).  Not even a year's use out of these headphones and as it turns out, the brittle headband is a known issue.  Overpriced, pretty garbage and I'm so done.
p1274
aVI bought these over a year and a half ago at a military base in the deserts of California. They have survived that and the bipolar weather of Northern California. If you take care of these the right way like anything els they will last. Sweat dose get in them(causes the speaker to stick to the plastic frame, just blow into the speaker a few times) and the pads will eventually start peeling apart but super glue will help and it doesn't damage the the fake leather. Mistreatment doesn't mean they suck. I am looking to replacing them because i can't stand having my things look beat up, but definitely getting the same kind. Worth the price.
p1275
aVSame price as Bose noise cancelling (albeit wired) and 1/3 the noise cancellation. In addition, don't forget since these are over the ear that they are hot to wear.  On the plus side, they are wireless and they look cool.  I'm returning.
p1276
aVLoved the sound quality. With iPhone Bluetooth sound great but with Samsung you need to use the cord to get the best quality in sound. Body is just fine but I think I have to be careful as it feels fragile. Case which comes with it looks kind of cute . Overall the price of $279 will be worth  if it works well for 365 days. Which is spending less then $1 a day for music and sound for me makes it worth the price.
p1277
aVI did a lot of research and even despite the bad ones I read that were just aimed at the over pricing and marketing behind these I knew they sounded great.  The ones I had however picked up a lot of ambient noise even while playing audio and especially while using the bluetooth mode.  I could be playing music loudly and still hear the vent in my office, same thing with the fan in my bedroom.  I would also distinctly hear people talking over the audio I was listening to.  I was pretty bummed that I had to return them
p1278
aVI love the sound quality delivered by beats. The only thing I do not like about them is the noise cancellation feature which create pressure on my ears to the point of giving me a headache. I had to return them for this reason. Unfortunately, you cannot turn off this feature.
p1279
aVAll I heard about Beats is they are overpriced. As I write this I have a pair of Skull Candy headphones ordered from Amazon. I decided to go to Best Buy and listen to all they had. I listened to the Skull Candy I had ordered, I listened to Bose, Sony, Monster. I liked the Beats Studio the best. I am picky about audio. I know bluetooth is a compromise. Yes Best Buy was selling them for $379.99. I wouldn't pay that price. They matched Amazon for $264.00. Well worth it in my opinion since the rest did not sound as good.
p1280
aVI have to say, this is much better then my Parrot Zigs (first version). The sound quality on the bluetooth connection phenomenal. The weird part is it sounds much better compared to wired connection. Great stuff.
p1281
aVMany people talk about these being over priced but I personally think it is well worth it. The style and sound clarity is amazing. By no means am I a musician so hearing the highs and lows, etc, is not that important to me. The only downfall is that the battery life is not as good as other bluetooth headsets that I own.
p1282
aVI know Beats has been getting a bad rap lately, but these headphones are GREAT! I can hear everything in the music, and the sound is fantastic. The wireless tech is to die for, I absolutely hate wires and eliminating one and keeping the quality high gets my thumbs up. The headphones are super lightweight and very comfortable (given you don't wear them for longer than 3 hours at a time), and you have no worries of them falling off your head! Absolutely great! And I play my music at a decent volume (and have had trouble in the past with headphones leaking noise), these Studios have little to no leakage of noise! It's brilliant! Would completely recommend! Cheers!
p1283
aVSo pissed, I bought these and then the cushions start to fall apart so then i spent 16 bucks on amazon to replace them to find that the tape used for the cushions isnt strong enough to secure them for long periods of time so I have to keep reapplying the cushions. Thought I would look cool now I dont even wear them in public. Nothing is great about these over priced headphones. 300 dollars wasted because the base hurts my ears.
p1284
aVOk. So I've had these for just today but all I can tell you that there awesome. I've seen a bunch of comments saying the sound quality is "not that great" to me the sound incredible. Im 100 percent satisfied so far. Waiting to see how they hold up. I've seen some  unsatisfied people as far as durability is concerned. I'm hoping they are wrong about that as well.
p1285
aVAbsolutely love these. Very happy with the purchase. Great sound, easy to use, setup, etc. Battery life is good as they last a while. I use them with everything from my Ipod & Ipad to my TV and my computer. Great product!
p1286
aVEverything is good .. but it disconnected a couple of times.. and some other times lag in connection. .Otherwise it's comfy and looking good ..sound amazing ..Keep in mind that I had 3 pairs of different beats headphones before..all the 3 broke.. I hope the studio is more durable
p1287
aVI thought that the dedicated ANC hurt the sound quality more than it helped the listening experience.Also, headphones were really uncomfortable. The fit of the headphones was really tight, putting way too much pressure on the sides and top of the head. Unfortunately in my case, adjusting them didn't help. Ultimately the poor fit was the biggest reason why I was unsatisfied with them and returned them.I'd recommend trying them on in-store, to see how they fit. Also, wear them for more than a few seconds -- ideally, for a good few minutes.
p1288
aVHooray!  I've finally reached the big leagues with these headphones.  Once you experience the freedom of wireless, the other phones will just end up thrown in the corner!  Great sound!
p1289
aVI own over the ear wired, and had pro's for a while, but these bad boys take the cake. I would venture to say they sound BETTER than the wired headphones, and I LOVE my wired ones.
p1290
aVThe best headphones on the market, period. Battery lasts a very long time between charges and it's very fast to charge. You actually feel the music and cancels most, if not all noise around you. Plus it was an added bonus that it could be used as a wireless Bluetooth device to talk on the phone. I didn't even know that it had a microphone when I bought it. But obviously it's best feature is playing music. There is a big difference between these headphones and others. You actually hear and feel the music like no other. It's also great for watching movies on tablets, phones or any other Bluetooth enabled device. I even use them while working out in the gym because it cancels all noise around you so you don't have to hear other people's workouts or machines going. Also they are very comfortable and just fit perfectly since it's adaptable to all head sizes. Another bonus is the controls on the side since you can raise or lower the volume or pause something etc.. There isn't enough great things I can say about these headphones. You pay for what you get, plain and simple.
p1291
aVI got these today, And i must say they look beautiful, Built quality is very good but not excellent, Sound quality and bass both very good as well, What disappoints me the most is the sound leak! People around you will start to listen to what you're listening to even at medium volume!!! When your iPhone or iPad battery is low the sound will be out of sync sometimes!!! If you're OK with all the above then buy it, I personally have mix feelings about it and I think for what I've paid i should've got a better product.
p1292
aVProduct was great a part that was glued on came off but nothing a little superglue couldn't fix. Otherwise for the price a great item. Came with everything it was supposed to.
p1293
aVThe sound is definitely awesome, but the bass is on lower side. Sometimes it might hurt your head if put for longer hours. Overall super product I would recommend it to someone only if they can get this for less than $300
p1294
aV3 stars only because the noise cancellation is weak at best. Sound quality is very good. Very comfortable to wear.I can tell that it works because if I remove the headphones is obvious that there is some amount of noise cancellation. In my situation there is the noise from the AC vents and it cancels that noise  but people talking normal volume levels a few feet away are not cancelled out at all and actually seem to be heard as good as if I was not wearing Them. Sound quality is very good but Bluetooth does create a small amount of "noise", but it is not audible when the music is playing.
p1295
aVIt didn't mention in the description that one side was way tighter on one side than the other and that makes me pretty mad thatI got the head phones, it didn't mention in the description that one side was way tighter on one side than the other that I payed 184 dollars expecting a very comfortable pair of headphones and they end up being hard to use more than 30 minutes. The order came late and I payed for shipping which was pretty unfortunate. Overall a very nice sounding pair of headphones, just don't buy them from this seller and buy from amazon warehouse.
p1296
aVThere really isn't any noise cancellation, and the quality of music is just average. Many times the Bluetooth wireless would disconnect, causing 10 minutes of time just to try and fix it again. Bose qc25 are cheaper and SIGNIFICANTLY better in every sense of the word
p1297
aVVery good looking. Bluetooth sync is just as good as the cable. Extremely comfortable and the only downside is that the sound quality is average. I would recommend this product for people who  like to listen to music alot and take their headphones everywhere, not computer techies.
p1298
aVBest headphones I have ever bought or used. And it isn't close. Absolutely worth every penny. Sound quality is excellent. Volume is more than one could ever wish for. I have used these while I workout for several months and never had any issue at all. Very very comfortable as well, and no issues with falling off of your head. Don't bother with any other headphones.
p1299
aVThese went on sale and I did not pay anywhere near retail. Due to this I went aheadand pulled the trigger, and I am glad I did. These are comfortable and have synced up to my iPhone and Mac seamlessly. There is slight white noise you can hear when there is no music playing, but I can not hear this once the music starts. I listened to these all day at work and still had plenty of battery life yet. 5/5 would buy again
p1300
aVFantastic device. I use this everyday. They have much improved the sound quality since the earlier days of Beats, and it is a godsend at the gym not having to deal with wires.----Pros----Easy Bluetooth connectivity: All you have to do is turn it on and it will automatically connect to the device that you last used with it, provided it is in range. If not, it will default back to any previously paired devices-Great sound: while not as HQ as some of my more audiophile headphones, this is more than listenable, especially for Rap and EDM, music with a heavy bass element that is perfect for the gym-Micro USB plug for charging: This is an absolute must, and huge upgrade over previous models that used AAA batteries.-Build quality: solid build quality. I sweat into them regularly at the gym and it seem to have no effect on the audio quality or the headsets reliability (I bought the 3 year square trade warranty just in case though).  The phones themselves are made of some kind of plastic, but it feels solid and durable.---Cons----Could use a little more range: sometimes I find myself losing connection momentarily or music stuttering when running to the other basket on a basketball court, when my phone is sitting under the opposite hoop-Battery life: while the battery life is admirable for the package you get, it would be a lot more convenient if the battery life was up to par with a device like the LG Tones. I do love the Micro USB plug for charging though.-Pricey: this is a bit pricey, but I feel the cost is worth it for how well the package you receive works. But thats my opinion and I know some people do not share it. Because of the price I recommend purchasing some kind of Square trade warranty. I bought a 3 year one, just in case my sweating at the gym eventually kills it.
p1301
aVUmmmm.....SO GREAT! These headphones are more than what I expected. I got them refurbished, so I was expecting the white part to be stained and some scratches to show AND for them to smell weird, but no. These are pretty much brand spanking NEW. Quite impressed.
p1302
aVWaaaaaayyyy better than the beats "on ear" that I had for the past 1-1/2 years. Wifi quality rocks!!! Fit great, never slipped off while working out. Glad I made the choice !!!
p1303
aVI cannot believe that people actually pay upwards of 250 bucks for this POS! I am NOT going to even waste my time discussing it because several other reviews on here have already listed many many shortcomings of these crappy headphones!
p1304
aVBought a set of beats paid 379.00 these headphones within 1 year there is a crack on the headband, these headphones never left my desk, and have been pampered not a single scratch on them, and they have a crack on the head band, beats is not willing to replace them, and want me to pay 199 for a crack on their cheap plastic, STAY away! from these!
p1305
aVThese are awesome. I was super hesitant to spend the money on these, but I'm glad I finally did. I only use these at the office and on the plane so they're holding up very well. The battery lasts about 4 days, a few hours a day, before it needs a charge. Plug them in overnight and they're ready to go again. Super easy to pair to my apple products. I ended up purchasing my wife a the matte black edition and hers pair up nicely with a cheap bluetooth transmitter for the TV at home. These are great headphones. Just wish they weren't so expensive.
p1306
aVWell, I have 1 month with it and I really love it, great sound and makes me feel so good when listening great music, even at the gym, the sound is so strong and quality is so good that encourage me to go further. I was afraid of trying for the reviews that I saw before but I took the risk and here I am, loving it.
p1307
aVabsolutely love these headphones. i lost my matte black ones in the airport recently and was really disappointed. i re ordered them in the titanium color 3 days later. i had paid full price for my first pair. the titanium ones are only $229 which is a great deal for these. awesome sound quality, comfortable fit, great battery life, and if you take care of them, they will last. the people who complain and post pics of their broken headphones were probably careless with them. it should also be noted that these are not good for the gym. sweat will dry out the earpad covers and eventually they will rip/crack.
p1308
aVTo start off, my headphone credentials are not that of an "audiophile" but I listen to music almost every day on multiple sets of headphones. In the past I have owned the Beats studio HD (1st edition), Beats in-ear headphones, Skullcandy Skull Crushers, Beats Mixrs, Bose QC15, Powerbeats wireless, and the Beats Studio Wireless. Of that list of headphones, I was never satisfied with a pair of headphones until the Bose. Both pairs of Beats had just "eh" sound and terrible build quality. Both pairs were broken, replaced, and returned at least once until I bought the Bose close to 6 years ago. Unfortunately, the headphones finally showed they were made of earthly materials as the speakers began to crackle and fade. After a couple weeks of research, I finally decided to take a leap of faith and go with another pair of Beats. I recently purchased the Powerbeats wireless and they really made me re-evaluate my opinion of Beats. Whether it was the buyout by Apple or years of negative reviews, it seems as if the company finally decided to make a change. Now that I've had the Studios for a few days, I figured I'd share my first opinions:Build:Much better than the 1st edition of the headphones, as they feel much more solid and a lot less plastic feel. The outer layer feels like a metal substance while all clasps/enclosures feel like metal as well. The ear cushions are made of a comfortable and soft leather. The headband is a simple rubber band with a little air pocket/pad inside. This is the main area for concern for me as this was the big problem I had in Beats past, but only time will tell.Comfort:One of, if not the main reason I gave the product 4 stars. The materials used are solid as listed above, but the total weight of the product is definitely felt after a little while of usage. The headband is the biggest problem so far, as it feels like someone is pressing their thumb to the top of your skull while you wear them. I've found a few different areas on the top of my head that are a little more comfortable, but regardless I find myself adjusting them every 20 minutes or so. The ear cushions are a nicer feeling leather but aren't big or deep enough to completely encase your ears. It isn't noticeable until a half hour or so, but the combination of the small ear holes and how the speakers stick out to the point they touch your ears, leaves your ears hot and hurting. While this may not be as big as a problem for some people, I'm used to the extreme comfort of the Bose QC 15's which aren't noticeable after 6 hours of use.Sound:Like I said, I'm not the most qualified to give a review on sound, but I know enough and have heard enough headphones to understand the difference in sound and quality. This is where Beats truly surprised me. The first generation headphones were nothing more than mediocre which caused waves of negative reviews. In the second outing by Beats, they really stepped up their game and put out a pair of headphones that are well balanced through the lows, mids, and highs. With the Bose, I always felt like there was something missing with the lows, and Beats really did a good job bringing down the low levels and balancing them out. Overall they do sound a little heavy, but the mids and highs are still crisp and evident whether listening to classic music or watching movies.Wireless:The main reason I went with the Beats Wireless. The Powerbeats wireless made me realize how annoying wires can be especially moving around or doing something as simple as laying in bed. The bluetooth works well and smoothly with minimal problems so far. The headphones quickly recognize the last device you were using with them and transition to another device quickly. Definitely puts the product above the competition.Noise Canceling:Nothing special here. The noise canceling isn't very noticeable compared to the QC15's which are still the best noise canceling for the price out there. I really do wish there was an option to use the headphones without noise canceling to save battery but then the sound quality would probably go down as well. The noise canceling in these headphones is by no means something to brag about, but a nice feature as it most likely improves audio quality etc.Overall:I've had the headphones for only a few days, but I really enjoy them. The big thing to me is the price. I was able to score these for 225 new on a prime deal. For 380, I wouldn't buy them. I put them at the 300 price range like the Bose or non-wireless Studios, but for 225, it was definitely a steal. The sound of the headphone, to me, was and upgrade from the Bose, but the comfort and lack of noise canceling was definitely a let down for sure. I didn't expect the noise canceling to be anything near Bose (which make those the great headphones they are), but the comfort was a big turn off for the headphones. The overall build of the headphones was a nice surprise, but the big win in these headphones was the wireless feature. I loved my Bose and would buy another pair if the price were the same as these, but the lack of wireless really was annoying at times especially when I have a life proof case which means you have to use an adapter to even use the headphones. The wireless means no adapter and no wires. All in all, the headphones were an amazing buy for the price, and if you can buy them for anything near (I saw the blue pair was around 260) they're definitely worth it, but unfortunately I had to give them 4 stars solely for the discomfort I have when wearing them.
p1309
aVAmazing! I've had these for about 4 days now and have used them on a road trip as well, and just wow! Right out of the box the design and feel of them astonished me, super easy to work, a total of 4 buttons on the headest(Pause/Play/ Bluetooth, volume up/ Volume down, and the Power button) Very snug, great for working out, even running. You are truly in your own world with these headphones on!
p1310
aVStay away from these headphones. They are way overpriced and the outer shell is made from a cheap, brittle plastic. After 3 months of minimal usage, the plastic above the ear cup started to crack on both sides. I contacted Apple Support and was told the only option I had was to pay $200 to have them replaced. These headphones are a piece of junk and Apple knows this. They will not stand behind their product.
p1311
aVI've had this product just barely a year (under light usage) and the center of the ear cushion fabric just came unglued.You'd think that for almost $400, (price was $379 when I bought it), they'd have some kind of quality control!Neither Beats, nor Apple (which now owns Beats), nor Amazon's 3 year extended warranty called "Smart Guard" will cover it.DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THE AMAZON SMART GUARD WARRANTY.
p1312
aVThe beats studio wireless are the best headphones out there. They are stylish and the sound is perfect. As for the cons, the material does feel like it could break easily, but as long as your careful with them and you don't have a history of breaking other expensive devices, their shouldn't be a problem.
p1313
aVBought these in December. Lasted 8 months both hinges broke at the same time. Took them to Apple who said it was not covered. A lot of money down the drain. I wouldn't mind if It was abuse but I was very careful with them. Great marketing no customer service.
p1314
aVBeen a beats fanatic for 5 years, always using the wireless, substituted my matte black to gold, doesn't sounded better than the previous edition, biggest problem with this is, I go to gym and sweat with it, the ear muff got dirty right away, white muff easy to get the make up on girls!! anyways, still the best wireless headphone out there hands downfollow ambivert's advice and tell me what you think! thanks
p1315
aVI ordered 2 of these and both times the Beats Headphones had a bad fluttering base type sound in the left earpiece basically making them useless.  I gave up on the second time.  For such a BIG price tag you'd think that that kind of thing wouldn't happen, at least not one right after the other. Obviously they're good headphones because of the majority of the reviews being good. Just got tired of trying to find a good pair.  Very glad Amazon has such a good return/refund policy.
p1316
aVI got these for my Husband Birthday and he absolutely loves them....he uses them when he is doing yard work or lounging by the poolor even when he goes for a bike ride...he loves the way they fit and he says he loves the way he can have total control over the noise around him.He can totally cancel it out or he can make sure he can hear what is around him while out on his bicycle.
p1317
aVI am very happy with these headphones! I absolutely love the wireless feature. This is my first pair of wireless headphones and it would be hard to go back. I got a nice deal on these. I don't know why the Titanium ones were on sale, but they were only $229. And a bonus, I had a $70 gift card balance. I had been researching headphones for a few weeks wanting a new pair. I'd been keeping an eye of the Solo version, but this was too good of a deal to pass up. Titanium is probably the color I would have chosen anyway. They are a little less flashy. That's the one thing I actually don't like about Beats. Beats in general do feel flashy to me, but these are a fantastic looking pair of headphones.I do feel Beats are overpriced and you are paying for the name. However, they aren't as bulky as other brands and I love a deep bass and I know other brands such as Bose have a flatter more even sound. My last pair was Bose. They sounded good, but so far these are better. The sound is crisp and I'm very impressed with it. I do have a set of the Urbeats earbuds that have good sound as well, so I knew the sound would be decent. Of course, these surpass the earbuds.The fit is a little tight, but that also secures the sound and prevents leaking, which is something I hate. I've asked and been told, the sound doesn't leak badly. That is a big turnoff for me, when others in the room can hear what I'm listening to. If there is anything that annoys me, it's having to endure someone's headphone noise in a quiet room. I've been wearing them to bed at night and after a couple of hours, my ears do get a little sore. However, I've only had these a little under 2 weeks, so maybe I will get used to the fit and that will lessen. I've already noticed it's not as bad.My only con is battery life. I haven't had it last 12 hours. Maybe 6-8 of playback. But I plug them in and they charge fast.Overall, I'm very impressed! Would I pay $379 for them? Probably not, that's a lot of money and I'm not sure if they would be worth that. I guess it will depend on how well they hold up. If they last me 2+ years, then maybe I would drop that kind of money. Time will tell. But so far, so good! If you can get a deal on them, I'd go for it. I'm glad I did.
p1318
aVThese are great headphone but is it normal to hear noises from the headphone? no music are play, just power on. when I tested beats at the target, it sound way completely  different.
p1319
aVOverpriced Headphones!Got them for my son. In the 2nd week the right side stopped working. Checking on net I found many other users complaining about the same. Got it replaced by Apple.There is a lag when using bluetooth, useless for watching movies on iPad etc. (again on the net you find users complaining about that)(I also noted lag on the Beats Pill!)Battery discharges quickly if not used. So you need to continuously watch it to be charged and ready when you need it. No exchangeable batteries, you can't have a spare battery.Sound is good, but nothing you can't get with cheaper options.Overpriced!
p1320
aVI like the headphones. They look and feel good. The sound is good and all of the features are very simple to use. The only reason I am not giving them 5-stars is because the padding compresses down most of the way and your ears will be pressed in (I have very small ears, and even they get smashed) by the padding, causing soreness and discomfort after 30-45 minutes of continued use.
p1321
aVUnderstand engineers during development I don't think were Apple's influence. So let's give Apple time to restructure and correct the Old Beats policy on manufacturing utter garbage. Most beats headphones are overpriced junk! Beats were well marketed and people bought into it for the cool factor-however truth be told-bass is overpowering and sound quality always suffers in one channel. Materials is just cheap bad plastic!!! I wouldn't use these over the ear headsets for workout purposes they will easily break.So far I had two of these headsets replaced! I'll never again spend a dime on Beats until Apple improves materials and build quilts.Wait a few years and let's see what Apples bring to the shelf.
p1322
aVThese headphones are great for whats out on the market right now. They are expensive and while I do feel part of the cost is based on pure hype I just was not willing to purchase another brand on a whim. I read a review mentioning the white noise and how that person did not like it, I personally enjoy the white noise as a noise canceling effect and it works well to me. Its a surprising feature and I did not expect it. The headphones are also cool in the way they fold into each other, much different from prior beats.There is also another variety of wireless headphones from beats that are cheaper, those are the older model and the difference is that they are "on the ear" instead of "over the ear", This is a review of the most recent, more expensive over the ear headphones. I do believe the over ear headphones have better sound quality simply because it covers the whole ear and that is my rationale for buying these ones.I previously had the motorola sd-10, I had one of the original... Read more
p1323
aVBeautiful headphone, matches my iPhone 6plus gold, sounds just as good as it looks. My Amazon Prime got it to me on time as promised. Great service Amazon , Just love it!!!
p1324
aVI'm not a audio techie by any means & therefore don't know (or care about) the nuances espoused by audio-phile reviewers. All I wanted was a quality set of "over-the-ear" wireless headphones to use primarily when working out because ear buds do not fit in my ear comfortably or securely. So after a little research, I purchased Beats Studio2 wireless in Titanium. Here's my review on what was important criteria for me: The fit is very comfortable: does not shake loose while exercising but is also not so tight as to cause a headache.  The sound is very good to my UNtrained ear.  Easy to use controls. This "over-the-ear" style, which envelops the ear almost completely (vs "on-the-ear" which merely lays on top of the ear) provides a soothing noise-blocking environment. Yes, sweat does tend to accumulate round the ear during a good workout but, like other reviewers, immediately following my workout, I wipe the ear cups with a non-alcohol wipe & dry them off (when I get in my car) so the set is clean & ready for tomorrow.  My complaints?  I have two. First, these were very expensive -- well over $300. Had I waited a few more days before purchasing, I'd have secure this exact set for almost $100 less than what I paid. That's on me cause I was in too much of a hurry. Lesson learned!  My second complaint is that the case is a pain in the butt. It's very awkward to handle -- it's almost impossible to grip the thing because of the shape & rounded edges. Yes, there is a clip provided to attach to a cloth loop on one side of the case which does provide something to grab on to. All things considered, I'm very satisfied with my purchase.
p1325
aVFirst off I will say, if you want AWESOME noise canceling headphones... You will have to go with a  WIRED headset. These Beats do a great job but you really can't compare their noise canceling to the Bose Quiet Comfort.Now as far as Wireless headphones with noise cancellation....I really think these are great. I have been reading a lot of reviews on here that are really hating on these and comparing them to Wires sets which is obsurd. No Wireless headphones will EVER compare to a wired headphone. Wired will Always produce a better sound.So now that we have that settled, let's talk about these wireless headphones. For a wireless headphone I really think the sound is great. They aren't as bass heavy as before and it appears they have really improved the balance between the mids/highs to the bass. Quality seems awesome as well. These really feel like good quality....they feel "expensive" if you know what I mean. I think these are some the best wireless headphones (for non-Audiophiles) out there. Of course you will always have those "professional" audio gurus that say these suck but at the end, it's really about how you feel about them!!!
p1326
aVWorst experience with Beats since they went to Apple. I will never buy Beats again! The workmanship is absolutely horrible. almost 400.00 headphones that are known to crack at the headpiece. 8 months in and mine did! #CANTLASTAYEAR ... Apple will not repair saying that there was physical damage but yet these headphones have been in the case every single day when not in use and where never dropped. They cracked at the seam as they have done for many others. In the past Beats simply replaced them under the 1 year warranty but not Apple. So no way I am paying 200.00 to repair and get back a headphone that will eventually crack again simply because of the way they are made. So much as I enjoyed the headphones I am done with Beats Wireless or any other Beats Product! I don't do WIRES!! Apple does not honor the warranty so I can spend my funds elsewhere.
p1327
aVWell, glad to have purchased the item at such great discount. Loving these Headphones specially the wireless functionality. Just wondering why Beats isnt consistent in giving the "Beats by Dre Cleaning cloth" despite mentioning it. Yeah I know its just a piece of cloth and I can use ANY(as replied by one of the sellers that i asked) cloth lying around here in my room but based on my experience by having to purchase the Beats Studio 2.0 Wired Over-Ear Headphone previously, the Wired version did come with the cloth and I did saw some unboxing of the Wireless to having the cloth as well. Just wondering.
p1328
aVWhat can you say about Beats. I'm not expert but the quality sounds good it pairs easily to my iPhone and the noise canceling is great. I would recommend but the price is a little steep.
p1329
aVWhat can you say about Beats. I'm not expert but the quality sounds good it pairs easily to my iPhone and the noise canceling is great. I would recommend but the price is a little steep.
p1330
aVMany audiophiles hate beats i get it and there may be headphones that sound as good or somewhat better. However these studios are so much better than previous beats models that i wonder if those putting them down tried the new ones. I have used a wide range of headphones including v-moda m80, seinhesser momentum, bowers and wilkins p5 and p7, bose aew2 wireless, sony mdr1 wireless and all the beats models except the mixrs. They were all good headphones but i did not see how the sound quality on many of them were any better than beats despite what some say. The old beats models werent that great but the new studios are nice. The earpads are so soft, the matte black color is slick and they supply plenty of good cables and a hard case! I would describe the sound as fun and comparable to any of the headphones i mentioned in this review. I would say maybe the bowers and wilkins p7 were slightly better but i didnt like the size of the earcups or how hot my ears got with them. For pop, hip... Read more
p1331
aVIS HORRIBLE I HATE IT THE SOUND IS TO BASS IS LIKE A GIANT SUBWOFER IN YOUR EAR SOUND IS OWFUL AND IT BRAKE IT AN SPILL APART AHHH DONT BUY IT!!! IS TO MUCH 350 DOLLARS IS BEST A AUDIO TECHNICA SENNHEISER I DONT NOW BUT THIS NOBUT IS PREETY BUT I DONT CARE
p1332
aVAs many have said, the quality of sound you get for the price is lower than I would have hoped for. Make no mistake, the sound quality is good but I was underwhelmed due to the price.So with that out of the way, it's pretty awesome for blue tooth head phones. They did a good job of combining the pause/play, forward/backward, and Bluetooth connect functions into one button. The cables and case were nice and yes, you can fit the cables and even charging plug and headphones in the same case without forcing it.Plus, the base isn't that much in my opinion; they balance sound pretty well, and if you take into account the noise canceling any type of music genre sounds nice on them. You should be able to tell when a sound file was made with good quality and when it wasn't.On the noise canceling, it pretty much only blocks low tones, so high pitches can be heard... But I wore them while walking next to a busy street and it blocked out noise pretty well.Most I can say is they grow on you. No loss of quality when using them wireless at all.I guess I'll go ahead and give it five stars. After all, they sure make you feel fancy
p1333
aVThis is absolutely amazing. Previously I had regular studio beats in pink. Those lasted about a year. I revived these as a gift over a year ago and they still work perfectly. Aside from the charging port having a bit of an attitude, (the charger has to be placed perfectly into the port, but holds snuggly after its placed), they are great quality. All the commands can be executed wirelessly from the left headphone. This includes pause, play, volume up, volume done, skip back, and skip forward. They also connect easily with every phone I have paired it with (iPhone 4, iPhone 6, samsung s6, Motorola G, and HTC phones), while with most other Bluetooth speakers don't connect right away or you have to restart Bluetooth many times.  They charge quickly, and the color doesn't chip or scratch. They hold battery very well and will last all day on a full charge. The headphones extend very far and fit every person I know who has tried them. They also play music from the folded position. It also has a port for a cable, if Bluetooth isn't what you want to use it for. It does come with a white and gold cable, and a red and black cable that has the command box on them. The case that it comes with is very durable and I feel very comfortable with them in the case.  Furthermore, the color IS gold. I know it seems silly to say that, but many times a color is advertised, but when you receive it, it's darker or lighter than you expected. This is definitely gold.I love these so much and I use them constantly. Definitely worth it.
p1334
aVThese headphone are by far the best wireless headphones I've ever used. The connection stays strong and you can feel the bass but if you like something like pop it's also quiet good at that. It's noise canceling in and mode can block out surrounding noise such as a TV but when people are talking you can hear them. If you were looking for noise cancelation then go buy a pair of qc25. The build quality is okay but sometimes it feels cheap and flimsy, almost as if you could break it by adjusting the the cups. The comfortablity is great. At around 264 instead of the 379 retail price this seems like a steal. You cannot use it without the battery which means if the battery dies so does the music.
p1335
aVThese headphones are very shoddily made and began falling apart almost instantly. Right out of the box, the leather around the left earcup began to loosen a bit. I thought to myself, "no worries, nothing a little superglue can't fix." After all, I purchased them mainly for the sound quality, not aesthetics. A few weeks later, the same thing happened on the opposite side. Next, I noticed that the catch on the left side would malfunction, prohibiting the headphones from remaining in the default (non-extended) position. So the left side would kind of just hang. Subsequent to that, the headband came undone. I've only had these headphones for five months. They are beyond repair with superglue and duct tape. This is my second pair of Beats and I am extremely disappointed because the sound quality was pretty good. Based on this experience, I'm moving on to another brand. One can get poor craftsmanship at a much cheaper price.
p1336
aVOk this is my first review on Amazon and I wouldn't have bothered writing a review if I wouldn't have been so terribly disappointed by Beats Studio Wireless headphones.(I bought it for $264 around a week back from Amazon which I feel is the amount you pay for just having that b logo on your headphones). Firstly, I would say that the bass is good in these headphones(unfortunately only the right earphone provides the right impact.. I don't know if the piece that I received was defective) and that is about it. Highs are muffled and even the wireless performance is nothing to boast about. My cheap Made in China Bluetooth headphones have a better range compared to these headphones. Headphones look good but it wouldn't hurt Beats to provide better quality headphones(such is their profit margin). Some people might like it but then you did be blown away by ATH M50s with FiiO amplifier combo which you can get for like $200 combined. I also have an older version of Sennheiser momentum and even I felt that they were a bit overpriced for what you get from ATH M50s.
p1337
aVThese came on time and without damage, but they only worked for a few days before they ran out of charge, and they wouldn't charge. Gas to bring them in to an Apple store to get new ones.
p1338
aVI don't go anywhere without these headphones. They have beautiful sound quality and such an elegant look. Definitely top notch wireless headphones. I have used boose before and they are comparable but I love these.
p1339
aVI bought mine as a Christmas gift for myself last Christmas.  I had planned on using them occasionally while I am at work, or exercising.  When I received them, I enjoyed the sound they put out, and were very comfortable.  After a couple of months, maybe 10 uses total, I heard a loud pop in each ear and the sound quality went to hell.  I called beats and returned them for repair.  To my surprise, they replaced them free of charge.  Now it had only been a couple months later, maybe 10 uses later and now there is no sound coming out of one ear, and I am about to call them again, and how they can be replaced, again.  I had high hopes for these.  I am not a heavy user, user them on occasion, and they keep having issues.  For how much these cost, I expected them to last longer than they obviously do.  I shouldn't have to replace them every couple of months for a casual user.  The Bluetooth feature was why I got these, and it is looking like I need to look into other brands... I'm just not satisfied with them.
p1340
aVMeh my PS4 gold headphones have just as good quality, only difference is that these have bluetooth and those don't not sure if a $250 price difference is worth it though
p1341
aVI got these as a Christmas gift from my wife.  She knew I liked to listen to music via Bluetooth headphones so she got me these.I own quite a few BT headphones (Sony, Parrot Zik, Bose OE/AE, LG, etc.), and I have to admit I was pleasantly surprised at how good these sounded!  After reading all the negative reviews from all those self-professed "Audiophiles", I now doubt their credibility and tastes in sound/music!I also did a 'blind' test with some of my friends and they were very shocked at the results.  They even admitted that, had I told them that they were actually Beats headphones from the beginning, they would have definitely been negatively biased and not would have judged them fairly.The ANC is good, not great.  But for what I use them for (work and home), they get the job done.The fit is comfortable, just make sure you find a good setting and remember what they are.  I find that when it's properly set to my head, I can wear them for hours.  BUT, if you don't, the top of the band can dig into your skull after a while. So finding the perfect fit is really important for these cans if you want to wear them for extended amounts of time.I recommend them if you are not a snobby, self-righteous, Mr. know-it-all, 'audiophile' snob.  If you're like me, and just want to hear your music with good quality sound and fit while still remaining wireless, than these cans are for you!Thanks all!
p1342
aVFor a few weeks, I was in search for the perfect wireless headsets to watch movies, listen to music, and possibly take calls. The Beats Studio 2.0 did not match my criteria.CONS:Very high in bass, and can barely hear the lows.Does not take callsHeavy on the headNot ideal to wear over long periods of timeNoise cancelling makes a weird sound that may hurt your ears after awhileExpensive compared to other brands in the marketPROS:Noise cancelling optionWell known brand name will make you look cool in front of your friendsComes in a cool hardshell caseA friend told me about the Bose Wireless, so I gave that a shot. Although a cool case is not included, there are many features with the Bose wireless headsets, including 2 bluetooth device accessibility, lighter on the head, nice lows, and I can take calls. All at a fraction of the price of these Beats.There is no noise cancellation but I am able to use it even after the battery dies by plugging in the aux cord, which you can't do with the Beats... not sure why Beats doesn't have this option, it is 2015 you know..
p1343
aVSometime it takes several tries to connect to Bluetooth with iPhone. Just sometimes.Also, when you listen to music, and switch to phone call etc., when switching back, the volume is messed up.
p1344
aVBeats wireless Studio 2s sound way better than Beats Studio 1s. Plus the added benefit of wireless make these things a worthy investment. While they are a bit pricey they are comfortable to wear all day and provide a nice sound and great features. I'd recommend them to anyone looking for a premium headphone product.
p1345
aVSound was great. Very comfy and light weight. Definitely much more better than the first version of Beats Studio which I bought years ago.Battery was great. Really liked the battery light indicator. Packaging as usual was very nice and professional.Definitely worth buying especially at the discount offer by Amazon. I'm glad to have bought it.
p1346
aVTook about a year for them to start breaking down. At this price point, I expected the ear cups to maintain stitching and the bass to not rattle the speakers.Sticking to other vendors (second set of Beats) the hype has inflated their value.
p1347
aVNoise cancellation works fine, Bluetooth is also a  plus.I think sound could be much better. I have another brand, wired that I think sounds a lot better and it's a lot cheaper
p1348
aVAfter 5 month this headphone stop working, took it too the Geek hoping to see if I was doing something wrong but I did not they say it stop taking a charge. I purchased these headphones 18 Feb 2015, for $344.34 to only work for 5 months this is not worth that hard earned money.
p1349
aVI waited a while to make this purchase, balancing cost vs. quality etc.  Less than 6 months of regular use... Maybe 4 or 5 days a week they are falling apart.  For the price this is just ridiculous lack of quality.  I would not recommend these, I feel like I got ripped off.
p1350
aVI did not find them as good as our Bose over the ear NC headphones.  For the money it didn't meet my expectations.  I will be sending them back.
p1351
aVBlown away by the sound quality, ease of use, style, construction.... I could go on and on.  Ive been wearing them for hours and have not had any discomfort.  Incredible... Got em for $279, not sure if i coulda done it for $379 retail
p1352
aVExcellent buy. I really appreciate how the beats were delivered "New sealed box and will all the accessories. This was a gift for my Mom and the color was perfect and matched her new Apple computer. Thanks for the product .
p1353
aVAuthentic pair of Beats here. This is my second pair (white & gold) of wireless studio's in the past few weeks. The sound is amazing and pairing is easy. I didn't realize this when I purchased but this style of headphone has a built in mic for phone calls!  Wow!  Speechless!
p1354
aVEhhh.... im embarrised just telling people how much i payed for these things! Lol i love them with all my heart my first pair i treated them like s*** i preordered them and in a month the left side stoppedworking... but the warrenty covered that and my second pair are here with me and they havent gave me problems yet im happy i got them sound is great just not worth the price on them :c
p1355
aV**I've owned these headphones for about 4 months and use them every day. I did not purchase them from Amazon.**I would have rated these 5/5 if they didn't retail for almost $400 because they are definitely not worth that hefty price tag. But hear me out.They sound great. They're comfortable. They fold up so they're easy to carry around. They're wireless, so you can sync them via bluetooth to your various devices (I've yet to get these to sync wirelessly with my Windows 8.1 desktop, personally I blame that problem on my crappy Chinese bluetooth adapter)Sure there are better sounding headphones for the same price. But I didn't buy these to be absolutely blown away by the sound. I bought these because not only do they sound good, but they look good and they're comfortable. If you can find them cheaper than retail, I say go for it.
p1356
aVHaving Bluetooth capability is an amazing thing.Especially when paired with headphones that sound as clear, and amazing as these.I am a hardcore music listener.It's what I do with at least 50% of my time.And I have to say i love these.And they are more balanced than the original beats studio's.
p1357
aVWay over priced for what they are. I have a pair of 100 dollar headphones that are just as good as these. I was disappointed and returned them 2 days later
p1358
aVTook me a few minutes (okay, longer) to figure them out, had to google instructions, but once I figured out to hold the on button a little while I was a happy camper.  I enjoy these especially for traveling long distances.
p1359
aVMy Beats came with a nice case. Dropped them accidently in the lake and the case floats!  Beats were dry and Unharmed! Nice quality. Love the Beats. Seller shipped fast and great packaging.
p1360
aVGreat quality authentic version of the product. Not sure why other reviews complain they are fakes but purchased somewhere else. These reviews had me very skeptical from buying on amazon. I took the chance and happy I did. They sound great and look amazing. I actually just purchased a gold pair for me.  Delivered super fast and packaged securely. Highly recommended!
p1361
aVGave this to one of my Granddaughter for last Christmas that will be a Freshman in high school this coming school year of 2015/20116. She still gives me hugs 7 months later thanking me for her BEATS. The only hurdle for this unit is understanding on how to maintain Bluetooth connect-ability between uses on different devices which I had to teach to her but now considers herself to be a big cheese Tech Guru while others have trouble with this issue.
p1362
aVI didn't buy mine from Amazon, I got them from a pawn shop for dirt cheap. To my surprise they were brand new and never opened so I got the full buyers experience. These headphones are a great quality especially if you like heavy, tight fitted ones. I've had them for 2 months now and the sound is crisp and clear, nothing is wrong with them but the second "Call Wire". You get three wires with these, a charging wire , a music wire that's just an aux cable, and the call wire that has the microphone. The back plastic part popped off a few days ago which is no big deal because when you don't use it for calls but it's still a nuisance. I've learned this is pretty common in the wires but can be fixed with some glue ( just be careful not to get the buttons). But other than that great sound, very sturdy, overall great product just be prepared to order new wires.
p1363
aVGo buy the Bower and Wilkins P5 Wireless!! I have the beats studio wireless matte black and I thought they were good until I purchased the P5's, no comparison and they're the same price. I bought my beats in February of this year, the foam was infinitely more pliable on one side making them lopsided and now it's only been 5 months and the padding is falling apart. I just sent them back to apple to get fixed and I'm going to sell them when they send them back to me. I just purchased the P5 wireless from B & W and the first impression was WOW! there was such a clear difference in the quality of sound and build. I thought this was a good headphone and if I wouldn't have bought the P5's I would have never known how much I was missing out on. I'm disappointed in these headphones for the quality and build at their price, these are not 400 dollar headphones, on that same note, after listening to the Bower and Wilkins, I said to myself, I would have paid double. Granted, many people buy these because they're beats. I will no longer being Beats headphones in the future. Just to clarify, The sound is fine, it's not bad at all, but after paying the same price for another headphone that sounds so much better, it's upsetting.
p1364
aVThese headphones are amazing! The sound quality is incredible and the bass is very strong. These headphones are meant for music but they can be used for pc gaming if you want! The headphones are more meant for indoor use due to their size, but they can be used for plane trips, car rides etc. If you want indestructible or very strong headphones for rough use, like for listening to music on construction sites or related then these aren't for you. Overall I like these headphones and am enjoying them everyday.
p1365
aVI got it for the Bluetooth feature but the value for the price is not there.  It also doesn't seem to hold too tight for gym movement, but works fine in an office setting.
p1366
aVThe Beats Studio Wireless have earned a spot on BoldList's Top 5 Bluetooth Headphones under $400!Pros:- Versatility through wireless and wired capability. Beats Studio Wireless headphones deliver the sound quality that made Beats by Dr. Dre famous, only without the cord getting in your way- Beats Wireless headphones feature powerful sound, as clear and strong as any wired headphoneCons:- Always gotta be cleanin' them to keep them lookin' fresh!Check out the rest of the list: http://boldlist.net/top-5-bluetooth-headphones-under-400.php
p1367
aVI went to Best Buy with a budget of $300 to purchase a pair of headphones. I listended to Bose, Sony, and of course Beats. I was instantly surprised with the quality of the sound from the Beats Solo 2 wireless. They were crisp, had punchy bass, and were no where near the sound that I was expecting. I had heard that Beats was all name with no sound. Well, I was about to purchase the solo 2 until I decided to give the Studio wireless a try. I had no intention of purchasing these for they were near the $400 mark, thus well above my $300 budget. I was blown away by the openness, punchy bass, and overall fun that these headphones produced. It had solidified my decision to go ahead with the purchase of the solo 2 wireless. As I reached down to grab the solo 2 off of the shelf, I noticed a studio wireless in red being sold as open box for $285 dollars. I could not believe my eyes. I immediately asked the salesperson what was the gimmick. Were they the  previous model, damaged in some way, for they were just sitting there as the deal of century as far as I was concerned. He said no. In fact, he said they were floor samples that the manager decided to put back on the shelf to sale on the fourth of July. He said I just noticed them myself, and was contemplating on getting them if no one else did by the end of the day. Well, you know the rest of the story. I picked them up, took them home, and have been amazed at not only the deal that I got, but the overall quality of build, and premium sound of these headphones. In addition, my kids were all jealous of how cool these sleek red headphones looked as well.
p1368
aVI purchased these in May 2014, they sound, they work fine, a little problematical at times connecting to blue tooth.  My biggest complaint is the construction, the plastic sliders on both sides have large cracks, and had to be taped to keep them from falling apart.  Given the cost the fit and finish should substantially better.  No more beats for me.
p1369
aVall I can say is these headphones are GREAT !! the sound is superb, and the noise canceling is a champ. I use these headphones while mowing on a diesel lawn mower and can hear the music with clarity. the only drawback on these is the charging cable is very small and delicate and the controls are not not very user friendly, but I eventually got the hang of it.
p1370
aVI bought these as a gift for my husband and he loves them.  He said he can't believe he got along without them before.  He doesn't mind the red color so the discounted price was awesome!  He also stated that the sound quality is amazing - can't hear anything else around him when they are on.  He loves the fact that he can take phone calls with them too.  Great purchase and totally worth the money!
p1371
aVI've own these pair of Bluetooth headphones for over 3 months now. Here is my review.I will try to keep this review as short and concise as possible.Pros: Offers a listening experience that is friendly to all types of music. Bluetooth feature is amazing with connection length extending up to 30 feet. I can connect the headphones to my phone and leave it on my wireless charging mat and walk 25 feet to the kitchen and make food freely without any cable mess. Another good thing is that the wireless features doesn't degrade the sound quality. Battery life last 12 hours and there is an indicator on the headphones itself that shows how much juice is left. Some phones with newer OS even have a dedicated battery indicator on the phone itself. A nice little touch. These headphones are also extremely comfortable. I can wear them for hours and hours. Glasses doesn't cause any discomfort. Last but not least these headphones, in my opinion, looks really nice. The Titanium color I got with the matte finish helps prevent fingerprint marks as well as make it not so flashy when compared to the glossy counterparts.Cons: These headphones are expensive. I'd say these headphones are probably not the best bang for the buck in terms of tying sound quality with price. These headphones also won't work without charges on the battery. Even on wired mode. On wired mode you will get about 20 hours of use and on wireless mode, as mentioned above, you will get about 12 hours of use. Luckily it charges relatively quickly. The headphones may be really comfortable but the build material doesn't qualify its price tag. The headphones is primarily made up of plastic which is disappointing at this price point but materials choices didn't ruin the comfort levels or the durability levels.Edit (8/25/2015): With the recent price drop, the cost went down to $240. At this current price range these pair of bluetooth headphones offer a much better bang for the buck than the previous $380. I'll also raise my rating from 4 to 4.5 stars (round up to 5 since Amazon doesn't allow adjustments lower than 1) due to the price drop as well as I realized that after 100 hours of burning in the headphones, I noticed a slight yet significant improvement in sound quality.
p1372
aVWhat an unbelievable product. Apple and Beats teaming up was also very good for both parties. Apple is such a successful multi conglomerate company while Dre got his pay day once again. The fact this product is wireless and the set up is seamless. The comfort is amazing. Really nothing to complain out.
p1373
aVWell, I have to agree with many of the reviews concerning these headphonesStylish = YesPricey = Hell YesSound = Better than mostHowever, the ANC feature works only when headset is plugged into device, excuse me, but I purchased a WIRELESS headphones, I want to have use to all the functions of the headphones without having to plug in the audio cable to use it. Luckily I only paid $260 for these and that's too much. I would feel more comfortable at $125 or $150 but definitely nothing over $200.Unless you work in the music industry and your ears are tuned to pick up every sound, I think for the average user, there are better headphones to choose from, like the other headphones I have pictured here.
p1374
aVbest headphones I've owned to this present day. Comfortability is high with this over the ear type .  Sound quality is amazing. The price did hurt a little, but the bluetooth quality on these headphones ease the pain quite a bit.
p1375
aVThese headphones sound ok, but they are not of a high sound quality. They are very bassy and are cheaply constructed. Save yourself some money and get a different brand that sounds better and is of a higher quality.
p1376
aVSolid wireless headphones for the price. It's not the quality level of Bose noise cancellation but it's worth the trade off for nicely designed wireless sets. I'm only giving it a 4 and not a 5 because they are a bit heavy and the noise cancellation has a too much feedback.
p1377
aVThe headphones did not have a serial number on the right ear slider, as do all REAL Beats Studio Wireless headphones. These Are Not real Beats Studio headphones. Do your research before you buy. Product description says "what's in the box" - well the first order came with a used pair of fake headphones with none of the literature the new products come with, and the replacement came in a box with a second pair of fake headphones at least with the literature this time. Returned both products.
p1378
aVI just got this yesterday and so far I love it for being wire free. The sound is good and clean, and the bass is just right. But I think I prefer the sound and look from the Beat Pro. I got the Matt Black which is 40$ cheaper in Target and looks less fleshy which I prefer.it appears there are some humm now and then from the noise canceling (with or without music playing) when I was walking in the mall which drove me crazy. But it was dead quiet at home. Hence the 4 stars.It is a bit tight and uncomfortable for wearing long period of time (over 30mins). with that said, I may return it and get the Sennheiser Momentum 2.0 Wireless (which is 200$US more.)
p1379
aVBought in January. Great sound. Great convenience from wires. Comfy. Long lasting charge. Sadly, the cover over the foam at the ear is coming apart & the window for return is closed. If I could, I'd do an exchange bc I do love them! Also, they don't fit anyplace that's convenient for me (pocket, purse...).  So carrying them has to be accommodated. Could wear around neck but not with my kids.
p1380
aVPlays deep bass and has extremely clear high ends. You'll end up hearing things in songs that you've heard a thousand times that you didn't even know were there. I'm no music buff, but I do like my stuff to sound good. These deliver. The wireless connection to my phone is worth every penny. I use these when I'm doing chores like vacuuming or dishes. I use them while I mow the lawn, and trim the sidewalk and weeds. About the only thing I haven't tried using them for is shooting muffs, although I have thought about trying it. The noise canceling feature makes it a great tool to use for much more than just sitting at your computer, it makes doing chores less of a chore!
p1381
aVI own a Bose QC 15, sound quality is excellent, yet the noise cancellation is not that great. Yet, love the Bluetooth connectivity of the Beats. I wish Bose make Bluetooth headphone with NC.
p1382
aVI got these for my 15 year old son. He uses them everyday and says he loves them! He seems to throw them everywhere and not take the best care of them and they still work great! They are holding up great!
p1383
aVI wanted to like these. I really did. I had a pair of wired solo2's that sounded awesome and I wanted to upgrade to something wireless and over the ear so these were the next step up. Unfortunately the sound kept dropping out for seconds at a time when connected by Bluetooth and once the headphones even crashed on me. They literally turned themselves off then back on. I exchanged them and the second pair started doing the same thing. Terrible quality control. Sadly, I'll be staying away from Beats from now on.
p1384
aVVery disappointed. Bought these for $350 and within a few weeks the ear phone part is ripped and coming undone. I've had $10 headphones that have lasted years. Very upset and not happy about it.
p1385
aVThese headphones could not be a worse value at the price.  Absolutely do not recommend these if you are any kind of audiophile.Pros:* Nice look* Wireless nice and the bluetooth connectivity works well* Lithium ion batter is goodCons:* Very poor mid-to-high performance.  I had heard these about beats headphones but I was surprised that their top-of-the-line product has such poor performance.  Many songs come across as very tinney and there is a lot of crossover noise* The noise-canceling is sub-par.  My 10 year old Bose Quiet Comforts perform better than these in noise canceletion AND sound quality* The headset is uncomfortable after extended wear.  They put a lot of pressure on the ears with no way to adjust and you have to take them off for a while to alleviate your ears.Overall very poor.  Happy to return these and stick with Bose for $100 less like I should have done from the beginning
p1386
aVI was very happy with my Beats Studio, Wireless headphones, until about two weeks after buying them when the inner ear started to come apart. Pretty disappointed. Other than that I love them. I guess time to return them and test my lucky with another pair.
p1387
aVAwesome beats!!! Meet all my needs and expectations and arrived the day after I purchased it. Beautifully design. This is 3rd beats headphone. All my friends are jealous and Ive gotten compliments about it when I'm on the subway heading home or to work. I think everyone needs 1. The quality of this product is great.
p1388
aVReally happy with purchase. Just went on a business trip from LA to Chicago. The battery was terrific, plenty to spare after a long flight. And they sounded terrific and were comfortable.The bluetooth is my favorite feature.Might take a 10 minutes to figure out everything, but easy to use afterwards.
p1389
aVThis pair of headphones worked decently well as I was looking for a pair of wireless, higher quality headphones with good sound. I heard that Beats had made improvements, so I tried it out. Noise canceling was present, but there is a faint hiss, as stated by others. The main reason I am giving this item a mere one star is because after less than two months, the headphones refuse to charge. I thought it was the cable at first, but after trying out three different cables, I can assure you it's the headphones.
p1390
aVBought these directly from my local Apple Store.  The Bluetooth option is great !  However, it tends to "skip" a lot, so it might just be the hot temperature / first time use.  Wired is fine.  I primarily use these for editing video and playing sims while listening to Spotify.  I did have a non bluetooth pair from last year in blue, but they broke due to clumsiness.  These are much more comfortable than my blue ones, so that's a plus.
p1391
aVI think someone forgot to take off the high pass filter on these.. where the $%#$ is the bass? Too much emphasis on higher frequencies without delivering enough low end  to balance it out.Outside of that, they are alright.. i've had numerous headphones and I bought these for working out. Comfort wise they are great, the wireless option works well too. All in all, not the best purchase but if you want comfort and decent audio quality.. I guess these work fine.
p1392
aVThe sound it pretty good. The NC sucks! Not even close to my Bose QC25's. I am actually returning them due to the comfort. ITS TERRIBLE. They are so tight on my head.. and they feel like they are squeezing my temples. This problem is coupled with the nasty hiss from the ANC. The combination of the two give me a HUGE headache. I want to like these so bad.. because they look so cool.. but I can't use them daily because of my issues with them.
p1393
aVThe best wireless headphones ever. Buy this if you really need Bluetooth or want something that won't get in your way.A lot of people complain about these being overpriced. But once you look inside the hardware and not the price, you may be surprised by the level of engineering that it took to have this up and running,.
p1394
aVThese headphones were designed to "look cool" but the functionality is poor at best. Save your money and buy BOSE over the ear, noise canceling headphones with one AAA battery for power, and multi-function adaptive plug. These phones can be used with ANY laptop, tablet, TV, or aircraft seat input. They are made to last and that is something Bose has going for it. I've had mine for 10 years and many of my friends do too. They work as well today as they did the day I bought them!
p1395
aVone of the few products i've ever bought that's managed to merge itself into every-day use. walking the dog, playing video games, just jamming around the house, whatever - it's all literally next level with these headphones. the ease of movement with no cable is amazing; i never have any issues syncing with bluetooth (but i also work on bluetooth for a living) and these things literally THUMP they sound good. like, physically. there's some sort of thumping mechanism that makes beats sound great although a bit overwhelming (like they should be) whenever you turn them up to full blast.the sound isn't perfect objectively speaking, but i use these more than my Sennheiser HD25-1 IIs because of how dang slick they are. they feel great, they sound great, and best of all they open you up to an amazing world of accessibility while you're listening. 5 stars, worth the bucks to me
p1396
aVA little bit about myself, I am a avid techy purchasing the latest gadgets every year. Of course I do plenty of research into products that I purchase.I purchased the beats from the Apple store, since I had a gift card.These headphones are overpriced hence why I gave it 4 stars.The quality of the build is great, feels sturdy and durable. Also, the sleek design is what sold me to the product.The sound sure isn't like other headphones but Beats doesn't advertise to be the best in sound quality. Yet I feel these heads phone do a great job at being headphones, because if you're not an audiophile your not going to know what highs and mids even sound like. Since, I love EDM music this headphone is always my go to.The Bluetooth is probably the best I seen on any headphones. The controls work great even on my Galaxy S6. The battery is 11 hours but I don't even use it for that. I mostly takes these to the gym with me, break at work and walking to class.
p1397
aVI can't believe I bought an amazing wireless headphones with 79$ cheaper than original price, it was so beautiful and awesome quality!!! The package box comes with no damage!!! One of the best things I have ever brought from Amazon!!!
p1398
aVOk, so here's my review of the new Beats Studio Wireless. I want to talk about each aspect individually so you know what you're getting. I hope this helps.Sound qualityBefore I start talking about sound quality, please understand that 1) I haven't listened to many high quality headphones so I don't have much to compare it to and 2) I love bass so if you don't like much bass these might not sound quite as good to you as they did to me.  So sound quality is one of the most important qualities of a pair of headphones, and I'm happy to say that Beats nailed it in that regard. The music sounds very clear and they are actually fun to listen to. The bass does sound awesome and the highs and mids are nice to. I also love that I can listen to different genres of music and experience the same great sound. For example, I listened to a song with a lot of vocals and not much bass and it still sounded very good. Now I've heard that these may not produce accurate sound, but I don't really care that much. I mainly use these to listen to music and my main goal for listening to music is to have fun, and I definitely achieve that goal when I listen to these headphones.Comfort and FitThis was another area that was very important to me as I wanted to be able to wear these headphones for a long time. I was happy to find that they are very comfortable headphones. Since they are over-ear, they don't put any pressure on the ears whatsoever. The ear-cups are very soft and the headband has sufficient padding as well. The one problem I did experience is that they clamp a little harder than I expected, however this is not a big problem (the good thing about this is that I do not have to worry about it falling off my head at all) Also, I've heard these do heat up on your ears but I have done household chores and such in them and they didn't get to the point where they were uncomfortable. Overall, these are a comfortable pair of headphones that I can wear for a long time.Update: So I've had my beats for a while now and the clamping problem is not as bad as it was. They are very comfortable now and I don't have any problems in that area. My guess is that either they've loosened up after a while or my ears have gotten used to wearing them. Anyways, they are very comfortable now.Design and FeaturesI purchased the glossy black version of these and I love it. They look amazing. They don't look or feel too big, and they are very sleek. They also feel fairly sturdy and very high quality. As far as features go, I love the fact that they can fold up into a more compact design. I also love the noise cancellation. It does work very well to block out sound, and with the music playing I can hardly hear anything (other than the music obviously). If you listen very carefully, you can hear a very quiet hiss while the music is paused, but I can't usually hear it while the music is playing. The battery indicator is nice, and the play/pause buttons and the up and down volume buttons are great too. They are built into the left ear-cup, and you can't tell they are there if you didn't know better.AccessoriesThe accessories it came with are very handy, including a hard carrying case, a charging cable with a usb to outlet converter, an auxiliary cable with control talk, and a regular auxiliary cable. The case does a very nice job of protecting the headphones, and even matches the style perfectly. The cables also seem to be very high quality and seem to be durable.Wrap-upAs I said, these are great headphones and I would recommend them to anyone. For the average person wanting a nice pair of headphones, they sound awesome and are fun to listen to. They are also comfortable to wear and offer a premium design. Overall, I am very happy with my purchase of the Beats Studio Wireless headphones.
p1399
aVSo.. these look and feel great, but when I took them out the packaging one of the sides didn't work.  I looked up troubleshooting options with no avail.  I had to send these back.  I would say that this was a 'lemon' but my other pair of beats broke after about three months (hence the reason for ordering these).  It seems that this brand has been hit or miss and it is a shame; the sound quality is decent and they always look very nice.I could rate them on looks it would be a 5.I WILL NOT be buying another set of beats over-ear headphones.
p1400
aVI waited for a long time for it to come and expected greatness at this price. it came late and broke after letting my normal size dad try them on once. I returned them and took forever to get money back. As far a quality goes there to breakable and don't have that sound experience you want. I'm very disappointed!!!
p1401
aVHeadphone DO NOT WORK without the noise cancelling feature so once the battery is dead, they are useless. They do not survive a standard work day so I end up going back to regular old headphones by 4pm. Obviously, these are not the headphones to take on long trips or pretty much anywhere where you cannot plug them in every couple of hours to juice them up for at least 2 hours each time. Very disappointing.Upside: when they do work, the sound quality is good.
p1402
aVPros:-Stylish. There's not much else on the market that has this color selection-Comfortable. After ~2hrs of wearing they still feel comfortable (my opinion)-A hard-shell case is included-Sound quality is decent-I've walked across the house from my device and was mostly interruption-free while listening to music. In my experience the range has been pretty good.Cons:-Expensive given the included features and sound quality. You're paying mostly for the stylish looks and the name.-Only 16 increments from min to max volume. This may seem like a lot, but it really isn't. Often I find that one click is too high, and the next one down is too low. The volume adjustments via the headphone buttons are very "coarse".-Power on indicators are very poor. When powering on while wearing the headphones, you get no indication whatsoever except for some noise canceling that occurs. No voice saying (like my plantronics earpiece does) "Power on, xx hours remaining", no power on chime. For the price, you'd expect better features in this regard.-Pairing/connected indicators are poor. My Bose Soundlink Color actually tells me in a computerized voice the name of the device that has connected to it. These headphones only give you a jumble of tones/beeps when a device has connected, and a similar sound when a device has disconnected. It's very confusing when changing devices to figure out what the beeps mean that you just heard. Also, to enter pairing mode you press the power button and look for led's to blink on the outside of the headset, but to hear the audible indicator when connected you need to be wearing them.-No dedicated track forward/reverse buttons. To change/pause a track or manage devices, you have to press (depending on what you want to do) the "b" button either 1x, 1x and hold, 2x, 2x and hold the second press, 3x, or 3x and hold on the third press. Not kidding. Confusing? You betcha.-The noise canceling "hisses" more than other noise-canceling headphones I've owned-The advanced noise canceling mode (which doesn't allow music to be played) gives no audible indicator, often making me wonder if it's in that mode or just powered on and not connected to a device.Maybe at some point in the future we'll have more manufacturers making wireless/noise-canceling headphones that aren't all black or make you look like you're piloting an aircraft of some sort, but for now this is about as good as it gets, which still leaves a bit to be desired.
p1403
aVUPDATE 12/12/15: Recently my Beats Studio Wireless headphones began dropping the Bluetooth connection to my iPhone, especially when skipping a song. At first I thought it was the iPhone but after testing the Beats with other devices I realized it was the Beats! Reading the forums reveal that this is a common issue. The solution seemed to be a firmware update. Some people mentioned that updating the firmware "bricked" their headphones but I can say that after installing the Beats Updater on my MacBook Pro and updating the firmware, the problem has been eliminated. The headphones have since maintained a solid Bluetooth connection to any device that I connect them to.ORIGINAL REVIEW:Since my family now owns both Bose QC25s (wife's in White/Khaki) and Beats Studio Wireless headsets (mine in Matte Black), I feel like I can finally write a completely informed review and comparison test between the two. I am also a headphone/earbud nut that owns the now defunct Logitech Ultimate Ears Active Noise Canceling UE9000s and eight decent quality earbuds and I have a brother that owns several products that I don't. I have spent weeks comparing and sampling many of these products so I can give you the best review that I'm capable of writing.Testing procedure \u2013 while it's not scientific I spent a lot of time with these products listening to a wide array of music. I left the headsets on my head for hours on end while exercising, doing household chores and flying across the country on commercial airlines. Also, it took me two weeks to write this review as I continued to test and compare the Bose and Beats with a huge library of music that ranged from Eminem to Emmylou Harris.I didn't test the headphones with lossless audio or vinyl records playing through analog tube amps. I used an iPad, iPhone and a couple of different iPods as audio sources since that's what the majority of us use these days. The songs are Apple AAC files sampled at 256 kbps.I'm going to cover every detail that I can think of since good research is imperative before dropping $300+ on headphones. Let's get started...BUILD QUALITY(Winner) Bose QC-25 \u2013 The materials that Bose uses in the construction of the QC25s are absolutely first class. The plastic feels solid and the aluminum feels like it was intended for use in an aerospace project and the padding on the head band is thick padded velour. One issue is the fabric used on the top of the headband. My wife's headphones are the cool looking white with tan ear-cups and teal accents and cord. The white fabric gets dirty really fast. Bose is very aware of this because when I asked an employee at the Bose kiosk at Lenox Mall in Atlanta about it, they told me, without hesitation, that a Tide stain wipe cleans it up. That area should be leather, plastic or aircraft aluminum, not white fabric. The cord (we'll talk about this more later) plugs in with a satisfyingly snug click. The buttons on the cord are the one of two soft spot for the Bose and you'd have to be really picky to fuss over such a small detail but they feel a little cheap.Beats aren't too far off in build quality but they fall short only because they feel a little more "plasticy" and fragile when folding them for storage in the included case. The shuttle buttons built into the beats logo on the left side feel a little "clicky." Compared to the previous generation of Beats, the new Studios are a lightyears ahead in build quality. While I am testing the wireless version of the Beats Studio, they still come with cords, lots of cords. The one that I use most (to extend battery life or plug into non-bluetooth devices) is the one with the shuttle buttons. The cord is thicker than the Bose and is less tangle prone. Out of the box it does not lay straight but keeps some of it's rolled up shaped, especially in the cold. This lessens with use. The buttons click with a much smoother, satisfying click (again, picky but what the heck). I had a hard time getting the micro USB plug plugged into the headphones for charging. The plug was very tight but over time it loosens up a bit.COMFORT(Winner) The Bose QC25s are the lightest weighing and the lightest clamping headsets I have ever put on my head thus making them the most comfortable, especially when wearing them over long periods of time. After wearing my Beats Studios for 20-minutes I put on the Bose and they felt funny they were so light. They felt like those OLD Walkman headphones that were nothing more than a bowed wire with foam and plastic discs on each end. In reverse, after wearing the Bose for 20-minutes, the Beats felt noticeably heavier.The Beats aren't what I'd call heavy and without the two side-by-side, the Beats feel pretty good even when wearing them for an hour or more but in direct comparison to the Bose, you feel the difference. Additionally, Beats clamp harder so they fall short of the Bose in comfort.To put numbers on the weight:\u2022 Bose 196.6g\u2022 Beats 260gAnother win for the Bose is the depth of the ear cups. They are deep enough that people with large or protruding ears will not have an issue. In contrast, the Beats ear cups are much shallower. They are so shallow that my small, non-protruding ears touch the foam pad inside the cup. It's a minor annoyance will bother some people. See accompanying photo.SOUNDThis is what we buy headphones that cost over $300, right? Just so you know, when listening to music, I like to hear all of the sound that the producer and sound engineer intended. I'm not a bass-head but more of a bass-o-phile in that I prefer full, smooth, defined bass. Skullcandy has these headphones called Crushers that have a slider where a user can dial in the amount of skull crushing thump that they want. Dialed up to the max, these things almost bounce off of your head. While it may be fun, the bass is terribly artificial and completely lacks detail. It's not what I call good listening and the fun wears off pretty quickly.(Winner) Beats Studio Wireless. Beats products are well known for their huge, Hip-hop bass. In early versions Dre and Company made the bass more of a novelty rather than a quality audio asset. Fortunately, they reeled in the bass when designing the Studio models. The bass is now lighter, tighter and so well controlled that it's much more pleasing to listen to across a wide range of music. I was in an Apple Store in Nashville, TN when I first donned a demo set of Beats Studios. I started flipping through the demo music on the iPad Touch and I was very impressed with the sound, track after track. Months later, a demoed another pair at the Apple Store in Georgetown, DC and was again really impressed. So, eventually I pulled the trigger and bought a pair.In order to give you a review that you can replicate and hear the differences for yourself, I tried to pick tracks that showcase the strengths and weaknesses of each headset. If you can get your hands on the hardware, see if you agree with me on these songs.Timbaland and Elton John team up for a song called "2 Man Show." The very first beat is a deep bass hit that sounds rough and unimpressive but stay with it and at 0:44 some smooth, harmonic backing vocals come in with an underlying bass line that is really deep...oh but wait...at 0:48, the bass line goes down about a low as speakers, let alone headsets, like to go. When listening to this song on Definitive Technology home speakers with internal powered subs at moderate volume levels, the room shakes. Amazingly, the Beats fully enunciate the smooth, deep audio with no distortion to the point that it shakes my head. It's awesome and a true test for bass capable headphones.When the chorus starts in "Break Up In A Small Town" by Sam Hunt the Beats Studios deliver every decibel that the sound engineer and producer meant for you to hear, and they throw the kitchen sink at you. Turn them up and at 0:50 (when he sings "She would get DOWN...) you will be treated to a beautiful bass hit that kicks of a window rattling chorus that when heard on these headphones sounds absolutely marvelous. Bass hits like that terrify weaker headphones. The Beats take the challenge so easily that they make it clear they can take more. A cool thing happens in this song at 2:44. All of the heavy electric instrumentation immediately stops leaving only a light piano and solo guitar with Sam's voice. It's like someone suddenly unplugging half of the music. The cool thing is that the Studios handle the transition extremely well. I compared an old pair of first generation Beats using this same track at 2:44, the heavy bass headphones left the mid-tones hanging out to dry, revealing their inability to clear mids and solid vocals. The Studios on the other hand sounded as good with a wall of sound crushing your skull as they did listening to melodic acoustic tones.But bass isn't the only thing the Beats Studio's deliver. They do a great job with details in the upper register too. "No More Miracles" by Kid Ink starts off with Elle Verner screeching out "I never waited on a miracle, there ain't no miracles 'round here" over a strumming mandolin. The Beats deliver her vocal rasp with such precision it's almost like she was in the room with you. As a light bass line enters the mix and you can clearly hear the bass player rapidly fingering the string to keep the line humming along with the vocals. Using the Bose, the bass line sounds artificial, like it's being produced from a synth. Later in the song, at 0:24, well delivered bass kicks in as the song goes full-on Hip-hop. I'm so accustomed to sloppy Hip-hop that when you hear this song on the Beats, it's like hearing it for the first time. This song can be a challenge for some headphone as a delicate mandolin can easily get drowned out by deep rumbling bass but the Beats show their balance as both are forward and clearly audible. Listen to this track on Beats Studios for the first time and once it ends you'll want to play it again. I promise.Diana Krall and Bryan Adams (yeah, that one) cover "Feels Like Home" written and originally sung by Chantal Kreviazuk. Diana's piano is so well reproduced that it sounds like she's playing it right behind you but the best part is that Diana's whiskey, lounge-singer voice drifts like wisps of cigarette smoke gently floating into your ears. Every detail of her complex voice is revealed with crisp audio clarity. If the seventeen seconds of Diana's voice and smooth rolling piano, between 0:51-1:12 don't convince you that these aren't just Hip-hop bass beasts then you are either tone deaf or biased against the Beats brand. This short moment in time is near audio perfection and the Beats deliver it flawlessly.When my iPhone shuffled across Little Big Town's "Girl Crush" I stopped what I was doing, sat down, closed my eyes and took in subtle details of the song that I had only heard through Shure SE 535s or my home Def Tech home speakers.Contrary to what I thought before owning them, Beats Studios are definitely a headphone engineered for serious music listeners. Note that they are not neutral or flat but they are balanced. Purists will still snub their nose at the manipulated EQ but it's perfect for people that stream Spotify or listen to tracks downloaded from iTunes. For those that sit at home listening to Wagner or Beethoven on vinyl through tube amps on $1,500 Sennheiser H800 or Grado PS1000s, the Beats are not for you. But for the other 98% of us, they will seriously impress you.**Interesting note. I had read that the Beats sounded better over Bluetooth than wired. I was a little perplexed and a lot skeptical. After hours and days of testing, I have to agree with that reviewer. The BT slightly outperforms wired. The wired sound is a little muffled sounding compared to BT. I'm still perplexed but no longer skeptical.Bose is not known for bass and the QC25s live up to that reputation. They are on par with the QC15s they replaced but that's not saying much. Where they shine is in the mid range, exactly where the Beats are weakest. The highs and lows sound muffled compared to the Beats but mids are more revealed.Bose produces amazing, but slightly muted, vocals and smooth instrumental tones. Close your eyes while listening to both "Beethoven's 5 Secrets" or "Kung Fu Piano: Cello Ascends" by The Piano Guys and you'll hear a cello sing with such a mellow baritone voice that it'll feel like it melts like butter into your ears. I played "Cello Ascends" for a co-worker to get his opinion of the two headphones. When using the QC25s, he sat there with his eyes closed totally absorbed in the superbly reproduced music. When the song had finished playing he pulled the headphones off and with a huge smile said, "Wow. With the noise canceling on, I totally forgot I was at the office. You can get lost with those things on." I felt that was a solid review of the Bose when listening to songs that deliver mellow, mid-range audio that don't have demanding bass.But, if you go back to Sam Hunt's "Breaking Up In A Small Town," you just don't get the punch that you get with other bass rich headphones like the Beats Studios. Don't get me wrong, these things sound pretty good but they don't deliver the same, full listening experience. They provide detail and precision but without the ultra deep, rich sounds that physically move you and the crystal clear highs. If these are all you listen to, I don't think you'd crave more bass but if you do any A-B testing with the Studios, you'll hear what you're missing and wish for more.The same thing happens in Pittbull and Marc Anthony's "Rain Over Me." During Marc Anthony's main riff a huge bass roll drops from a low to almost sub-sonic in the first two seconds of the song. With the Bose on, the bass fades as it bottoms out. They just can't handle the low frequency.NOISE CANCELINGBOSE WINS BY A MILE...or more. I used the Bose side-by-side with the Beats on a commercial flight and with the music playing at modest levels, the Bose QC25s filtered out what I'd call 90 percent of the engine noise. Bose has PERFECTED Active Noise Reduction (ANR). Bose owns ANR. Even without music playing they greatly reduced engine noise.In the housework test, yes I'm Renaissance man that vacuums and cleans toilets, the Bose nearly drown out all of the vacuum cleaner noise and help take my mind off of the mundane chores.A common side effect of non-Bose ANR systems is hiss. Bose ANR produces absolutely no hiss.I was severely disappointed with Beats ANC (Adaptive Noise Canceling) performance while flying in a commercial airplane or while riding on a Washington, DC subway. While I gave Bose a 90% ANR effectiveness, I'd give Beats 50% at best. I had to crank up the volume to uncomfortable levels to get the jet engine noise abated to the levels Bose was delivering. Without music playing, the Beats might as well not have had any ANC. This is again surprising since Beats claims to have dual adaptive noise canceling modes. From the Beats Website "ANC automatically strikes a balance between your music and the world outside. If you only want to use the headphone to cancel external noise, ANC only mode automatically increases the level of noise cancellation, for a quieter world." Huh? The owners manual does not tell you how to get to these modes so one is left to figure it out them self or just assume that when music is playing, you are in music mode and when it is not...you know what I mean. BUT, I did figure out that if you press and hold the "b" button while listening to music wirelessly, you will get the Beats power up/down tone and the headphones will switch to non-music ANC mode. Press and hold and it will switch back. I could not find this explained in the owners manual.In the housework test, the Beats don't fully erase the noise of the vacuum cleaner but they help. Where they DO shine in the housework area is NO CORD! More on that below.As a general rule, we don't spend half of our life flying in airplanes. Most of our listening is done in residential or public spaces where Beats does a decent job reducing ambient noises that can interfere with your overall listening experience. Subways, street noise or at home with a clothes dryer going in the background are great examples of sounds that are well reduced by the Beats.As for the hiss, it's mild compared to sets like the Ultimate Ears UE9000 ANR but it's presence can be a little irritating, especially when you know ANR like Bose exists.If you want or need perfect ANR performance...go Bose. Period. End of story.WIRELESS(Winner) Beats has proven that Bluetooth can sound great (even better than wired). They have nailed BT with the Studios. I am so spoiled by the BT that I find using a cord to be a tangling, snagging hassle. The one issue I have is that I cannot get Siri to activate using the "b" button in wireless mode (remember pressing and holding the "b" button switches ANC modes). She only works wired using the inline iPod controls. Sad, but not too much of a problem and I can reach into my pocket and activate Siri from the phone.One oddity is that the shuttle buttons on the outside of the ear cups only work in wireless mode. You have to use the in-line iPod controls on the cord when wired. BUT, while wired, the "b" button becomes a bypass button. Press and hold the button while listening to wired music and the headphones mute (not pause) so you can converse with out yelling or needing to be yelled at. Pretty cool I guess but since the majority of my listening is wireless, this does not work.As I mentioned above, while doing housework wireless wins! I have caught the cord of other headphones and earbuds countless times on drawer pulls and yanked the headphones off of my head or the buds out of my ears. When washing cars, working around the house or just multitasking, wireless is the way to go, good ANR or not!For Bose, this is an easy one since the QC25s don't come with a wireless option. Bose does make a non-ANR wireless model but they fail miserably in audio quality. Why not merge the two products into one and make a great sounding, noise-canceling, Bluetooth headphone? That sounds like a winning product to me!While doing housework I have to route the cord into my shirt to keep if from snagging on things. Not ideal.CALL QUALITY(Winner) Beats Studio. The call microphone is on the side of the headset. Everything I know about sound leads me to believe that a caller on the other end of the line should not hear me as well as the in-line mic hanging below my chin on the Bose cord. But that is the case. I talk to my brother a lot using the Beats and he tells me that he cannot tell that I'm not holding the phone up to my ear.Bose put a mic on the back of the inline iPod controller that lies right below your chin. It's perfectly placed for great audio pick up but even in the best conditions it has a slight speakerphone sound that disappoints me a bit. It's still clear but not as clear as the Beats.EXTRASAccessories(Winner) Bose comes with a case, two-AAA Duracell Batteries, a cord (in the white version) with shuttle buttons and mic and a commercial airplane adapter.Beats comes with a case, a red mobile phone cord with black shuttle buttons, a black cord without buttons, a red USB-to-micro-USB charging cord and a USB wall plug with folding prongs.Bose wins Accessories for two reasons. First, being battery powered means no extra cords or wall plugs (no matter how Beats spins the supposed benefits of the rechargeable battery thing) and second, the airplane adapter. Beats can keep the straight audio cord and power accessories and give me battery power and an airplane adapter...although there would be nowhere to store them (see below).Cases(Winner) The Bose case is as thin as you can make a headphones case and comes in a very standard rectangle shape that fits into any messenger bag, back pack or suitcase. The small footprint and thinness mean some origami folding of the headphones to get them seated, but Bose solved for that and even embossed a diagram on the inside of the case (thank you). It has a place for a spare battery AAA battery (awesome) and airplane adapter. One oddity is that the pocket for the cord is on the outside of the case. I'd greatly prefer that the pocket be inside. My wife never puts the cord in the outside pocket, she just sets it on top of the headset and zips the case closed. She's afraid that over time the stretchy material will lose elasticity and the cord might fall out while traveling.The Beats case is oddly shaped like an egg. It fits in my Osprey Spin 32 backpack and in my carry-on-sized suitcase but it is awkward to carry in my average Timbuk2 or leather messenger bags. Beats must know that this is an issue as they include a carabiner that allows the egg to be clipped to the outside of a bag. The egg-shape is much harder to deal with and it has NO pockets for cords and accessories. A very strange omission for a headset that comes with THREE cords and a wall plug!POWER(Winner) Bose uses a replaceable, off-the-shelf AAA battery for power and I LOVE IT! If your battery dies, just pop in the spare battery that's nestled in the carrying case. If you forget to replace that spare? Not problem, the Bose will work without power while you make your way to any store that sells AAAs.Beats website says "Dead batteries can kill your vibe." Uh, okay but what if the internal rechargeable battery dies and you can't get to a power outlet? That kills your vibe even more since you'll have no sound. In this case, no charge means no music since the Studios only work with power, just like the old QC15s did. I'm not sure why Beats decided to do this but it was definitely a conscious decision that I will speculate was done because without the powered amp, the tuned equalization and the minimal adaptive noise cancelation working, the Beats don't sound very good.NOISE LEAKBose are so light and the head clamp is so relaxed, they leak way more sound than the Beats.SUMMARYBose and Beats both makes quality, well engineered products for which people are willingly to pay a premium for the brand name and the performance. It's amazing how opposite these headphones are but that fact makes it easier to decide between the two.Listening to certain genres, the Bose sound good enough to justify their price point. Add in the superior noise canceling and they are worth every penny. If you are a traveler that needs ANR headphones in noisy environments and loves great sound, buy the Bose.If you use headphones in more civil environments and love deep, rich bass and crisp, clear highs that accentuate the subtle nuances hidden in your music, get the Beats Studio Wireless.Or you don't mind your music artificially manipulated to enhance today's music and you like your tunes to vibrate your noggin once in a while and can accept mediocre noise canceling, go with Beats Studio.As both brands evolve and develop qualities of the competitive products, the consumer will be the winner.I hope you find this review helpful.(One word of warning, the Beats and Bose will reveal poorly sampled music. Get ready to update your library to 256 kbps AAC or better)
p1404
aVGot them a year ago for school graduation, 11 months later the part to fold snaps inside, i send them to beats and 2 weeks later i get a Brand New pair for FREE. Worth it, if they break and its a manufacturer fault, boom! free headphones. There good for working out and they sound amazing! The wireless is all i use but with the cord it sounds good too, i use wired for the ps4 and pc and wireless for my phone when i go out, these are worth the money, you cant go wrong with them
p1405
aVThe only issue is how easily the charger receptacle copper leads seem to bend inside the earphones. So far that does not stop it from being able to charge though. Other than than, excellent quality product for the price!
p1406
aVThe battery doesn't last too long, and compared to our other (great brand) wifi headphones, it falls behind. Comparing to a second headphone (also from the other brand, non wifi), the noise canceling on the Beats is WEAK. It's almost as if there is no noise canceling. Maybe I am spoiled, but my other headphones have longer lasting battery and a ridiculous noise canceling capacity (same price range).Now, the looks are unbeatable, it is gorgeous and, for listening to music, I like it better than the other headphones I mentioned above. If I am watching a movie, the Beats doesn't necessarily stand out.My dream-come-true would be having the best of these 3 headphones combined into one, but since I haven't found that yet, I will use each one of them according to my needs. In the end, it wasn't that much worth the purchase, but I am keeping it because I need a wireless device - my old noise canceling headphone is wired and the wifi one that the battery lasts much longer is my son's.
p1407
aVI purchased my Studio Wireless headphones in February 2014, prior to the Apple takeover, and couldn't stop telling people how great they were. They are very comfortable, have a long battery life, do a decent job of noise-cancelling, and the sound quality is outstanding. The reason I only give them a 3 out of 5 stars is because they broke today (5/12/2015) a mere 15 months after I purchased them. When I say they broke, I mean the plastic on the headband above the left ear-cup SNAPPED while I was simply putting them on. Considering most people's heads aren't only 6 inches wide, it's required to spread the ear-cups to put them on. I find it to be ridiculous that there would be such an obvious stress point on the headphones that it wouldn't be addressed before going to market. Now Apple is providing the "support" for the headphones, and of course my warranty ran out 3 months ago.I have taken very good care of them since purchase, having them inside their case whenever they are not in use. For the price of $400 I was hoping that these would last for several years before I decided to replace them with whatever was the latest and greatest at the time.
p1408
aVVery easy to set up. Feels comfortable wearing. Not sure battery lasts as long as I'd like it to. Need to use it some more to confirm. And with Bluetooth, the range is short, so at home it works best paired with your phone rather than with your laptop or desktop.
p1409
aVThe headphone is good but after six month of using it doesn't work anymore. Also the ears pad got all ripped. I tried to contact customer service many times but they did not care or reply me back. I Think is unacceptable to pay almost $400.00 for a headphone and have no customer service.My friend had the same problem within a year of use and went to Apple store to fix it and they charged $350.00...so he had to throw away the headphone. Beats have No after sale at all... So if you have problem with any Beats products... Just cry:(After that... no more Beats products. Very disapointing!
p1410
aVI did my research before getting these and it's hard to justify such an expensive purchase... BUT I love them.  No more cords to get in the way, crystal clear and thumping audio.  Gives new life to my music collection and they are awesome to use in the gym!!
p1411
aVI love these things, take them to the gym and school. The charge last very long , I have charged them once a month since I got them. Price was great and style is great. Can't beat the wireless headphones @ the gym. Sound is clear has bass but not overwhelming. 5star
p1412
aVI wish I could write two reviews as I love the sound quality for these headphones, but the pair I own have fallen apart. First the left ear adjustment bar came unattached, and now the right ear pad has disconnected from the arm. These earphones are not meant to be worked out in. I
p1413
aVNice headphones that worked well.  To get the perfect sound, must have knowledge about the device that is the source of the music. The only problem is that I could keep them away from my teenager.
p1414
aVThe wireless part of these beats did not work for me. I called apple services and they said it was most likely a hardware problem, and advised me to return them, which I did. I still gave it two stars because it worked great plugged in, and the costumer service at Apple who apparently handle the beats product was very courteous.
p1415
aVJust upgraded from the original studio beats to the wireless. Who knew removing the chord could make such a big difference. Really enjoying them so far. Comfortable, great sound and stylish. Perfect for travel and listening to jams in your cubicle.
p1416
aVThey're amazing, but after about 3 months the battery life has declined sharply. I used to get about 15 hours of use out of them before recharging and now I'm at about 8. If you're considering rechargeable (vs. battery only) definitely go for the rechargeable option since replacing batteries would really add up! A must have for anyone who travels by train or plane a lot.
p1417
aVThe HISS of the noise canceling is awful! If you are listening to music at a normal leval you can still hear a hiss. For the price you would think Apple, would have figured this out with the re-design. Sent Back!
p1418
aVthis is based on the pair i received from huppins, it seems repackaged and used with hair follicles attached and all over the headphones. the right hinge is more loose than the left..bluetooth worked as expected though. while the second pair, the right hinge was looser than the left but  the left side practically dangles, making me feel like it might break, but again the bluetooth is working as expected.Update: since i had 2 bad white ones i decided to switch colors l(and pay extra) for a titanium one, almost perfect pair, alot better than the 2 white ones. Only issue is the cusion on top isnt glued on right. Im just gonna keep this one since i think its the best ill get.Update 3: the cushion is getting worst, its already starting to get undone as pictured.
p1419
aVFirstly, Delivery was extremely fast unexpected within 2 days.. Headphones looks like brand new... awesome no scratches. sound and quality excellent ... overall excellent condition... that's the reason i am giving FIVE STAR * * * * *  ..
p1420
aVI bought these headphones on February 23rd and it's now April 20th and the headphones are already broken. They won't connect to Bluetooth anymore and when I use the actual plug in from headphone to iPhone, the music only plays out of one ear. I love these headphones but I'm incredibly unhappy that I paid almost $400 for them and they only worked for a very few months and now I can't return them.
p1421
aVI got these for my husband but when they arrived they had a blown speaker and had to be exchanged.The 2nd pair work great and let me tell you the color is beautiful! It's not a flat blue, it's actually a deep and pearly blue. Loved the color so much I stole from my hubby and we got him another pair ;-)
p1422
aVI purchased the headphones in spite of reports of questionable reliability. Comfortable, stylish, decent sounding. My teenagers and spouse wouldn't use them because they didn't want to break dad's fragile looking headphones. I was so concerned with physical damage I didn't anticipate that the electronics would be the first thing to fail. Static on the right side speaker. Sounds like noise canceling circuit messing up and makes them unusable. I did enjoy about 10 hours of use before failure. About $38 an hour for use. I can't return through Amazon. I will now test out Beats warranty customer service. I would probably purchase through a brick and mortar store as opposed to Amazon next time simply because a real person is more likely to help me with a product failure.
p1423
a.